      "identifier" : [
         "8_06836_11"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Hebdomadaire",
         "Index pour les livr. de déc. 1918 dans v. 1, no 15, numéro de l'ICMH 8_06836_15."
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Ottawa : Directeur de l'Information, [1918]"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "fra"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "Bulletin officiel canadien"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06836_11",
      "label" : "Vol. 1, no 11 (10 déc. 1918)",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Bibliothèque et Archives Canada."
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06836",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06836_11",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ]
   },
   "version" : "0.4"
}
{
   "doc" : {
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XX. No. 18 (September 30th, 1916)"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "text" : [
         "AS THE Hý E WAR c KILLED CHRISTIANITY? .- XX No. 18 rus Pincher'es reshing - Bee hat 1 Thi nk oftres' es By ýthe- M-aid o b ert Borden L ei s ure h is a Rare Thing COURIER PRESS, Limlited, TORONTO Prîce 10 Cent*",
         "THE COURIE1I. Service Means comfort, convenience, elcono0my, and, safety. The home that is completely equipped* with electrical devices is a happy one.- Ail the drudgery of housekeeping is elinin- ated by electricity. You eau wash, iron, sew, sweep, cook, keep cool in summner and warm mu winter, by means of electrical apparatus designed es- peciaily to relieve you.,of uxrnecessary and fatigung labor. 'At our showrooms ail these devices are ready for your inspection. Competent demionstrators will operate and explain them for, you. The Toronto Electric Light Company. Limited ##AT YOUR, SERVICE-\" 12 Adelaid St E. Tekphons AdI. 404 CANADIAN NQRTHERN ALL THE WAY 1Fromn the Laurentians to the Rockies Serving Canada s National Playgrounds including Grand Diseharge of the Saguenay, Laurentide Na tional Park, Algonquin National Park, Muskoka Lakes, Georgian Bay Hinterland, -partm*flt, E James St., Ilbec. Man. To littie hearts and big ones, too - the Wrigley Spearmen. are calling, calling every day: Their message is one of good -cheer about this refreshing, beneficial goody that costs so littie but means s0 much to comfort and contentmeiit. Chew Ift after every meal Two avors MADE -CANAI ainst ait Write Wmn. Wriç impuffls -Co., Ltd., WriaI* mpualf les. Toronto, frf0 bock and sa:npiO oDoubIe MI t.\" 0 THE INDEPENDENT ORDER 0F FORESTER FURNLSHES A COMMLEE SYSTEM 0F INSURANC Pofloien Isuued, by the Boclety are for the. prote etiolà of yoii ftmily, and caunot be bought. sold, or pledgedL Beuelita are Payable to the Beneficiary lu caue et cieath, or to the member ln case of his total di.sablllty, or te the niembet on attaining seventy years of aile. poliisa issued f rom $500 to $5,000. TOTAL BENEFITS PAID, 49 MILLION DOLLARS. For further Information and literature apply te, FRED J. DARCH, S.S. E G. STEVENSON, S.CI Temple Buildings, TORONTO. ~BIGQGA CANA The Finest Hun Grounds inAÂme ARE CONVENIENTLY REACHED ADIAN PACII or Union EIec fric WRI EY rb\u003c",
         "THE COURIER. Smile or Two-l IES 0F THE DRY TIMES. t littie medley for Ontario use) 11Y shoulder ta shoulder, ring, shade by shade, leir sang, stagger along DYS of the booze brigade. fig way ta Montreal, boys, long way to go, ng way ta Motint Royal, the flagons stili may flow. tHiram Walfrer, ell, 0'Keefe's beer- Ivrite ta Montreal now IY 8tuff's right here! alWays dark weather cýod fellows get together, stein on the table- rtleY Dewart here. 10w gave the silver I'd spend ie bar, brow is flot furrowed nor kied by care, hand is now steady, I'm Iosing thirat, 1 bess you and keep you, nier Bill Hearst. R littie bit of thirst stili burn. g 'earning, down in my throat for you; a longing there for your re- rnlng, you, 1 do. cOrne, ta my lips again, 'nie, hike the gentle ramn, 'ea lîttie bit of thirst stili rning tarning for you. tVieve, aweet Genevieve, :ýOze did corne, the booze did go, uçjh it may your fond heart leve, that ne'er again 'twill flow. Iidn't want ta lose you but we DUght you aught ta go, IKing and your country need their dough; Want you and miss you when have a wee pain- hWorry along without you if u corne fot again. 'HE RIGHT PHRASE. in Corning, Arkansas, 1e the *nIiY-rîrank Scott -and hls nialeteen cblîdren. The kid- LIde three sets of triplets and 's Of twins. Only two came boys, ail together-'Great; INS 0F THE TIM ES. Wee see:- \u003er1ice drop 'way down it le a ýO-dconsult an odulist; 'nlbulance ani -the coroner IlÔW1 etreet it is a sigu that ride has been lnterruipted; O Dafpers published wlthout 19 Mayor Church,,it is a sign Mayor slipped a cog somne- m1n1en. rushing to, vote, It Is a tthe Polling place le ln a 0Wý Or a milliuery shop; ait troops belng revlewed, It Sthat Sir Ram Hughes le In 1bOurhood; eller advertising a sensation- 1 loPîc, t i a sign he's afrald 108elwo'tdraw; 1With short sklrts and the l\"1 their headis, it Is a sign arFe easlly turned; or HÎughes elected, it la a Y1lcle Sam was betwlxt the ~Prohibition1 I is not in force for the finest beverage of ail 1't SALADA' IFo favour, quality and richness there is nothing to equal a cup of \"SALADA\". Invigorating, refreshing, and so pure and clean. 0225 SOLD AT ALL GROCERY STORES ce 5c., 6c. and 70c. a pound DUNHILL'S INNER TUBE BRUYERE DEAD ROOT PIPES A revelation to any who have flot already experienced their charmn. See them at THE DUNHILL SHOP HARGRAFT BUILDING scoit and Coiborne Sta., Toronto If you are this week a chance reader of the Courier and yon find il ecgood stuif\" you may count on it that it is so regularly. It improves on acquamntance. Your suh- scription solicited. Circulation Manager. **THE CARS 0F PROVEN PERFORMAlNC-E' Four -38 Completely Equipped ) 9 5The New Brscoe The price inclue U~ ~ completely equipped rvignt-58i the \"'Extras's $1185 $825 The Briscoe takes you where you want ta go-and bringe yau back-up bill and aver rough road-because the Briscoe motor bas the proven power that delivers a littie more pull than you ever demand of ît.. 38 Horse Power, with four or eight cylinders as you prefer. It's a car of beautiful lines and beautîful proportions- i 14-inch Wheel Base, Briscoe streamn lne body, full cantilever rear spring suspension, deep upholstery, rieh co1or schemnes and elegant appointments. The Briscoe Eight-38 was the first Eight Cylinder Car made in Canada. The Briscoe Four-38 was the car chosen for the light car re- quirernents of the Canadian Expeditionary Forces. Have you readMr. Briscoe's own story of IlTh e Ha/f Mil- lion Dollar Mo/or? h!'s a fascînaiing -Pen Picture of pluk, Pil /y and business- o/oahos, de/er inalion and s cess. .11 reads like a novel, attention like a ro- mance. Write for ' a copy, to-day. TrHE CANADIAN BRISCOLP MOTO'R CC., LUMITED - BROCKVILLE, ONT. If you change your address and desire to receive your copy without delay, -always, give your old address as well as the new one.",
         "TH1E COURIER. You have doubtless admired so-anid-so's greenhouse-p erhaps eveILTo see the owner cutting a bunch o! fiowers while you passed, muffled Up against the blizzard, aroused even deeper long- ing. Wlien you write us regarding prices, you niay, find you have been denying yourself and your famlly quite needlessly. S Write Dept. C. GLASS GARDEN BUILDERS, LIMITED i Kent Building Toronto. Transportation Bldg., êt. James St. Montreai. Facto ry-Georgetowfl, Ont. BRUCE'S FLOWERING BULBS For Wfluter Flow»ring in the. House and Sprinu FJowerlug in the. Garden i*tquistte colors \u003eand fragrance -IASU.'lt GROWN-Must be planted this Fait. C OLL EC TION S No. 1, indoors 25 bulbs, postpaid 80.70l No. 8. indoors 100 bulbe, postpsid 82.60 o.5 uoos25 \" 70 No. 7, outdoors 100 Il . 2.60 No. 2. 5nor 0 1.80 No. 4, indoors 200 \" 5.00 No. 6, outdoors 50 L 80 No. 8, outdoors 200 5 .00 Zach of these collections contRinsx HYACINTHS, T'UIIPS, CROCUS, 1,IlzS, NARCISSUS and other buibs. FRE-~Send for our 321,age illustrftted catalogue of Bulbs, Plants, Seeds, sud P'ou try Supplies, etc. NOW READY. JOHN A. BRUCE \u0026 COMPANY, LIMITED HAMILTON . Eetabllsed 1850 . ONTARIO THE CA NADIAN.BANK 0F COMMERCE SIR EDMUN'D WALKER, C.V.O., LL.D., D.C.L., Preuldent. JOHN AIRD, Qoneral Manager. H. V. F. JONES, Aaa't. Gentral Manager.' CAPITAL, $ 15,000,000 RESERVE FUND,$3,0,0 SAVINGS BANK ACCOUNTS Intere8t atthe current rate le allowed on ail depouits eif $i.Q0 and ip'wards. Caroful attention la given to every account. Small accounts are welcolned Accounts lnSy be opened and operated by mail, Akccouziti may be opened ln the names of two or more porsons, wlthdrawala to be made by auy one of themn or by the murviror. jSTAN PS AND COINS. PRINTING. PACKAGES8 free to oollectoe's for 2 cents IJISITING CA2RDS-L.4UbB' or Gentle- petag;as.ofe hunre dIf n mein 's, printed to ordor-istest stylel. -og \u0026ep; catalogue; hinasr lie flfty cents per hudred, post raid. rraflk Always cali the doctor-remember First Aid la only frt E=E]",
         "H E Septemnber 3Oth, c o U 1916 No. 18 1ROBERT BORDIBN AT LEISURR pressions of a Statesman who Sidesteps an Interview Like a \"Parfit Gentil Knight\" 0O11lY finbe o'clock on Dominion Day B V 1 telephoned to Sir Robert Borden's to ask for the privilege of an interview 11M, but Sir Robert had already gone to his MI11l'on Day is the great universal holiday 1; but ýthe Canadian Premier was eariy at ,aise seemed to be at wark, as 1 entered ,ates an Parlibament Hill, exeept the police- were on guard at Ctifferent points in the )rin l the buildings. Que looked with re- e-s to'wards \"the Hill\" itself, nhissing the Itely, recalling one's earliest eleven-year- 311 clilnbing to the very top of it, and look- 011 the panorama of,_city, river, and valley ,1 the Laurentian bis beyond. The city, iver, and the valley, areý still there; ýbut -aurentian ills are the only part cf the ut bas net changed.- More sawmill, more 10re, city, more everything, are spread Svalley and up the river, and soon thefe bore\" tower from w'hich to view tbem. Ot-hot-in the streets; and even the green -he bill was shimmeriug in the heat. But d -coolness encompassed me, as I stepped ast Wing, wbere the Premier's main office e led me down long corridors, empty to-day, at of Government.\" îrt was seated at a great broad desk, that spaclous room, whose windows look west rliaient Square. In spite of the beat of elimate, and Canadian politics, and the ýven on Dominion. Daybe- couldn't take a Is courrteous kinduess produced an atmes- eisure. uce an atmosphere -of leisure, in 1916, is One of the fine arts, a kind of whbite miagie. Sir Robert many happy returns of the ýday, Domainion Day is a kind\"0f proxy -birtbday Onler. At any rate, he bas two birtbdays ýuit no -one would ever guess it! I expect Mi in Leap Year. led my, errand; and Sir Ro-bert smiled. r give Interviews to anybody,\" he said. O5sirng you ýcome to tea with Lady li.rden ; and mneantime I can be thinking it over.\" Ws white magic again. For In less tban es froni tbe -timeI went In, the fatherly at the turtber door was \"wavlng me fare- ¶1 sf111 there was' that air ot courtesy and lahfn1ng witb mie. that Sir Robert',s hair bas ýsometbing to an1d perhaps he is. now reaping the roward il 'his boybood, must otten have beeu a lu. For 1 fancy that-wondertul haîr of bis 'b-enght the uncfuous fingers of many d masters, spiritual and otberwise, down Oeflnendatory pats; and no boy likes that! IY the other boys tweaked it afterwards, bitn aboutý it; and l'm sure that at seven- 319bt tbat it was unculy; and tried wetting t (wbicb ýonly made If curiier), or cuttlng 1rt, 'whlch would have made it try ta bristle, lave dlstressed bis mother. I daresay that anlotber's pleasure In ut and the way tbat d rurnlng ber fingers *thirough it, tbat realize-subconsclously at ieast-that bis Ivery magnificont asset; before be forgot \"Id tben. Tinie and Responslbility caine Puit their ballmark: upon If. 4IRRE, where Sir Robert and Lady Bordan '11fide tboir home Iu the Capital, Is a bouse hegood faIrnes, at Its building, gave a gIîtt 55anid bospltallfy. It was bulif by Mrs. *d, w'bicb means that spaclousness and \"d Intellect aud the Intensest interest, Its lake-up. Later, Mrs. Char-les Harriss aPile there; whlch means thaf only hlappy ý8ed4 the heurs In lt; for whoecould pass \"'!th ber anywhere, and nef be happy? KATHLEEN BO0W K And into a bouse witb sucb a tradition-for it was aiready a tradition, tho-ugil s0 young a one that if was stili 11tra4ling clouds of glory\"--came Sir R-obert and Lady Borden, f0 crystailize it for Canada, The wide central bail, with ifs grebat fire-place, and ifs mauy mottos--welcoml!ig, provocativo, sootiling or stlmulating-is the Heart of the- House.- And- suitabbiy-ln tUe Heart otf the flouse tbe visitera Inséribe thoir naines lu a guest book tbat Is fast becomiug an unusuaiiy comprobenýsive collection ut autograpbs. \u003eTo fihe ri-gbt Is the long drauwing-nom, witb ifs quaint, circular dais-; and ta tbe lotft tbe original diningroom bas ibeen turnod into a library--a rosI (Iibrsry, un w'Ich ta road books and discuss thein- and beyond that, tU e owners have added a new and ]anger dinlng-room. Su xnucb for the inside ofthfe bouse. But oufeide! Beyond the 'hall, Lady Borden was serving tea on the terrace; a nod fiagged terrace, wltb a stone coping round if, and siallow stone stops tblat lead tbe way f0 a lawn that is inlald 'with rose -plots. Snoi roses, sud sucb quantifiasot tbom. Richmond roses, witil tbeir roslesf parfume are there, and General Xe- Artiluns on glorieus up-standing stemis, and Mrs. John Lang, wiose oarly Viooran propriefy never turus luto p'niuiness, and whose beauty nover grows passe, aven beside fie latest vanieties. White roses, and red roses, sud runsetty rosas, fou. But unostly piuk i-oses ot every shape and sliade. A wealth oft fem. \"I pdeked a iundred this mornlng,\" said Lady Ber- den; and 1 believed ber, becausa SLbe said if; aud latar, 1 Ibelleved her becausa aile Put a gi-eat part of file hundred Iuto =y bauds ta carry away. But I wouîd nover bave belleveid it ou the evidene or mny E R eyes, for neot a rose appeared ta be mising. At the edge of the green-hordered, path-en- circied rose gardon, a white balustrade shines against a dark background, abackgrourid of trees and shrubs and vinles and branches, ail of green. \"The rose garden is my wife's, and the wuld garden is mine,\" said Sir Robert, as he led some of the party along the winding paths down the hililside. W HEN the bouse was flrst built, tbaf house was ail wiid and -no gardon. But now! Now, I teit that the moment Uad coma for that interview. \"Have you thought, Sir Robert,\" I began. \"Thougbt,\" he said, witb a gesture that was worthy Of a Budget Debate;: \"tho-ught, and time, 'and care, and work, -have ail gone f0 the makiug 0f my wild garden. Mor-e thiugs were growing on this bank than you would suppose at the fime when We began gardening if; 'but wben the natural growth ýbad a cîlance, it bocame luxuriant. I belped with the paths; and the makîng of those little stone steps; and týh\u0026re, among the stone work, do you see that littie plant? Equisefum, it is called, though in Eng- lisb it bas many names, such as Horse's Tail, Thou- sand Knot, and Ground Nut.2' \"You -migbf put'periwinkle in among the ,stanes, f00,\"1 1 said, hoping tbat by boldly offering aâvice to a Prime Min1ster 1 nîight catch bis attention. But it was thbe attention of the gardener that 1 caught \"Perrwinkle? Trailing, dark-green, sbiny leaves, *witb a starry purpie flower? -I must remember thaf.\" \"I1 was iloping,\" I beg;an again, peradventurously, \"that you would talk a litile about the recent Trade Conference of the Allies; the proposed frade rela- tions ot the Powers, Allies, neutral and enemy coun- tries, affer the war. Could you net-?\" \"Lef me talk fa you of the Intensâfy of the Wild Cucumber,\" said Sir Robert, wifh a twlnkle in bis eya 'tbat was refiected In bis bair; \"I spent heurs, toiling in my shirf-sleeves, f0 remove every trace of if. One day- I -thou-ghf that 1 hadbeen -entlrely suc- cessful. 1 Uad worked the whole way dewn througb tbe garden, and comlng up, warm but triumphant, I saw that (durlng my absence, asit seemed) a groat long trailer of if bad climbed up the bank, and was pusblng an inquisitive fendril tbrougb the balus- trade on f0 the Iawn. Nofbing discourages that .cucumber, not sait, nor scissors, nor spades, nor fire, nor watar. But bore Is another busy windling, one et those that I like the best, the purpie fiowerng raspberry. It, too, âs Intense, but not Infrusive, Ilke tbe ýwËid cucumbor. -_hen filere Is the swamp maple; and tbe Eider, loveiy in leat, In fiower, and lu berry.\" D OWN at the very end ot the bill, there is a ruefic seat, wilere fhiere Is a glimpse of the Rideau River. It us as quiet thora as in the beart of the country. -Little etray breezes pusb the leaves asidýe te lot the sunlght tbrougb f0 kiss tbe wild flowers tiat are bIdden there. Aînemonos In greaf quantitios grow ;near fhe wafer, and buirusi-.es, -and wlId sun- fiuwers, and touch'me-nots are there. Quantities of birds fluffer In and out, bringing news of the flowers and featiers -of ftle outslde world to the shut-ins on tic bank. There are tomns of every variety, and, file suent of warm eartb, and wet moss, and tbe spirit of tbe woods Iu dt ail. Down there by fie river, one Is decelved lu-to ýthlnklug tbat one bas only coume hait way. But thle patb fiat leads upwardis (reversing the usual order oft tblngs) Is only hait as long. \"It Teally Is a wlld gardon, witi ai the Improve- ments of civllization,\" sald sanie one. -Wild enougb to decelve the elect,\" sald Sir Robent, \"for a mud-furtle and a wIld partrldge have botU hououred us witb a vIsIt, There are birds lu great nuinhers and variety. Listen t0 that Wood-packer! And tliere are orioles, and spanrows, o! course;, robins, and flilkers \u003cdo you know flckers?), Jenny R 1 »E R",
         "THE COURIER. Wrens, and swallows, and warblers, and ever so, ma,ny more.\" Surprisingly, we had reached tbe top of the path. \"Corne and soe what we have done at this side,\"1 said Sir Robert. \"We bave oovered the fonce with -vines and busées and creepers, so that the boards are no longer merely a fonce, but a support. 1 sodded *most of this lîttie ban\u003c myseif. That was wben I hiad less of other tbings to do,\" lie ended with a smlle, as we mounted the stops to the terrace. \"We've seen tbe wild garden, and the wiid fiowers, and the wald birds, and the river,\" ch'arused tbe viol- tors enthusiastically, \"Iand we'ye seen the bank wbere SIr Robert bad a wild time growing grass; and we've seen that splendid tree-shrub, the one ,that dies down every winter, and grows up-amaz- ingly-a:gain next year; the -one witb thick stems, and great, broad leaves, a magnifIcent thing calledl polygamy.\" \"Polygamy?\" queried. Lady Borden. \"ýShe tocans pulygonum, my dear,\" answered Sir Robert, witb the look of a mnan w'bo- has only one idea about wornen, and that one is bis wife. The scout of the roses overflow*ed the gardon, and came wiVb me 'througb the bail, where Lady Borden's goodbbye ta me w-as buried ln roses. \"And is the interview-as an-,lnterview--quite lmi- pSsible?\" 1 asked my ýhast at parting. \"I1f an interview were possible at ail, I w'ol one to, you,\" he said. And the white magi was, that he said it so kindly, and 1 was 111 to feel it true, that I only realized two da3 that a mnan 'wh is'neyer Interviewed inaY tri say that to any would-be Interviewer. \"But, you sec,\" lie went on, \"ln Canadiali lIfe, If we have auytbing to ýsay, we are suPP say ît in the House, or at some great pulU Il And if we have nothing to say-why tal\u003c at So I went away, po .ndoring that excellent reason. And though 1 bave no doulit that V4 Woinen are flot so very foar off, ,I f eel tbat be of no use for me to as.pire to thes figb pli HAS WAR KILLED Tlzese are the views ol a U niversity ProtIessor. Dr. Moral Philo-lophy in: McQilL -He has been there spent in Logic -and, MetaPhyslcs Inf Edinburgh, Chht Ihat in his article \"Hsthe Wai, Kîlled Christlani IT la not easy to ask whether CbriýstianitY be a fadlure i\u003erý ualo uutil we y7tlet whbat we Mean by ohristlanlty. We have a-lb been biug'bt Up lu fte en-virongnient il bas sgreated. We »we to il most of eur acbools aud colieges, sud oui -hospitals and oui philanthropies. It lis not ta be ldentified, for exanipie, witb auy, Of i-t paît »or Its paaglng f o-ms. These ay I') li-vothoir relative...,impertectiofis, wble the Christian life and the Christian Ideal may be -bath truth- and reality. Th!s J[ bebieve te ,be th~e case lu spie of the present international complîca- tiens- Andý in talking »of certain formes o! Cbris- tianity as a relative fe-Ikure, I amn certainly also coin- uittng mnyol! tu the position t1hat some foms of Christianity that are now obsobete bave been of the greatest valbue and Imp\u003eortance In tbeir time. It le equally aibsurd ta opeak aie If the fallure of (3hrlstianity were iliustrated In the apparent incon- siotency betweffn the profession aud the -pracétice o! the Christian nations w-ho are en-gaged lu thie ýwar. Ail war, It ls oalulied by some, Io un-ChieUian, and icau neyer consistently be entered iipou by peoples who m-ko a -profession o! Chrlstianlty. As ta thie two or thîee things may be sald. lm the flrai place, we are ail per!ecbly aware of what we mean boy saying that England, and Russia, anddermany, are ail Christian countriles. -We mereby inoan that Chistianity le the officlal and the tradi- ti-onal religion of those peuples. We do ual mean that elMler thoîr rubers or the entire, body of the people govern their livos and actions by the latter, or by the veifeet spirit, of Cbristlanlty. Nor, again, do w-e mean that (3hrliianlty ls an autiboniaive code of mules for thie entire conduct o!- ife, national as w-el as lndividuai. This Io a most mistaken and a most, pernîcbous idea. It Is, rather, a spiri sud a power thait shou-d animate ail aur aetlvlty and that w-l11 fins-lly subdue ail 'things ta itselt. It lIo, lu ta~ct, lu iself a continuai. w-ar o! thie spirit agaînet the merely natumal life. Lt proclaims thie aid truth that ms-ny are called, -but !ew are chosen. It le pre-commtted ta thie idea thai there always 'w-l bc Rtrife and con-filet among men as long as the w'orId is; not a eplritualized w-orld. And' w-hile It Is certaily true that thie deliberate makliug o! w-ar l5e un-.Ohristlan, It by fiaen-s foll'ws libat the preparaion for w-ar, s a posible caiamlty, is w-rang. And o! course there le n'a questioni that soldions any- w-bere w-ho die that et-bers may 1Is'e ihrougb their deatb are acting on the Christian p.inclple of sac- rifice, of \"dylng t'a Ilve.\"1 N OW theesseçnce of! Chrlstlaulty i-e the affirmation N tbe led Is ecrificlng and viotorlous Lave, and that tlirougb love and s3acrifice men enter iat com-mnioln witb God, andi wltb one another. Il le equally O! the essence o! Obrlstiaality ta liolti that, w-hil-e the -natural liTe of man may ho proýparatIon for, or -a prototype of, the \"plitu.l ilfe, -what wo cal the spIrituýal Ilfe canot be entereti upen without a certain deniai o! thie merely na, ural basis of liTe-If lndeed there be any suýcl tllng ais amiereiy natural lIte for rrn as man. Cbrisiae-uty lias neyer cam- naitteti the errai o! regardlug the world ta be sanie- tlilng other than Lt la. It le not commutteti, s'a far s Its truth or !alsity 16 concerneti, te s-ny oue-sl-ded doctrine o! human nature. XIn speakitng of oui' cviliizatlen a-s Cbrlsýlaný, I distincion frein that of thie Orient, for o * -ý,or of Central MmIca, w-e aie idoin,g na uGrc\u003c tÈa'n think- Ing of 'aur so\u003cclcty as a eoclety imite whlieb the Chrlis- tlan Idea lias ai be-et entered lu a more or Tes fimidamnontal w-ay, And If the Ohrie,;tiani Idea he the By ýWILLIAM C. 1idea t-hat- bumn perfection, or Iý can ho atteimued ouly b\u003e' the adopi attitude o! mind aind -w-l, Christ to-day as It ever, we-- ls, the te, say (ais ,do ms-ny) that lt I, GCbnLstlaniy thai -le9 revoalet fb confirmation of its truth. lt le irutb of the version -o! buman -stands and for wlhlich it be-s sto If, furîlier, It, be -hebd Hiat dourbted\u003e' a failure la so fasr as unaibic te copo witb -he natmi'am and ambitions o! thie w-airing p yestoiday, the proper reply to that Ohuls'lanuiy le In -ts eo stiuctive o! f he fiee celce (0 n oice o! in-dividuals. T HIE moder-n world, It le t'a les-rut the besson o! the gros or Vhree centuies that libere le the process that la ce-led thie Edu Race. Lt le part o! the truth ( Chrisian Bible and tbe Obrietl In thei idea a consummaflon, a somehow o! the'Bible and the C 'Thoe firest gre at 'un-deception,i ln Hie ,matter of -Cbrle'tlanity the besson tHet n'a one merely ni form « belle! can be regardeti, one thing that os-n se 'the Ili conitinent, or a w-orld. There Christian e-ven, w-ho can thlnk bis-Ow-n community aind its ipi eff lescous or s-ny more vain H of it opoen.lt le qbviouq of the w-ar wlil be the bioadenin) o! the Ideals 'a! ail the holligere o! Cbhrstlaxlty and religlon. m ore than ever befome a senset a x s s b t e n m r el f andi unjust aime and amabitions But oven i! Hie ba t-ho case, as w-f1il-ho fia mare ground forr as a failure than tbere le Tom r~ dreanim o! mankint la ita final - Illusion. 1Insteadt o! ts-lkng of the fa: oe miigihi with equai reason, In It- resubtis, teilk of the Talbure falhre o! dexuoecy, or of the 'ai o! the Tallure a! science as »it aisk, of the id-es of t-be state as for tHie pieserviation and the py lîfe ln vlew o! tbe faulure Of c' and plcies ta avold the prose s'a man' a-venues o! the And wlist of thie vs-lue DE Hie aud the technie o! modern\u003c tn use those for destmudotin Or fai ti-one w-bore the -hume-n fe-otOr \u0026u more mass o! mue-terial? Ie the sa\u003e Toi the fs-hure o! ibat pretoz ex-pl - atlon cf human s'oiety inerel\u003e' uature-listlc devoloPmeint such attpt0d condemnlatlan agekes and scléuees la just a condernatioan of religion for ni not profess to do. Let us rem admitteti about ChristlaniitY 10 CHRSTIANITY Caldwell occupies the Macdonald Chair ot 'or thirteen Yeats. The rest of his lufe he :ago-,and Germany. But you wlll notice i?\"\" he has no ýympathy with Bernhardi. A LD W E LL choose wbat they would so'wand reap. Equally dangerous with tbe one-sided keness to the Divine, naturalisiu of the past bas ýbeen the 0, Jon of a spirltualized secularsm and materialism of tbe presOlit, iaxity is just as true cessive Pre-oocupation with, and devotion to, ~refore, qulte correct pursuits ta wbidb the great East, for ex8.iII s fot the fallure of neyer as yet fallen victlm. Instead, indee ytihe war, biâ the gardImg blms'elf as the creature of au bour, true In virtue of the the viictim of materlal1 conditions, man Is no'1 nature fer wbich it upon in tbe nomne of ail that lie most loves )d ln ali ts formes. fiee, if need be, ail the visible good's for Ohrislanlýty is un- t.bat lie cau eee only w-ith the eyes Of fa it bas sbewn Itself tbose of an unquestlonlng devotion and an U1iQ Land polltical aimes In« uneeifishîness. And one of the etroflge eoiples of to-day and to this supremQ sacrifice of self and of ian -tbile- ontention la deareat of earth's possessilons bas beoin, an ite just ais littie de- we know, the aippeal to the old altars that 1 ations as it le of the thýoned sacuIfIce as thbe lkw l-fe eterual. It le; thus qu it htin the bounds of pr£ that, for many -reosens, we s'hall witness ini be boped, bas nd* future a revival. of supernaturallsni and of MtIes, o! the last two rather liban a deioliiie of the same. Vbie ut work ln bumanity doubt have Its attendant dangers, amoflg th ication -of the Huanan haps an une-eas'onnjg conservatisin, and f, thîs Idea tbat',the actionlsm, and an In-tolerance of progresslive aun, ()hjrcb,; althougb One of the best meétbode W! guardlng a-gi' re botb of themn part dangers would ho an Intelligent and svln hurch of hie nations. lnterest nôw, en the -part of! oui s.o-called e berofore, of the, war and intelligent people, lin the work of the 1 s.nd religioin wlU be as they are to-day, and lu the place c! rei tlonal or establisheýd the 11f e of buantty. or talked of, as tte fe of a people, or, a AGAIN, it bas been often observed that le su1yl noa one, noa A Testament bas far more te sayag that lihe prayers of love of money and the love 0f self thali tests, are any more war-if, lndeed, lIt ever speaks o! war w ian \"the suppications tGjan a manfestatiea o! the ýstruggle 0 that'one great effort that le at the boni-t'of the naitural man i g and the humanlzing traniflormed by love or ffth. And lt is ats s to the essence true that the present titanie struggle le a lit -wIll. brlng about conclusive proaf of the inadequacy of tHie of the dlscrepancy eeonomlc basis of Our ei'vlllzatloii than it 1 about anotiber w'orld rellglous lrnsls in s-pite 0f the superstltlffl n this present world. a-nd the orlnie-stadned history of ail religion' ft cortadn1y lis, there tlianity Included. *gardinig Cbilstianity It w-ould, of course, be another thiu\u0026ý ta ta]~ igardng the ago-iong war as a demonstration o .f the f allure of ti erfection as Itise 1f, an tslanlty and the religion of the diumnhei. But' he a rash student and a rasb thinker 'w-o W( lure o! Cbrl4snity, dernn Christianity for tbe partial fatilure o vlew of the war and ganizations that have bel-ped t'a consffl-;e of politics or of the tbink of as at loasi its letter, if n'ai exactlY fallure ut socloîOgy, ~pri.And Lt wou-d ho sil more rasbh IX' mch. What, we mighlt tHie idea'that in the Chrla;tlaniiy of the fUisu the supreme agency can be anything lke a liopoless break erfectIon o! human, Gbrlstlanîty o! the past. ablnets and- alliances And thore le antother tbIng te be bo)rne nldisorganilzatl'an o! by the eritic of Cbrls'tianity. Lt le tlis T lite of ciIllzation? tinity of the past bas operated lu thie M Increasod knowiedge indivlduals, wIth the so-callo regeier-t\u003c\u003e1 os, if we are but ta lifie of the Iudîvidual. it lbas yet ta lie se the croation o! situa- Chrlsianfty may do, or may net do, wlth Wl s oawded ont by the munitie. Ltis by nemens ineon-e1vable tl re not a good dleal to communitles In both the Eansterni and the Ltlous modern science w'arids may ln the noar future go bodllW V-ted derivation ahd Ohrletlanîty as thie law o! life, as tbe law o! a,b\u003eng the lues of a living. Our gireat, ally, Rxissla-callbed byi .? But, a! course, ail an Asiatie barbaris\u003cii, but ln reallty botb an o! institiution-, and and a Wlestern Power-4 a oommiuity tb e one-slded as is tHe w-hole, bas sUill pr'oserved at lea-st -~the ile-) ~t dodng w-bat It eau sacrlficlng and the risen Christ.\" And t-1ii eniber wbat we -have alone thie me-y yet, \"ebine forth\" Ilko Et aving men \"1fiee\", te dis-moud\" t'a the wbhole worid.",
         "THlE COURIER. TH E WA R Y the firet picture at the top of 'this page looks like a combin- a bell, tent and a bride'. veli. UIt la much more useful than either. Led-up figurîe inside la that of a British officer in the Balkans, who lils new form of \"1mosquito-bar\"' in whlch he can sleep 'under a miaximumâ of breeze and a minimum of moaquitoes. 2nl democracy a great'boost. The charming pîcture of the young ,ertainlng soldiere on thie beautiful \"country seat\"' ie an exam- war has brought the people together. Hiniton House,,in Sormer- Ifltry residence of the Earl and Countese Paulett, who made a Orne of it for soldiers, which lt stîli le. The Earl le at the front àl Morse Artillery. Hie two charming children entertain the à oldiers at the front actually look lîke Un large numbers when me in their dug-oute has often been described, but flot so often jpictured. This view of a terrace in Trench-land ie a peculiarly good one; though to the humour-loving temperament of Tommy Atkins it probably fee\u0026s more like a section of cave-man land than it does like Pomander Walk. London, Sept. 24.-Of twelve big Zeppelins which invaded the British Isies last night ta deal death and destruction from the skies, two to-day Iay stark and black masses of steel and aluminum in the little village of Mangold, Essex County. They feil victims of the anti-aircraft defences of London and outlying districts. One came down a flaming torch, as did the Zeppelin L-21, destroyed three ,weeks» ago; while the second, disabled by gunfire, eNfected a landing wl'ich saved the lives of the crew, who to-night are prisoners in England. The crew of the firat raider died in the consuming flames cf their own ship, but they were flot so terribly charred as their predecessors in the L-21.-Despatch. \"One Came Down a Plaming Toroh.' -Gable. 1N",
         "THlE COURIER. WHAT 1 THINK AM net now a domestic servant. Heaven belping me 1 neyer sbalI be one again. 1 ýsay this witb ne feeling of spite againsI mistresses. Who kuows? 1 may be a uitress rnyself somae day in this great country! 1 bave no conipiaints of actual 111-usage te make. But Wben I read that article in last week's Courier on Tiaat Pbantom-tbe Unbired Girl, I feit like writlag to tbe editor and saylng, \"YSou nly know balf tbe problemn.\" That is the trutb. The otber tbalif la only to be learned froin people wbo, like me, bave been servants. In tbe faûtory wbere 1 work tbere are twelve eervant girls, good, experienced girls. Nat oae of us, If w6 can belp l, will ever retu.rn to \"service,\" as lt is called. As a servant I bave earaed frein twelve dollars te twenty dollars a month. In eleven years 1 bave werked ln four iCanadian, bomes. ia one of tbese four places 1 was a parlour-mald. In tbe other tbree 1 was a \"general.\" I bad two splendid mistresses and tiwo bad ones. Bad ones siornetlmes eein te be in tbe m«Jorlty. Lyen ait twelve dollars a meutb 1 saved more, mouey as a servant than I save uew. 1 did net 'work as bard as I work now. But If I arn asked te dhoose between bone.-work and factory- work I cau only say there le albsolutely no eboice to my way of tbinkiug. I feel as tbough I sbould say to every Intelligent girlI see wsbng off somebody'a front stops er anewerîng a front door bell wltbh ber cap en: \"\u003cDo be a weman and qifit that work. Come on down town. Leave the kitchen for those that; have te be tI 1t1\" MIstresses, 1 know, will net lke Vo read tibia, especjally *frein one wbe confesses te hav-bng been a servant. I de ne say It te burt thelr feelings, but because. I bave sympatby witb my fellow work'ers ta domestie service and because tleir case sbould be understeod. T HOUGH I 1euhi myseif \"Miss,\" I arn marrled. iwas bon lu thýe South of England, about thirty years ago, the daugbter of a tenant fariner. Ât feurteen the wlf e of thbe local squire, took me Into ber bouse for training. 1 worked two years for my board, traning and ciothuýng. I was taugbt bow to pollsb bruse, bew te dust, how te sweep and bew to br.lng ln afternon tea to thbe drawiug room. I niarrled at seventeen and went to lîve In London, wbere my busiband was einpluyed as a guard by the London and Soutbwestern. Re died and 1 went into service again at twenty un a Bioosnsbury boardung bouse. In oliber words I was a Bioomsbury slavey. You knew thbe sort. I met a Canadien womau there wbo engaÀged me to corne te Toronto. She sabd e bad neyer seen servants lu Canada wbo could polisb brass as I couid. I worked for her f»' tbree years at tweçlýve dollars a montb. Sha dded and wllledl me an old broch and a book about. the Empire! 1 worked tiben for a groce.r's »wl!e on - Avenue for two years. Thon for a broker's wife lnRosedale for a year and then for the wUte o! a strugglng iawyer. I lo!ft that work for the munition faetory, wbere I now amn emnployed. 1 would xather mies a few meals than ratura eltber to the la'wyer, the broker, the grecer or my flrst Canadien mistrees. As for re- turning Vo England'? No. And fer the h1ghest wage and the best m1stress I1 ever board oue of my friands iu service speak of, 1 would net re.turn te service ln any couutry, nier would anîy coexsetent girl thaï; I bave kown 'wbo as one teted a dIff erent lIvIng. Let me point eut, flrst of aIl, the diff erence between' being a servant ln England and bein'ý a servant ln Canada. I ýthink it may býe useful te Canadlan mis- tresýses wbo are euiploylng old country girls. and 'o old country servants wbo want employment bere. In England, serving la a .profeseo-excellt among the very lowest class o! employers-that teaches botb the, servant and ber inistress tiheir places and guar- antees te eacb of thein tbelr rigbts. In Ç,anada, serv- lug ta net a profe-ssion, but, lu the majorlty o! cases, It is a mere job taken on by people wbo cau only regard theinselves as makesblfts. In Flngland, evan ln the bouses of the very rlcb, a servant works mucb barder than in Canada, and she is compelled te de more tborough and conscientbeus work. But lu Can- ada there la no standard o! training or standard of service. Serving la a kind of work froin wblcb ýwvery servant lu Canada bepes te graduate. Tbut Is n- fortunaýtely, yet !ortunately, not true ln England. Ia England the servant 1-s traied te take e certain pride i ber wo\u003erk and to bave a certain respect frein ber employer. In Canada, she l-ool\u003cs dewn on ber work and la iooked down upon by the employer. Two servants meeting In a moving picture thesitre ln lEngIeud kno\u003ew eue amoliber as servants aad have no0 faIe s hame about IL la Canada, t'we servants 0F MISTRESSE B y A M AI1D meeting ia a moviag picture theatre will bide the fact from one anotbar as long as possible for f ear the other is a stenographer or a clerk and likely te snub tbe more servant. In England the relative positions o!f mietress and mnaïd are more or less fixed. In Canada tie average mistress is one moment lîkely to, be confldlng ber cboiceat gossip to ber maid, and the next moment gives ber the cold shouîder as no Eaglisb miistress wlould ever bave doue. Even the meanest boarding bouse ýslavey in Bloomsbury is allowed a certain persenal sýelf-respect wbbcb is flot guarauteed in a Cunadian bousebold. M Y firsI Canadian mistreso was -a widow whose one aim ln life was Vo live like a grand lady. S.be lVved lu mean quarters eue year in order to bave enaugb meuey to, go to England and travel on the contineut a second year. She bated Canada thougb she bad bean bora somewbere lu Ontarioý the daugbter of an Anglican recter. Wben she braugbt me back witjb ber to Canada It was, appar- ently, witb a vlew Vo na$klng ber borne as mu-ch as possible Ilke an Englis borne o! the saine size. She bult a fence around the ltle front lawn and called lt the area. She bougbt e brase kaocker at an antique sbop, se thait I might pollsb tihetand tbe door- kuebs every mornlng -before seven. Sbe had'a cup) of tea and two Vid slIca of bread brougbt te ber boesde eacb mornlng et seven-tbfrty, and I drew ber -bath--tepdd--at 7.45. She liad an Englisb break- fast and an En.glish lunch and tea at feur-tblrty. 1 noveïr knew ber Vo bave any but one enlier, an old muid with a mangy spaniel wbo came evary second Tbursday and retaled Indelicate storues uuder the guise o! betlug borrbfied. For Ibis one caller we were aliweys 11at home\"' on Tbursdays. ?My xnbtress aïb- horrad the dog. Hoe wbtned on the front door-stap Inside the airea. For amusement we bad a muslc box that must bave coet two bund-red dollars. Once a week I was dIrected to put on the record of the Chines et Norxnandy. That and cburcb once on Sundeay-thbe local Anglican cburcbhwere our re- laxations. My bardest work was dusting a collection of ceral, star-4sb and other strange tbIngs 'w'icb my mistress bed collected ou a Cook's Tour to the Wffst Indies. As slie grew old she becaine deaf and crauky, but she depended on me and 1 dbd what I could for ber. .Servlng ber was mucb like servbng ln England. It was regular, smiootb and easy. TrH E grocer's wife bad heard ef me through ber 1hiusband, with whom we dealt. Wben 1 came la te tell hlm, my mistress was dead and te settle the accolants, ha asked wbat m'y plans were., That nlghVt bis wlfe celled on me. I was puzzled. Frein wliat ebhe sald It was net clear wbetber 1 was te be a con- panbon er a musid. She to;d me ail about ber Illnaseses and ber übldlren. Sbe spoke e! ber occasional mis- understandlngs -witb ber huébaud the grocer. Thougb 1 made IV clear that 1 dld not wlisb ber con- fidences sbe kept ou and I finally accei\u003eted ber off er because thie wa.ge was higher---ebxteen dollars a montb. The grier's bouse vas a pretty place on a resid-euttal strTeet and -I vus given a cheerful ron on the top floor, but the work was net srnootb- runntng as in my irs t place. The grecer had break- ïfast et seven, bis wMfoait eigbt, -and the children- thereï were tour, ages seven, eleven, thirteen and. seventeen-auywbere up te bal! paet eigbt. Tbey ail ate different sorts o! breakfasts. The grocer woi.ld interrupt me on my way Vo and frcin the kit- cben te grumble soineting about the mornlng's uews or Vo comuplein of the weatbcr. His wife never falled Vo begin the day 'w-Ith a recitaitien o! ber eympytos- whRV sbe had suffered durbng the nlgbt froin Ibis pain and th-at. The 4.bildren were alternately sweet, loveable, belplesq, aud abombnally rude and trouble- nuakimg,. Canadian eildren are, as a genoral ruie, rude to-ward servants. Thelr parents, la far tee many cases, sesin ni a loss Vo kuow Just how te teaob the chlld the pesition o! a servant. Oflen the grocer's wife did flot derae te punieb or correct eue o! the chldren fer a more rudenes Vo, a more servant; or aise suhe ran the rbsk o! fI offending me. 1 got accus- tomi2d to tgke ruýde6neqas withenit a.ny remarks, kuiow- ing that theP istress would preasently ha lnting aI apologies. In that bouse it wes sonetimes, she tibat cooked and soimetimes 1 that cookad. Whatever I dld «ho was cAertain te lnterfer-e wlthin l some way, sooner or later. IV was muet !rorn any deslre te be hateful, ,but f rom a certain mnda for giIng advice. In PIng- lan\u003ed, a woman with sucb a mania w0uld have res'trained berself from -venting it 01n vants. Thougb I did flot lîke the grocer'5 got to be a sort of secret counsellor of beJ was a woman who craved anxieties and wO.ý wben she slaw notblag to worry ber. She to die of malnutrition, anemia-or someth that. S'be died of fatty clegeneration of tbi The grocer's s1ster came to look aliter buý She was an unpleasant woman. 1 gave nIti The braker's wife wais one of the neWlYT- the fuany papers make sio much fun of, know wby \u0026Hi newly-ricb people sbeuld be D of. 1 su!ppose it is the double jealousy botwE and the people who have a1waye been rict people wbo, neyer -wil be rich. But if mIy ployers had moiney it was because tbey des have onMeY. Tbey lcnew how to handle Il way of tbinking, and they 'weren't vulgar- so, 'vulgar as plenty o! the oldest and w fiamilles in Engl*and aire. We bad a cook, en niaid and a ýparlovur-miaýld ini the ýbraker-s 1 was parlourmaid, and tbougb youa would n 1 bad mucli to deo my mnistrea-s soneb.oW -Ma keep me busy. I think shie w-as as close VO ideal bouse-manager as I ever heard 00b bad been a bookkee'per in the office wbere band bail learned the brokerage business. been a paîrcel.iwapper -in -a blg sliop bef aigain. She told me that wben I was ea she was glýving me advi'ce about how to gel in Oaiaada. Yet she hadl a bottex malnle] servants than many a woman. wbo bas b*eeD UV among thein. She didn't give orders a' she was addressImg the ýscuin of the eart inexperenced mistresses think tbey must 81 way to show how mucb botter they are tbaI1 vaiit--nei-tber was she easy-goin-g Ilke e w1bo are afraid te gIve orders to their awXI S 0 many womf n-especially ln t'bs co'Dt k)take the trouible to say what they meau clear. Tbey use balf4nifslhed iseptences tbey are at a lom for a word they keeP wltb, \"You. know whait 1 mean? You Ieio'w seirt of thig muddles many a servant, eSP it ls a youmg and tlmid s3ervant. But Mn never dl\u003ed Vbat. It 6eemed teome thiat slie 114 menced te speak until she knew what sh, te, say, and had the words chosen. The\" quietly and delàiboeely. Only a very stug could have iiÈsunderstood ber. Sbe wý patronizng and neyer fr'lendly. She treats' vants as tbough tbey were fe, ow-weorker5- plIsin'g certain work every doy. She manager. Beyond their work she requie and \u003cfurtherniere she madle certain heure and s\u0026W' that thosç hours were strictY e Werk began et seven ln the morning atid 1 tili aine eat nigbt wïtbh certain rest b'ours Ir and certain afiternoons and evenil off. rema.ned laite, her busband or she bers\u003e the doore for thein. If sotbing wa;sima ulgbt it wae ber rule net Vo disturb thv 91 It could possîbly be bedped. The oervants food--not scraps and Ieft-overs-and uir meals. Thou«b we worked bard and larid' exacting eye, we were coutented. 1 admît that It was a wealitby employer' able to, treat servants that way. and I adl14~ this kind of service Is much dIfferent f\" less uretenitious bousebolds. But I want t\u003cc that ;people of modest or even ealal nO1 live much more Soonrtaibly and evna Wlt pense if tbey orgaized tbe werk* o! the 8 routine, and If tbey pla=ied to ailoth time for nieals, for unbroken sleepaeud fer T The broker and bis wife went te Europe\u003e the war, and 1 engaged Iu the bouse Of thlnklng to return te the broicer's -Ife returned. But the war camne and ber iusbi the Iml\u003eerlal1 Army and bis w1fe remne~~ lanêý-and 1 remalned w1th the lawyer auild S.he vuse a large, florid woen, wbos!0 4ý tien wae dinner. The bnsiband was a dys] a bad manager finaaiclally. Tbey wasted than would have f ed sanotb.r taanly tlw1c Ne mne Item of food ever caie tfwlce tO Even a buge turkey minus only a Ieg and\u003c off the bre ' mt wae banlshed to my cuPI~ evenitually 'thTrown away or given te 5ce Even tbat 'was agaliet tie la;w éof tbat ho I t1htnk the lawyer's 'w1fe toek a -prIde il to thirow thIngs\\Lway I ife warrted. tD",
         "THE COURIER. and ignorant woiaan. It was mny rule ln Lake, as fiew changes as possible, s0 1 eudured k as long as porssible. Then I 'beard of an in a munfftion faotory and I took it. 1 Want to set down just as plainly aispossible one for saying I'd ratheïr be a char-wonian w'n4town office building than a \"'general for farnily,\" or \"parlour-mald\" lu Rosedale. Y siPeakinig, housework is the bar.dest work \"OrId, because It ls the least sye.temaAce work ý'rd-asf a rule. 1 admit that a man wboe Y hazd-.and-fast routine all day long hbas a reljaxaition in bis bouse. And it's true you il a bouse like a ol'ock. But lihousands of es Would 'be sh.ocked if tbey knew ho-w mach 'Iafortable tbey could make thed~r men-folk blouses did run Ilie clock-work! And tiiey B ebocked to kinow how nearly like a elock l'un a bouse-if you want to try. Everybody, hat if you caz get Into a habit of doing hings at certain Urnes you sa-ve mental weajr and tear. If You dlon't-if every plece of household detail bas, as it were, to take a chance on getting your attention just w-len it can-it takes just rhat mucb more out of you. Ganadian mistresses tend to neglect housebold organdizatian and to depend upon sudden bursts of energy or upon \"turning in to help\", Vo overcolue -accumulations of work. fours are irregular. Recreation perlods for 'the servant are too often grudgingly given. The servant gets 'ber meals-beaven knowe wben or bow. Most of the time she just shoves bacli the dirty dishes from a corner o! the kitchea table, drags up a chair and makes ber meal-well, about as comfortably as the family dog. The servant is mnade res-ponsible for the cat, the baby and the parot-and yet rebuked for exercisng a.ny authority over any of them. Her work is likely to be interrupted uit any moment by the mIstress, who happens to feel 'Iblue,\" or loneiy, or tiaikative. Or else the miîstress vents ber \"uervous- ness\" on the inaid-or maintains 'aughity silence. Only a girl of poor spirit--and therefore o! poor brain-power and no inýitiative--wll wonk for the average wornan in a bouse. Business women learu business rnethods. A man may bully you. He may even swear, but he leaves you aione so long as your work is satisfactony. You have dieflim-te hours and definite tasks. Your meal bours are fIxed. And tbougbý your net income may be less, you at least bave the feeling of paying for your meals-not just takIng wbat happens your way. Another thing, as a servant vou have no social standdng of! any sort whatever. G'anbage coîllectors, ragm-en, bar-bers and undertakers bave tbeir place in the social scale, anti tbey bave thein fun amongst tbemselves. But ser- van-ts are rag-tag and bob-tail. Many a girl 1 know doesn't iow what Vo, do with ber afternoon off w-hen she gets it. Sbe goes to tbe movies and buys a dieli of ice-cream for ber supper and goes Vo another movie. If I w-as a ni'cb woman I'd give the money to start a school for the training o! mistresses. Tbat is my view. But of course you wou't agree witb it-unless you were once a domesti. y DE PARK 1N WAR TIMFB Main Johnson recently spent sev'eral weeks in England, Scatland, Jreland and France. He went as Pijoale Secreiary te N. W. Rowell, Liberal Leader in Ontario. He went le Europe vith his pores open; eager for Impressions, wilh a sort of psyclaological idea of cor- relaing themn. He brought back malerlal enough for a book--which he nill neyer irite. The article Hyde Park in War Time he n'role on shi:board. He slmply couldn'l help il. The impressions had Io be expressed.-Editor. RPFIOIALLY, ait any rate, London la 'Ch More normal dunlng the war t-han B Would exipeet It to be-veny much Schainged, for example, than Paris, wbicb Ii41y -transformed, externaily as well as in- One of thbe famllar slghts In London, look- LBfOre-the-war days, is the group of speakers \"Mes in Hyde Park, tibat gatbering ground Uocracy. nefer ta specially organized. meetings, like uIc eue rece'ntly held by trades union mem- 'otest against the higb cosit of living duning although tibat, too, lùi its black mass o! iits fenvld tribunes shouting from a n-um- atfrmwas In cànformlty -wlth similar eetInge he.ld before the war. ;greater Inter-est, bowever, is ta, ta-ke a bus \"a the Savoy on a quiet week-day ai'tennoon, )ugh Hyde Park, and dîsimouat ac the 'eh ait about bal past live, wben shop-girls and1 weorkin-gmen andi w-omen on their way P lngered ta, hear the orators In the Park. eMarbie Ar-oh entrante, on this atternoon, five distinct groupa, eaeb wltb its speaker. )ne la a woman, witb a kind but faded face, bound UV under ber bat; she ls working y Wilb ber watcb-cbain, an aperation wbîceh Iy stops the flo'w of ber discourse entlrely. alding on a very sniall andi insecure table, 4er balance witb precarloue oaT ety. ,ryivng to arrange a week-end excursion for ecl\u003ele to a seaside town, in order, accordi'ng st appeal, tbat tibese workingmen and MIen, eibausted -by the too constant strain ,1Ik, mnay secure a brie! respite, and, after- ieb~eckflcg 'becme more andtimore poiutea l ordler tihat -thbe excurslonIsts may give Oa hcopltal full ofpoor wounded Tommies I be 8o glati to see thein. ave I realized .how beartless anti nelentiess ýckling canl be. Suob a speaker lu Canada, 1 imaagne sucb a speaker in Queeu's Park, le, Would prebably receive a quiet, e-;en If earlng. In Hyde Park, however, the crowd quiet nor bored. Ail kinds of! people join lklingn0t only \"!fresh\" youths and ar-gu- 9 elc -men, but young girls net more than yea.rs elti, and respectable married womnen, eolcentwth e:ir fifty years of boueur- Poor woman-speaker miseraible, and yet, e l, the Hyde Park -psychology, these dis- 'Obably Telt that tbe erator would Teel she -ere unlnterrupted, and, truly enough, 21Y would bave cousitiereti ber reamarks in ha4 not, stinreti up a starm. Illest points ln the discourse wrere seized torn and rent into raga. A violent alter- i»'1ed between the speaker and 'a yeung 8- ta tbe amouni of the regular ralway Waterloo Station ta the seaside resei't, and, Ys the case lu matitiers affecting transpor- lI'YOne ëbad a perfectly dedlite kno-wledge 'It since so-and-se had goeie tibere on the 1b0Ilday te see their motber's aunt, we 111 with worrylng o-ver tbe 'wur, and some y M AI1N JO0H NSO0 one el-se, oun qui-te a different -but equai-ly sad mission, -bad founti t-be fane much biglier tihan tbe uepbew declareti it was. What relieveti the bItterness o! eacb o! thbe con- flicts was theïr transitonineas. Concentration is net t-be outstanding trait eitben o'! Hyde Park speakers or listeners, and thbe topice under discus-sion sbifted as o!ten and as regulanly as the clouds kept glid-ing above thbe green trees o!f the Park anti above thbe w-biteness o! thbe Marbie Ar-ch. F ROM thbe question o! tbe proposed excursion, w-lhicb w-as the real \"raison d'etre\" o! this group, thbe ta-k sblfted te the \"colonies\" and who among thbe crofwd hati travelleti there, Vo, thbe national panentage o! tibe Royal Tamly, and Vo w-bat s'heuld be done w-ith thbe Kaiser. \"I'd knock -hlm dowu 'witb my fist,\" sbouted the orater, v-be rousti hack ber coat sleevs Tram rat-ber a patfletlcally alimand delicate w-rist, but who by the same heiligereat action, uniteti a-Il -ber beaners for once, and drow-ned out becltling la a pleasant roar o! approbation. Iu thbe mitdile o! thbe next grolip, a veny sati and palnfu.lly thin young man, holding a Bible In bis hanti, w-as trylng ta unite a anost pesMilstie mien anti voice w-ltb encouraging doctrines. 1TaIR o! religion, bayever, dees net grant im- m-unity Tramn beckllng, and a dîsputative, cro'wd, hostile on t-be wiboie, surgeti a-bout t-be pale and Ill- i-ooki-ng young man. HIe w-as able te ecune tolerabiy goad order,. bowever, until sudde'ly be, founti a most unfortunate verse, t-be reading o! whlih almos-t pre- cipitateti a riot, anti swept aw-ay the young man in an Indignant swinl o! -buzan beinga, -pramient am-ong them a tail, burly soidier, car-rying a wme, Tnig'tened ginlie iu bis arma. I baven't a concordance w-ltb me (on shiîpboard), anti I can't guarantee ta quoite t-be passage verbatli, but the gist a! it w-as t-ils: \"Soldiera, do no violence, and labourera, be content w-itb your w-ages.\"1 These tv-o exhortations apparently w-ens the most un-popular ones he possily coulti bave eelecteti. Ri-s audience was iargely made u-p o! soldiers andi w-ork- lugmen, andi the Mdea, to the firet clas, o! not daiug violence, w'biob t-bey interpreteti as the supreme beterodory and passivismn, anti t-be tbought ta the second o! the economnie ludi-crousneas a! -belng con- tent w-ltb your wages, wsre qulte intolerable, anti bowis, cat calis andi execrations closeti uip tbat group once for ail. 'rbere w-as no need te go homne, how-ever, for just a ew yards aw-ay, an Indian sergeaut, brown and humble, w-as offerlng up a prayer before a number of slgn -bearda, tacketi te a tree, aud anounclng \"W-Vest, London Mission,\" 'and carrylng sibete o! hymne ln large letters. The Intian w-as maklng az impas- sioneti prayer for the redemptlon of t-be v-orid and al people in 1t, a prayer of t-be simple and earnest kInd, 'w'blch one assmdcates -witb an eaily type clans meeting. Qu!te close te the Ind4lan, a mrnch ss so-othing sud %Impîse-proceeding was golng on. lu the centre of a nolsy greup v-as a man v-h, ait the age of five years, accordiug tû bis own N story, had -been a-truek in thbe ey\" w-lUi a tin mug. Thie bat da.maged bis eyesigbt, and now, elowly -but inevita;bly, -be was going blind 'w--th tbe graduai comlag of cataracts. HIe wore heavy black-rinmed. glusses, and, in -bis nervousuese, kept interrupting -bizseif to ebeut \"keep quiet\" te an un- T or'tunate spectator i-n th-e front row, a mani a trifle \"queer\" and on thbe verge of St. Vitus' dance. Tbe man w-ho wua tuninng blind w-as engaged in a 'bitter, cheerleas argument w-ltb a soft, domestic- *looking v-orkman, w-ho loft-ly claimeti that ail! dis- ease came eitber from ignorance or transgression. Dispute swinled and aswayed about Vhis pair, but ail thbe time thbe tragle principal kept Siwinging the talk back to bis old subject, andi -kept asklng w-betber 'bis accident with the tin mug witb the broken bandie came elther frozu ignorance on transgression. \"I suppose you'll be saylng,\" lie chidei bis antagouist, scornfully, \"that I was a beso-tted drunkard at five years eld. Transgression, iindeeti!\" 7%he leader o! thbe next group 'was an extraordlnary looking m-an, o! the kind onle sees ln Europe, but only dreams or reade about ln Caaada--types wbic-b we meet in Dickens, for example, and still see lu the streets o! London, or nead about in Zola, aud stili see on the boulevards of Paris. T 18 elti patniaroli, w-earing a w-bite Indian sun- bn-t, w-as a most feroclous lookîng gentleman, wltb bain growing frozu ail parts o! -bis face, fore- bead, 'nose and cheek-bouea, as well as frozu the more ordlnary sources, andi withl a long 'beard bang- ing down below bis waïst. fis obief opponents w-ene a Jew and a combative iooklu-g labourer, apparently au Iron-mroulder. It w-as qulte a lon-g time before I couiti catchi even the drift of thbe dlscussion--somatblng about air comiuig and going, about someone being luside vast bollers, 'beat and coId, berror and mystery. Gradually there emergeti from. tbe confusion a sIngle andi con- sistent idea-cl-garettea. Thbe Jew w-as smoi\u003ekng one and thbe olti man evldently consldered the -habit a cardinal sin. Now Tollow-ed a long blological dis- cussion as -ta smoking among animais, anti gradualy there appeared tbe main taplc of the tiebate-bheil. The links ieadlng up ta the central tapic w-ore ne more. remnankable than the steps w-hici Toiiowed, i-n a course o! logic apparently accepted by the crowd, -but incomipreheusible Vo a mere Moutreaien or Wln- nipeggen. Th'e disputants w-ere soon back again ta animals--so bi-g t-bat they cou-ldn't pass betweeu trees, and birds hlgber t-ban the tops o! the high trees lu thbe Park, «\"wîtb beada on top o!t tilat!\" Inceredulity succeeded attention, and thbe descent again was made ta A.vernus. Andi ail thbe tIme, w-hile the wamau taiketi about an excursion, te thbe sea-elde, wile thbe sick youtb exhorteti bis hearers ln vain agalust violence and discontent, whbile the Indlau sergeant prayed a Western prayer, w-hile the man doemoed-te.sbe-biud ven-ted bis -bittemness, and , the -balry gentleman ssalled clgarette-a--«l t-he w-hile the aufruated, life o! Hyde Park.In v-ar time pulsed on-underueath ane ef t-bose glorlous skies whicb would relleve e-yen a drabbor elty than LoondSg o! an Incurable greynesn",
         "THIE COURIER. *1.? W HEN Cyrus Pincer, ny fourtli boss lu vépestolic succession, sumnmoned bis bauds te a 4,hreshiug-bee, la 1883, lie knew that lie was about te metaphorlcally skn B3111 Tromklng, the thresher-mn. This wns a feat that very few mon hiad ever accomplished, even in a amalldegree. Boss Piucher idid it muet scientlfically thie year lie liad me in his employ. Toinkins knew ,the Innate cussedunesàes of the commuiiities round about Jericlie as nobudy else did, except tle parsons aud the steer-buyers. But lie didn't comprehend the guile of Cy, Piucher, wlo began te scheme for tbis threshlng-bee igamble away iback lu early July, w'ben we started tei Iaunl the hay. That year was a fat one en Cy's f arm. lie neyer lad puer crops exceptinl dreuili years. lu 1883 lis -or I used te say our-hlay weut twu, tons te tne acre; wlieat, 30 bushels; 'oats, 45; barley, 40. Wlhen we stare hauldng lu hay te lis bar-n I had ne Idea cof the loug-lieaded scheme that was aiiaplng up* under hie last year's straw liai; the ruse by wblch lie came out aliead un the threshing deal nt least $5.50, wbich In tliose days wns a big win. We had ten acres liny, twenty-uue wlieat, fourteen oats, seven bnrley. We lad no patient couiraptIluis for laullng the trop. EveryihIng then was land- harvested. We lad nu liay forks, rwheai-sllngs, hay- loaders, tedder-nut-hing more sophlstlcated than a clumsy lay-rake, three igood three-tined ýpitcli!urks, oue fuur-tltned bardey ferk, a good liay-rack and Cy Pincher's undefeatable brain. Iu the liay-tiýme 1 pitâhed on, Cy loaded. lie was a gireat loader. Cy piched off. I moie away. lie lad nu boys. Therefore. Cv expeuded ail lis failier- hed on me. And the way lie tauglit me to mow thai hay couvlucedi me thai lie was elther crazy wlth the ýheat or lie had some deep, dark sclieme up the place on bis fuzzly aims wlere the shirt- eleeves used to lhe. \"Keep ',er stacked up front o' the mow, Jake,\" sys lie, pausing te relleve une sîde of bis nose wLth oue tînurb on the other. \"Iiew so?\" Inquire I. \"'Becuz,\" spat lhe. 'It tatkes en uld crook te keteli a separater gang.\" Whereby I twigged his meanlng. The ton acres o! hay that weut into sald barn was to 1001 as thougli it went hli Up) te tho leam in oue sIde of the mow. Whereas tIare, was a cave be\u0026hlud the bay where several loa'ds o! wlieat lay lu anibu.li. Understaud, tlerefore, that wiien we hauled In the 21 acres of wheat thero was a very large cavern behlnd the laay parapet th-at tle mind of nu tIreshe- man ever conelved. Seven overbullt loads Cyrus packed ie that mrow, plously Icneeliiig on each sbeaf as 1 whopped It te hlm froni tle waggon tilI ho lad tleni heads up as conclsaly as sardines lu a tin. Cyrus was a master at this kiud of space ecunoimy. That was because God lad been very economical wben ho p\u003eaeled su many poteutialitles into one sinall corporation called Cyrus. Clearly now froin the barn floor no man could have surmised that there was aisheaf of Wheat in that mow. \"Tliat's seven loads to the good, anyhow,\"1 quirked lie. \"I guess Bill Toinkins wunt flgger on thein in bis estlmates.\" And hoe cliuckled tili one fang tooth showed ln great wisdom. (Cyrus neyer did thin.gs iby halves. Ho seemed to have put lu his grain wlth the express purpose of packlng that barn se scientifically. lie even fore- casted the bulk of his crop su 'well that lie decided to build a wheat-stack on the south side of the barn- door bridge. \"Wliy so?\" I Inquire, greenly. \"'Becuz,\" lie an\u0026wered. \"I want to top the straw- stack 'with wheat straw and this stack'll be about the last thing thraslied.\" By the turne the 'barley was ready the wlieat was settled more than a foot. The Ibarley wen-t to the rof on one side right on top -of the wlieat. Cyrus erawled under the rafters like a squirrel. As long as there was a crack of daylight lef t lierammed lu a sheaf. Then une day It rained just before oat liarvest, and iCyrus betook himself slleutly up the post ladder te the peak. There for over -an hour he mnade about as mucli noise as the -rain on the roof digglng up barley sheaves froin one iside and crarmIng themn In at the other wliere the barley lad settled away from the rafters. That loft a goud-slzed cave on one side: whici lie skilfully filled rwith a sinail field of la-ter ibarley. And we stifl had the oats to ipack in, fourteen acres. A\u003cbout ten acres 'went in on top of the stable and granary, crainful to the rouf. Cyrus squinted up at the rafters, and went up to spread out scaffold poles over eacho nd of the thresh- lng-floor beamn to beam. Reoin tliere normally for about tliree loads. Barely xnanaged to crowd the four acres lu. The last load took a whole hour to pitc'h off and mow away. The old mnan jammed the sheaves In su tiglit thnt 1 thouglit lie would break down the scaffold. -\"Say, Jake,\" lie remarked, wlien the last load was up. \"I dunno as I ever seen a bar-n o' tliat size that lied sicli a lieap o' grain in 'or. Didju?\" \"Neyer,\" saiid LI. T'here ain't room for even the swallows?\" Then we went plo-wing for fali 'wheat and cuttting Clover ueed. A LL this -was ffprellminary te the bise. Iu these days a thresllng ontfit 'was as mucli of a spectacle on the road as a fire reel Is on -a City street. Bill Toinking had the only englue and separator lu at least six concessions and five side-roads. If ever %we heard at sev en a,m. a llttle high-poup whistle ecliolug over the huali lots we kuew It was Bil1l Tom- kins' engine. 13111 was the lord and master of al tlie farmers. P4,rom late summer untIl snow-fly lie m'ade them ail wait for hlm and tal\u003ce hlma when lie Came along and haul im from barn to barn beonse lie bad no teain of lis ew-l, saylng te any protester, l'Holy macklnaw, I aln't runnlng, nu horsepower. This le a steam rig, boss.\" 'Bill uncondltionally refused to wagte time golug back over the samne rond. \"Take me Monday week after uext, or you wunt * get me for a montI,\" lie told Cyrus Piudher, who, being busy with seeding and picking api ferred to wait for two weeks. \"By gobl\" says Cyrus, explicitly, \"1witli t twang of lis, \"Ill ýtake yeli.\" That was after dark one Saturday evefli D-i11 was driving homei lu is ýbuggy for over They took a lantern and trailed away to \"How Jel wanta do it-day, bushel, er jet Cyrus. Big William gazed up by the light of thi at the cobwebbed cricket-chirpiflg mows. \"This barn's pretty near full, ain't she, growled over his çwhiskers. \"Pretty near,\"; drawled Cyrus, cliewiflg ràtalk. e. Bill was a master band at slzlng UP Being a bit of a gambler lie preferred ta contracts at se mucli for the job. Pour lia farmers with slirunken whoat lie alwaYs aday. The average job lie did by the i cents for wheat, tiwo and a hit for bar. cent and a hlf for oats. \"Take 'er by the bushel,\" lie said. \"Nope,\" snid Cyrus. \"That ain't sport. Bill said, '9Slxteen dollars.\" After a cogltatory pause, Cyrus replled \"Wlnuthin like playin' safe, Bill1. a go\", And lie neyer let on by even a wlnk lie liad Bill Toinkins fooled to tlie eyebrc S ATURDAY evening Cyrus went dowr alînter tlie machine. Man ibelow 1 separator; Cyrus drove tlie englue. W;itb -clatter the gang liauled the separator !nt( with Bill1 Toinkins steerlug it up tlie brul tongue. Thlen tliey set the englue wlieii drove, because lie knew to anincli JuS north or south to get the drive wlieel tO witli the pinion on the end of the cylincdf A good part of Sunday nfternoofl I sPeý the barn just gazIng at tliat miglity silen that for -weeks 110W I liad board moan1iig bush lots, and out at the engine that 11 more marvelous than thie separator. It 'Wý wonderful,« this 'higli-geared business of tl st'eam power. I had beeu at tlireshulige 1 neyer one se big as this of ýCy ilce could bardly wnit tll daybreak te watcb wood te the firebox 'while, I bauled lin, W1ý stone-boat and a pack of old rails tbat pected te ch-op Into cordwood lengths. Tiiet was te be my idhore-wood an was lioping Cy would give me 'a chance the mow, 'w'er.e aIl the young tîgers we out on the stack nmong the patrlarcli5' rather have carried boxes te the bins; lie cal'ated It 'would keep me pretty bil and water and we'd need lots e! both job was dune or lie missed is guesS. By seven a.m., after a round Of M'WilI gang w'as ail on the scene; four lu the Il envled those four!-sx ion the strawe barnyard 'where I had lielped Cy bail 111 I remember ia-vIng lheard soe plctur' fane remarks frein the niow lands as't theinselves Into, the openîngs left bY tbe 1 tics of Cy Pîneher, wliom tliey golJblaXfla darned and otlerwlse trented te cOranPOU wantlng te kn\u003cew, \"The o ld son of a seacook; dues be is a coon-hunt or a thrashlng? Oh liOw",
         "THE COURIER. 1 the rafters!\" Sd'yeh want'm, Barney, butts forward er býid?\" iOu bancicutter-man, better git a baspbail ait tili we start rollin' down this barley - 7'1il git ýbariey-beards the wrong way down Onlest Injun, Charlie,\" said one ýwith stage 1 surveying the entire barnful, \"this here Do full fer utterance.\" 3 limae Tomkins had the ibelt fiapping. It Irve-lous mornIng. Probably nobocly enjoyed ýsting day as much as 1 did. I -could see e business. Every li-me 1 hauled a stone- i of old rails 1 could see how the quartette 10-w were tearing holes in the barley alorI. dr'ove the old mare to the bouse well for a rrel or water I could see thow th1e old 01f Cy ia the slrawstack gang were laylng diay's work. Cy always believed in taking rakers, because ît was the dirtiest job at a 'and rurthermore, I Ttne-w that he had an to business. At the head of th1e rakers îvas Place a man could see when a grain of ninute was coming -up in the chaif. And Cy to observe tChase now-and-then grains of noon'speil everybody forked food into him- as much gusto as é1e had forked sheaves ' t'the barn. BIR hirauseif and bis partner ,silned fried pork, roast be, potatoes,, tur- lkled, beets, chowchow,' home-made fresh ewvIY-c'hurned butter, apple-sauce, pumpkin \u003e-lcookies, and each three slalhering cups say lhey consumed these things one and d'hote, -a la, carte and carte blanche right ElstIlke a Pair of cobras, and I listened to Of the gang without a word of ýcomment. the rest of the -outfit were assimilating pie Pýete were out at the machine. Pete took a ler 11he separalor, oiling up and scrutinizing es and the rakers and th1e bearings of the Peering down into the teeth of the tbing 811e Wvas ýgood and-hungryfor the afternoon's Wil flung in wood and gave his whistle a Short, sharp poops. Y'r shirt awn, Bill,\" I heard Cy growl. quarter to one sheaves were going through rOre Cy, having his hogs te feed, manlaged Up1 to his post of censorship at the rakers. 'getting tuned up. He knew by the music tS.chine whether the grain vwas tough, if it Lis, Whether the sheaves were well bound ty nmuch of a size. t111 four o'clock ýthe engineer Atibled very el lked my nice diry rails and the soft water ý\" foamed ln th1e boler. ýaYs 1, proudly, every now and then. \"Cy koshow to arrange things. Cy's a good BaiLi Bill, as he fiung open the roaring fire- ~\"Re lis thal.\" qtas like as not he'll pay you cash on the nilIte you're done th1e job.\" le's got th1e long green, has h1e?\" NVikIe. We sold a steer last week.\" eele to malte Bill beam. more than usuai, '0 'hat 'when 1Cy rammed bis fork-handie ralkers and threw off the drive-belt, he said MXore saricastic than, 011e Your- olLi peit! What In th1e Sam Slceof the barn, as Bill stopped the anle 'the uncompromising squeak of th1e old -thrown'--over.-swhea--ee.\" (IRarned aid liar,\" said Bill, as '1e helped 'ln the bell again. \"Ail th1e wheat we're 01 that stack Cy Plncher c'd put ln 'is eye.\" \"\"y 1, \"but il takes a lot to MI1 Cy's eye the whistle blew for supper, Tomnklns took lit\" t2he barn. H1e eaxplored the wheat ýmow Iav 1 ould 11ear him rust1ing about there lcO- at a strawstack. When he came out 'ýiUlPer I observed a hostile glimmer in bis '11Ploke never a word at eupper-table. H1e ke R horse. Andi he was usualiy the joliiest anY threshing gang. 'W atch1ng him. M1e kne\u0026w that Bill had hl c'herne. The sheaýf-gang knew also. 1 sllpeoted ail aicsng there was some\u003ethlng udbesides the dust. te 'bauds were gettiug \u0026ack to the straw- t~he mlow, and Bill had fired UP ready 10 81 the engin ser confronted each other '\"Cy,\" says Tomkin-s, \"lhere's a haîf a day's work in that job yit.\" \"How so?\" gro-wled Cyrus. \"You ýknow it. Look at th1e strawstack. Why ain't 'ou drawin' il in faster?\" \"Oh sbe's goin' een fat enough.\" \"Damu your bide, you toi' me that mow was ail hay hair up to th1e bea.m,\" denoted Bill. \"I said no sech a durn-rool thing,\" insisted Cy. \"I merely hisita the lantera and says, says I, 'There's the hay.' You says, 'So 1 see-must a' hed a thun- derin' \u003ecrop o' hay.' And I says, 'It wuz the biggesl crop o' hay I ever had.' But 1 neyer -toi' you th1e hay filied haîf o' that mow. You jumped at the idee like a big green bass te a worm on a book.\" Bill was so angry h1e just started the engine to drown his words. The machine roared again. H1e snid half at me as he whanged rails mbt the firebox, \"Dy ginger, the res.t o' that wheat's goin' inta thal separator hell bent rer 'lection.\" HJ E held a conrab with Pete, solemniy agreeing t0 il put l'hat wheat through berore the gang quit. Bill 'vas te take tura-about at th1e feeding. The run commeinced iwhen Pete .took his next shirt at the cylinder. Frcm the glare of his orba at the sheal'-gang they knew that it was now or neyer. The mow became iiteraliy a live thing. The sheaves leaped out of it like a flock of sheep over a fence- rail. -They buried theý band-cutter and àmade a geyser ef straw round about Pete, who had the knack or cramming the maw of that machine at double ,,peed without choking the cylinder-though once in a w'hule fromt so.me thundering big shear bouad by Cy from a fence cradle-swath round a stump the spra tor gagged and groaned and slowed down, Not a peep came front Cyrus at the rakers, away up there above th1e roof of the barn grimly heaving the ýstraw that came up at him in a sea. And I knew that if so much as a grain of wheat a minute ciipped -him on the overalis 'he 'would -have stopped the machine. But il was a fine separalor, Pete and Bill were the two greplest feeders in.u Jerichoiand, and Cy's wheat was in -prime condition. The threshers bad ail the odds on them. And w.ben 'wall-eyed Bill got Up to feed and Pete came down in the dusk like a god of grime for a suck at the waýter pail the -mow- men were down be-hind the hay and -the evenlng.was closing ln. The lussie became t10 me at the engine, uow a struggle of supermen. Neyer had Ibere been such a threshing contract in that settiement. Bill To.mklns said neyer a word nowi to me. H1e handled that en- !rine as though il had been a siege gun. H1e rammed \"'Durn your hidel you toi' me that hay went haif way Up to the beam.\"l 'Il said no s1ch a fool thinef i hoids up the Ian- tern and i says, says 1, 'There's the hay.' 'Ves,' saya you, 'muet had a thunderIn' crop.' Il hed a as blg a crop o' hay as ever I had,' saya 1. And you bit Ilke a big green basa on toý a worm.\"l lu wood and kept th1e 'waler gauge well up In th1e glass, let off steamn now and tben and keDt th1e pres- sure lu the \u0026.auge Up around th1e 100 mark as steady as a towu clock. It was 10 me one of th1e great, sublime moments in life, 'when men flig tbemselves lnt sacrifice for th1e sake o! princîple. Looklg. at il lu t11e hight o! experience, 1 know no.w that old. Cy Plucher was a coltl-blooded old crawfssh that was doing bis best to jew Týomkins out of a few dollars; and that Bill anci Pete were a pair of rambunking roughnecks who would have jammed Pincher's wheat through butts first without regard t0 how much grain wemt out on the s'tack if Cy didn't watch them. But thal wasn't th1e way I reit about it, as 1 leaned on the water- barrel by th1e engine. To mie Cy was a clever, auda- clous oid crank who deserved t0 beat Tomkins if he could, and Bill was an honest great thresherman ,who wns entitled to do the same. te Cy. For ýthe sake of Bill ail the sheaf-men wouid have kepl at il tli the iast sheaf was ra.mmed througýh. For the sake of Cy even those rbeumatic old -heads of familles on the strawstack would stick t0 il tli midnignî if need be. That spirit of seif-obliteratlon was the greal thing. The mnen themselves made il so. They were a grori- fied pack of great performers whose efforts 10 do th1e big thing made the lthrob of the oid engine and th1e raucous roar of th1e big separalor sound Ilke 1the mnusic of the ,spheres. Whenever Bill or Pete got up 10 feed they seemed like, greal artists who could neyer malte a slip. Elîher of them couid have fed Ihal separator blindfolded. Each of thema knew th1e sound of good threshing, as greal singers know Iheir songs., Ail that spoiled my perfeot joy in 1the epie ,was 1the fact that I had nolhing t0 do but keep haul- ing waler, for there was now plenly of wood te finish th1e job. Every lime Bill came down froin 1the machine he was covered with the grime of godhood te me. 1 know 11e.was a commonpiace old spoopea- dyke. 1 thought 'then he was a hero. Pete was another. The men in 111e shbadows of 1the mow were ail heroes; the man carrying boxes, th1e olLi patrlarchs on 111e straw, the dry old skinfiinl aI 1the rakers away up Ihere aI th1e peak of a mighly strawstack la 111e moonlight, shuffling aI the slraw-yes, even the engine and the separator lhemselves were great, ,superhumanized beings Ihat should have been 8ung about-la Homeric legends. Suddenly there was a- wiidcat w-hoop from 1the di.4st of t11e dusky barn where 1the mow-men worked by the ghimmer of th1e inoon through -the cracks. \"By jingo,\" I gasiped, 10 oid Bill, \"lthey've got that humr empty.\" I whooped for joy as 1 saw tbem comne ouI of 1the dust, . sa-w somebody heave a, ladder te the wheat- stack oulside, ,three young panthers covered with dust dlean 10 1the last lobe of their-lungs go sky- larking up 10 1the peak as f resh as a young bull moose In 111e dew of the dawn. One stayed on th1e bridge 10 pitch on 1the table. Down came 111e sheaves lu 1the light of th1e moon-whop-whop on te th1e bridge. In vent more rails rarmmed halo t11e fire-box; more sparks fiew from 1the smokestack; t11e englue shook and t11e belt whistied and th1e big separutor sang like the sons of the mo'rning. \"Oh, Lord!\" sald I t0 my-sel!. \"I'm nolhlng but a hump on a log. Great Jeru-salem!\" AMID ail t11e magic I r-as miserabie. I was unfit P1te be counted. 1 was nothing but a hewer o! wood and a drawer of waler. 1 knew now that Bill Tomklns was goîng t0 finish t11e job and tbat o14 Cy Plucher had determined 10 keep bis face closed and let hlm, even though 11e fiung away lhree bus-hels 0f wheat ln th1e ohaff for th1e cows 10 eat. Maybe 111e stack was bal! cbewed Up by 1the ma- chine when 1 crept away from th1e engine round 10 th1e barnyard where 1the strawstack towered Up la 1the moonlighl like a strange new pyramid witb five men aI th1e peak and one 11111e old curmudgeon grimîy swallowing dust down aI 111e rakers as 11e shoved Up 1the straw from bis overalis. Tbey were ail so high. up tbal they seemed la anoîher worid. But 1 haLi somewhat t0 say t0 Cyrus and 1 must do il. I hustled back te th1e other side of th1e barn and gol th1e long ladder. Feeling like a fine young f00l1I heaved il up't t0h1e barn side of t11e slruýwstack and vent crawling up 1e within three feet of where I couid just nîake out old Cy lu his glorified cloud of dust aI th1e rakers. It seemed like sacriiege t0 ln- terrupt h1m, but bis goggles were turued my way. \"4Mr. Pincher,\" I shouted, not dariug te caul hlm Cy, as I usually dld. \"IWhathl I tell'mt aI the bouse.\" Then I heard th1e o]d skinfllnî's voices croak througb th1e dust as 11e missed neyer a forkful te 111e peak. \"Tell th1e old woman and th1e gais t0 gil Ibis gang th1e dodgastedest supper they ever put on th1e table.\" Wblcbh was t11e very tbinig 1 wanled élm to say. 1 p'au t 111e bouse like a cole dog afler t11e cows. The womeu thought I was crazv, but 111ev aIl agreed it was a. greut idea. I helped tiiem what 11111e 1 could; týhen I husleLi back 10 1the englue, hauled my ha\u0026t barrel of water, turued th1e old mare out 10 pas- ture, and stood leaning on 1the barrel t0 waf ch th1e last 'shauk ot th1e wbeat-stack sIlde up Int 111e maw of th1e separator,",
         "THE COURIER. EDITOI-AL SIR MAX AITKBN migt, as welJ get the London figli Commis- sionership as not. That aanbitious ex-Canadien and woulId-be Enghishman seems keen about the thing and though he bas for somne time been out of toueh with Canadian affairs at firsi, hand, lie would probably be es useful at 17 Victoria Street as anY- wvhere else. is appointment, too, would release a really good man- - Sir George Perley-for a manl's work here at home. For saine queer reas-on people seem to think the London iligli Commissionership is ail important post. So it may be, -but its real worth to Canada lias yct o be demonstraked. Sir Max may bce able to do it. Perhaps not. He lias money, discretion, taet--.and a cabinet minister at elbow, Bonar Law. H1e could. be trusted with errands to Downing Streetlie could keep up the standard of affluence demanded. by lis position and take bond-selling people front Winnipeg to lunchl now-and-again. But this talk of Sir Robert Borden taking t'le post iBs ureAy not serious. Sir Robert is too valuable to be spared. froin this country just now. R1e knows and understands Canada. We need him, either as Prime Minister or leader of tlie Opposition, ,and we need Perley. Sir Max, having graduated from Canada, is fascinated byLowndon. 'Whyishouldn'thle have 1V? H ATEIS$BAD for good shooting. It disturbs the nerves. One pieece of German ineffieiency is revealed in tlie tiue tbey waste h-ating Engiland. Your suecessful figliter se.ldom hates; rather, lie pities his eneuiy for being sueli a fool that tlie world lias to he rid of hima. At this distiance fromt France we are in danger of listing. We doni't keep busy enougli, and nursing a lusty 'hate otften feels as thougli it were really injuring the enemy. 0f course it isn't. And thougli the school truste«e swear by a\u0026l the gods of re-election they will eut off the study of German ini Toronto higli sehools, al tliey are showing is hate. They would saerifice, not German interests, but tlie inte r ts of Toronto sdliool-ei4hldren and future Qitizens, on the silly altar of hate. Sonie wo'uld. have the teaehing of Russian take the place of German. This is quite as wrong-headed. We need the Russian lan- guage beeause we expeet to develop trade with Russia. W'e ne'ed also the German language bec-ause it is a rieh language, full of trea- sure, intelleotual, and otlierwise, and because after the war we càn watdli this enemy. and bot lis artistic and scientifie treasury if we understand his language. But w4hy, for the mere sa.ke of bate, should 7e refuse the kiey to this w'ealth?' No one eau accuse London of bc- ing pro-German, -but in London the outbreak of war was the signal for a renewed. interest ini German productions. Last winter ini the popular Queen's Uadi promenade concerts in London there were regu- lar Wagerian'concerts at whidli British officers on London leave we re always to be seen. About the saine time Toronto was gravely exer- cised because a travelling virtuoso played a Germein number ou bis piano. ALABOUR TRUST is the latest contribution of the United States A to the gayety of nations. .With tlie Steel Trust and the'Stand- ard Oul Trust supposedly disbanded, three powerful railway unions, or brotherlioode as they arc called, have taken up the trust tradition, -and fat the time of writing have just suceeded in forcing the American Congress to compe;l the Americau railways to meet al thc demanda of the three unions. They made no plea of necessity, riglit or justice. T~he brotlierhoed leaders candidly disclaimed any other reason for demanding inereases in pay, admi 'ttedly high already,- than Opportunity: \"We ean tie up the commerce of one liundred million people if you dloe't yield. every tittie of our demand. \" They scorned ar'bitration. 'Mr. Wilson and Congress became mere instru- ments in their liands. IT IS NOT UNPLEASANT to see Labour, for once, dictating termis. Lt lias long played und-er-do-g. Nevertlielessl tlie danger of concen- trating great power in tlie hands of a few men sudh as the Brother- hood officers, is as great when it côntroýls mere man-power as wben it controls oil-we)lls and blast fuirnaces-greater in fact.- The railway brothenboods in this case dicbated ternis to, the American republie and were obeyed. What xnay theiy not achieve when next their interest or cu.pidity is aroused? 4Jombinations .of capital have nowadays to be effected secretly or must subjeet thematîlves to strict laws ba.ckedi by the liostility of the great mass of people against capital trusts. But labour trusts, springing from the people themselves and opposed only by eapitali-mapital that has but meagre sympathy from the publie- are abetted by publie opinion. There are very serious possibilities ini this trend. Whet is te happen when Americans realize that the three broi\u003eherlioods have inerely laid a tax on the whole of the United States iustead of ?c-ducing the prnfits of the railway owncrs? Will public opinion turn against the labhour trust? Or wi]l other branches of or- ganized labour be foreed iixto defensive alliances-labour against labour? Or will the Unilted States public, finding itself hampered by increasiung cost of railway service, be driven to de-mad. Somle of state control? PERIIAPS THE GRAVEST ASP~ECT of thc labour trust is thl( ter of leadersbip. The test for labour union leadership whether the candidate is public-spirited, wise, cleaunlieartel just, but whether lie has been successful in advancing the init of the men. I national clections a multitude of interests are il fliet. T'hey modify one another in the publie interest. Not sio in poliVics. The demagogue lias the lionest man under a handicap is to the great credit of union laibour that it lias so far been s0 crately led. But the attitude of the Brothcrhood leaders doe speak well for the future. Labour, united, but moved only by interest, is as dangerous as a bungry lion running amuck in a crowd. NONE DISSENTS--save thc Central Emrpires-wlien J' announffl the Entente's djetermination to, fight until \"th(~ tary domination of Prussia is wholly and finally destro But few agree that fightiuig alone will suffice. -A defeatcd. Gel does not mean a de-ad Germany. The thing Napolcon left, for lived to capture Paris. And thougli we used to blamne the Eý then his war lords, then Prussia for the present war,' we have le tbat thc Kaiser is merely a German, that so long as the spirit «: many remains unbroken so long must the world sleep wîtli under its pillow. Viscount Grey has faith in esta'blishing the control of the G government by the German people be cause, lic says, \"'a Ge'iXI mocracy will not plot and plan wars. . .\" Premier Asquithi, fcrring to the niurder of Captain Fryatt, hints at rcmoving theE zollerus in the words, \"is Majesty's Government are deterl bring to justice the criminels, whoevcr tbey may be and wi their station.\" Thc Paris Conference plans an economie c against the Central -Empires, cxcluding theln from world trade one speaks confidcnitly of indemnities and thc breaking up of thi man navy. Not one od these things is in itself sufficient. One of tlim, thi gestion of trad-e exelusion-thougli not the suggestion of tra' operation among the allies-is absolutecly wrong since sucli a Ën sion would force economic independence upon the Central i would foster the maximum development of their resources, strel', their organizations, dheapen their products and tbeir cost-of livi limiting their markets, and stimulate their determnination to ove their enemies. \"To take up economnic warfare against GerI, says thc famous old Yves Guyot, editor of the Journal des 1 mistes, \"Iwould fbe t o maintain its agglutination. \" This shrewd t] insists on, the \",moral',dissolution\" of the German Empire.' TI believes, is, to be adliieved by dirninisbing thc military charges, ening the personal service to thec state,,replacing war pre-od1hIP with productive prefteupations, in short by breaking down CI insu¶arîty, letting their war-likc fulminations escape into r rather tban colleet as potential explosive. This seemingly mcthod would bring -a really deeper retribution on thie Teutofl-ý UTTING EDITORS EN JAIL is sornetiines a good way to r' lisb the freedomn of the press. A goodl edîtor in jail is soill ahetter editor, evdn if lie is flot a better man, wben hae ont. A terni. in jail niay only confirni him in lis determinationi tc lis opinions on bebaif of an unmuzzled press. Edward Beck, of the Winnipeg Telegram, and Knox Magee, owner of the Sat Post, were sentenced by Justice Gait last week ecach to a RIO: jail. and a heavy fine for cointe.mpt of court in criticizing the mission at present probing into thc affairs of the Manitoba Al tural College and in refusing to explain or retract the criticisff surnmoned before thc court. Thcy arc botI at liberty on a -11 babeas corpus. No doub.t eneli regards lilnself as a champion. riglits of the people to have tbcir opinions of public matteri, iug Royeal commissions and judges, expressed ini print by the V the editor. hii.any case whetbcr these editors are riglit or wrong, tlie. 8 the kind of men to be detcrred fromt expressing their vicwvs 1 prospect of a terni in tlic comui jail. Tbey are tlic kind of 1 whim that kind of experience would. be a legitimate part of terprising modemn cditor's programme. The jail often clafl man 's point of yicw. Ile secs things more clearly \"far from th' ding cro'wd.\" If lic lias convictions wlien lic gocs in lie pr, bas more when lie cornes ouf. Pilgrim's Progrcss ivas writtefl1 i If cither Beek or Magee eould produce a Pitlgrim's Progress bY I o jail-proýbably cither of theni wýould consider it vilýl wýOr while. But the editors are'at liberty. There will be no i Progress. Ând the freedem, of the p\\ess still stands.",
         "THE COURIER. Y tbousand cbildren ef t Serbia for lrfu. Tbirty tbousand, perlslied onB e way. Is Serbia too remote for us to reallize the )f that statement? Do we think of the a swarthy Eastern People unworthy of our )? Those of us wbo saw and heard Mlle. ,when she visited Canada, had that illu- ýver dispelled. B3eautîful, graceful and ~hed, with a clear white skin, dark bair and ýha-rming voice 'and dignified manner, she s the hig.'z-est type of European culture; wholly Serbian, and tells the story of 'ber 'a inanner so simple and sincere that her lSts the sympathies of everyone. Mlle. ,sanitcb is the daughter of a professer in ersity of Belgrade, a member of the gov- Not more than twenty-five years old, she dIy done voiuntary nursing tbrougb three of ry's wars, and she tells of the pleace-lovitlg ninety per cent. of whom were farmers Od their littie homes and loved tbem; who 1IY to defend them. She lived through the scourge of typhus whIch killed 250,000 of le, and ýnursed amidst the terrible lack of and bospital equipment. The poor soldiers flothing but tea witbout milk thr 'ee times a 'Id Say, cheerfully: \"Sister, my country 'is If she had 'M'ore, she would give it lierican Red Cross doctor in Serbia d to a war correspondent: \"My word, lut I tell you these' men are great. .t sm1all beside tbem that I could bide Pain! Suffering! You've not seen \"Iltil you've seefa these men suffer. Off a hand, an arin, a leg-wîtbout blO, mind you--and wll the fello'w Not an eyelid. If you hear hini say: *(oh, dear), that's as mucb as you'l n fot off en that mucb. And die! lie without a sound-unless it is a Il', if tbey can, beflore they go. Wbere Of soldiers sprang from, I don't pre- 110w; but i tell you righît now, they're Il mien.\", lelgli, Serbia has been over-run with 8 0f invaders; bier people bave been orn. their'bornes. Tbey have suffered 'e cruelly tban te eginbut the ltself cau neyer be 'destroyed, for Its esfnot in architecture, but rather in 'cal attraction of its htgh plateau, its e eliniate and luxurlous -Vegetation. ur roountain systens mingle with deep akes and rusbing streanis. Serbia Is One of the loveliest coun'trles In the [thi a beauty that man neyer fasbioned,. l'rcan man destroy. Perhaps the tide 'atl1On wýiich flows westward to America 1again f0 the East; for Serbia bas great Pdresources. No soul in Europe is rl4yber aIs of ai kinds, and tbe copper mines off ekare said to be tlie ricbest in the world., SprodUcf.s and expert s were cereals, fruit, 'd eattile. To this will be added tobacco, LIl and Sugar beef, and In the future Serbia ee il, a large scâle in the cultivation off sIlk- tnd explloit bier Six million acres of foresi W'Oýonder tbat the e.nvilus eyes off other lav fastened on this land of promise! Ex- b' the Baîka:n wars, If was mucb against that Serbia entered upon this world-war; ~deresSlon that weigbed upon the people le first ýdays off mobilization gave way to tit f JOY, when the 'news came that En-gland he side; and the Serbian soldiers on bear- thieir caps hlgb into the air, wiid wlth dSerbia, homeles, sf111 bas fait h In ber L~0help) we sent to thern came' toýo late. lelaswho bave survlved the privation, off Ilretreat across the inhospîtable snows 4 nd Montenegro, and to the Serbian army, ioflal debf of bonour, and If must be pald. *.Canadians bave done littie. Amidst Inutfliclty of demands'on our sympathies \"'e, the cali of Serbia lias been but folntly pebelIP we have given, boVh here and in it.1,hai7 largely beeri aco oxplls!bed fbrough a\"Relief Commnittee, formed In September, y E STE LL E TO0 M. K E R 1914. Its first act was to send out a surgical bospifal under Lady Paget, wbo, as ivife off the British Min- ister in Belgrade during the Balkan wars, bad wide experience ln war conditions in the near Easc. Al througb the terrible typhus epfidemic, this devoted lady and the members of ber staff worked. At times, there was only one nurse to attend to 300 patients. Then a complote new unit arrived, followed in the Sprin-g by a third and a fourth and a liftlh, wbo courageously faced famine, death and every possible hardship. Besides equipping and maintabning these large units, the Serbian Relief Fund contrlbuted towards other hospitals and Red Cross societies in Serbia. advised by Sir Ralph Paget, K.C.M.G., British Commissioner. L ADY PAGET and bier unit remained in Slkoplje after it bad fallen into the hands of the Bul- garians; and for four montbs continued their minis- trations to the wounded off both nationalities, and dispensed relief to the Serbian population, but in February, 1916, the hospital was taken over by the enemy, and the unit, treated with great courtesy, returned by way of Petrograd. A great part of the ,civIlian, population fled wlth the retreating arrmy. SERBIA IN.EXILE. U R D EB T S E R BIA Ricb and poor suffered fogether, and died of R starvation and cold. W'ealthy people walked over the mountaîns because they would not take the means off transportation froni weak womnen and chilýdren. The aged King Peter bad to be carried in a chair; but nothin-g would induce him to leave bis soldiers until they were out off danger. RI-s son, Prince Alexander, led the men, waiked with theni, sbhared their food, and refused to emýbark until the last man was safely landed in Corfu. Even tlie barest necessities of liffe ran short, as Austrian submarines bad sunk many of the supply ships sent f0 their aid. The representatives of the Serbian Relief Funci were thus thrown on their own resources, and their Suc- cess in caring for about 10,000 civilian refugees was a very remarkable achievement. Tbey aiso sent food to the starving Serbian troops in the interior of Aibania, and did Invaluable work at Corfu ini dis- tributing large supplies off food and clofhing ffrom England, and establishing new base hospitals at Corfu and Salonika. T HE French Goverament undertook the care ot 3,000 Serbian boys-tbis when France bas 2,000,000 orphans f0 feed-and distributed them amongst the varlous scbhools. Tbree hundred boys were brought to.England ýby the Serbian Relief Fund, wbere scbools have been opened af Oxford and Cam- bridge. No attempi is made to turn tbe lads into Englishmnn Scboolmasters have corne witb tbem t0 carry on theïr instruction in Serbian. Many of the pupils do not know wbether they are orpbans or not;, for-their fathers are in the army, and their mot'hers and sisters may be in the interlor of Serbia or in reffugee camps; but their education [s direcfed f0 fit them to return f0 their homes and rebuild their native land. Twenty of these boys are over 17 years off age, but havie been rejected as unfit for military service, and six of the Oxford Colleges have taken one each for tbe University course. TPhe ffund wbich supports these refugees is -largely made up off \"mi-tes.\" Factory girls have gone without boli-- days fe send help to the Serbs; scbooi children bave given up sweets, treats and school prizes. And as the result of a special campaign for an Orphanage. the London school cbldren col- iected £ 7,000. In 400 elementary scbools, the cbildren assumed the task of cIothîýng these small exiles. Lessons la making garments were given la school hours, while mucb off the findshing was done at home, The Serbian kit was desîgned according to the models off the national dress: a strong chemise, a short skirt and little bolero, edged with brilliant colours. The stockings bave cheerful colours knitted into the border. Tbe only colour which must not be used is green-emblemaitic off Tur1ýey. The depot bas sent large supplies off clotblng to the colonies off 6,000 Serbian refugees In Corsica and France. Arrangements are being made to supply the Serbian prisoners In Austrla-flungary, via Switzerland; and if Is hoped that [t will be pos- sible f0 surmount the obstacles placed by the Bul- garian Government la the way off sending food and ,clotbbng from Roumania f0 the Serbian prisoners la Bulgaria, who are estimated at 30,000. H ER MAJESTY THE QIEEN Ls the patroness of the Serbian Relief Fund. The President is the tord Bishop off London, and ftho other officers bave equallyr bonourable names. The administration off the finances is conducted la the strictesf economy, owing f0 the large number off devoted voluntary workers. The personnel off the executive off the Canadian Committee also comprises niany d;sfin- guished people. The Honorary President ils Mr. R. A. Falconer, President off the University of To- ronto; the Presidenf, Dr. W. D. Sharpe, off Bramptoni, Ont., was 'formerly affached to the Royal Naval Hos- pif-ai at Belgrade, Serbia; the first VIce-Presudent, Mrs. L. A. Hamilton, is wid.ely known for ber exe eu- f ive ability. The Committee aiso ineludes thel wivesl off the Lieut enant-Oovernors cf British Columbia, Saskatchewan, and Nova Scotia; strong committeffs have 'been formed la Manitoba and Alberta. Eacb Province bias its own commIttee, wbich, Is worklag 'zealously for tbe cause, trying to arouse greater sym- pathy for our most unforfunate Ally., Surely we wbo, live In the seclusion and oomfort off our Canadian homes will be willhing to sa\u003ccrifice somethIng for the bra'Ve Serbians who bave gi-ten afli that they: had.' SERBIAN NATIONAL HYMN Tranlted by Elizabeth Christi!ch God of Justice! Thou Who saved us When in deepest bondage cast, Hear Thy Serbian children's voices, Be our Uelp as in the past. With rrhy mighty hand sustain us, Stili our rugged pathway trace, God, our Hope! protect and cherish $Serbian crown and -Ser.bian race! Bind In closest links our kindred, Teacli the love that will neot fail, May the loathed flend of discord Never in our ranks prevail. Let the golden fruits of union Our young tree of fzeedom grace, God, our. Master! guide and prosper Serbian crown and Serbian race. Lord! ayert from us. Tby vengeance, Thunder of Thy d-readed Ire, Bless eaeb Serbian town and hamiet, Mou.ntaln, meaàdow, hearth, and spire- When, our bost goes forth to battie Death or vIctory to einbrace, God of armies! be our, leader! Strengtben thon 'the Serblftn ýrace?",
         "14THE COURIER. WILL HYPHENS M.UZZLE HUGHE Professor Rieîhdorf, born in Germanjy, laie of Woodstock College, of the Patiotic SpeakeWs League, nould-be recruiting agent for the Cana- dian A rmy hais been on another vist Io the United States. He has been studylng the political situaion there-the complications of Hughes, I-vphens and Wilson, including the Jrlsh-Americans. He claims that the Hyphens are oui Io defeat Wilson and Io muzzle Hughes RO-GRMANISM in the United States Io Pgetting stronger eve.ry day. There mas a 'time when the Iriali-Americans enter- tained a sympatbetic neutrality toward Brit- ain. That ls ail ehanged. naw to a large extent. To be sure, there a.re many Irishi w'ho stilI heartily favour the Allies, but close observation leads me to the conclusion that there are as many people of Irish diescent or ibirtb ýin the United Stat-es w'ho pray for a vietory of the Central Powers. On the one hand, this la due to thse fact that many friands of thse Allies have xnodifled their anlmoeky towards Gersnany since Mr. Wilson's victory in the sub- marine controversy. The Lusitania outrage no longer arouses theni. It belongs to anclent flistory. Many a time, I 'heard Ame-ricane other. thaxi Germans exclarm: \"They are ai exazy over there. They do flot know wIiut they are fighting for.\" American, su'perficlalty and Indifference and Ignorance nover showed tbe\u003cmselves in a worse liglit to me than durlnýg the last two inonths. More than once I ex- claimed: \"Canada for me-z-Canada bas a soul !\" Purtiiermore, adroitly, the Pro.'German propaganda la xnaking inuol o! the Irish Re'bellion and Case- snent'a execution, of the blachlat of thse Allies and their lnterferIng wltb the American mail. A regular camtpaign of miarepresentation and deceptIon con- cerng these questions la under way, Awericans are constantly belng told o«! tIse outrageons Insulta they are enduring at the hands of thse Allies, espe- cil.y7 the Britlzh. Thse resultIsl that the Kaiser camp attracts many Irish recrults In particular. 'Uhese ipeeple are takIng lessons at the feet o! -the German-American Alliance, and considor Prussianism a sweet and Innocent lamýb. They belleve that Prinssia la figbtlng for freedom against \"perfidieus Alion.\"1 It la afi1moet inconcelvatblo to find highly edncated Iris'h, even judges of the higIh courts. to B y F . V . RI1ET H DOR F whom history is a blank, wlho know nothing con- cerning Prussien rnilitarism and diplomacy, 10 find these men apparently as ignorant as the Irish of lmited education. Hatred against England has been fostered in their minds for generations. They -live lu tie past. Th-ey tako it for granted that the storles of Irish persecutions of a hundred or more yeurs ago, hsowever exaggerated and magnifred, are true of thse Iraland of to-day. Their Pro-German friands tell them that Roger Ca-sement is a martyr and that Germany would neyer treat a man of bis type as the British did. What nonsense! Supposing a Polish nobleman succeeded lI bringing about an Insurrec- tion In Gorman Poland at the prosont ttxne witi thie help of a poiwer at war with Germuny, w'hait would be the fate of suc\u0026s a man in cse of capture? Wlth- out thse formality olf a trial lie would. face a firing squad within 24 hours. In my judg'ment, Vie aroh- traitor Rager Casement bas recelved more con- slderation at thea has of the British -than any allier government In the world would -have accorded sucb a man, least of ail tihe German governmont. T HE question natural-ly arises. How will tihe Pro- German propaganda affect the presidential elec- tion and ýpoYllUes goneraliy? Theodoro Roosevelt stands in the forefront to-day as tIse bestJhated mnan In the United States, tIsar la, beat hated by the Pro-Prussian elemnent. No man knows thoir aima bettar than t!he valiant Colonel. They 'tierefore were bout on -prevenling Mr. Roose- voit front gotting thse Republican presîdenlial nominia- tion. Quietiy the politicians o! the Republican party were informaed tIsat they could count on'tIse almost solid Geranan vote, Irrespective of Party, If they xwoulýd only turn down Roosevelt. Tii suecessful in their efforts. The nomination of Charles G. Hughesý result. The polîtician most responsible for tIla was Governor Whitman, of New York, ini 'w] Pro-Germans place absolute trust. More thi lie was highly praised editorially by the lead rnan democratic newspaper, the N. Y. Staa\u0026s To be sure, the pro-Germans have no llluSil0l Mr. Hughes, espec.ially since lie congratuiste dure Roosevelt on his powerful speech at Maine, which carried Mai5ne back into the Re] coluinn. H AVING accompkîshed Roosevelt's defeat nomination, the pro-Germans are flO\", mined t-o . prevent the re-election of Mr. thougi lie la mucli less, objectionable to the Mr. Rooserveit. Knowing fully well that Mr. in the presidential chair will flot do their they are tryifrg to tie bis bands by electing c mien irrespective of party opposed to a polilcy towards Germany. In New York State, Tainmany Hall gave th cratic nomination to Judne Seabury, after sO it,elf that he is acceptable to the pro-Ger\" ment. He wae uncipposed in the primaarles Party. On the Republican ticket Governar V liad a rival for the nomination. Thanks tic pro-German su'pport, Mr. Whitman defeaýted b In the Republican flght for senatorial bo0i3 pro-German vote gave the nomination to Màr. defeating Mr. Bacon, the Roosevelt-Root ca w'ho, favoured universal military service. In iny humnble judgment, the election of Mr'. is a fforegoïne conclusion, and Il la to be 1101 the Anierican votera will defeat the purposes pro-German brethren and follow Roosevelt, FRENC'«H CANADA'S CRITICS A-ND ITS RECRUITI] T H EE seem a t e m e to ie a n antl-Frenc lî poi- licai movement developing in Ontario. VIioui attaeka upon French Canada appear frosu time to time lu certain Ontario news- papers; and otlfer Ontario xiewspapers deem il neces- ea-ry to sesnd special comxnisolonora to Quebec-as to a terra Incognita-ito explaixi the poor '%habitsint\" to tIs criticel people of Ontario. Notbing coutl bo Voloror patrlotiem-or poorer politica. Thse moat auperter Ontarloan doces not dream that ail bis cen- serlousnss and critdeal comament wili obliterate the FresseI-Cexindian race or remove them bodily to a-nolIser corner o! thse globe. They wlll remelin in Canade. They wiiI be bere 10 lve witb, and do busl- no\" wîth, and eo-operate withinl building up oui, nation, long after every present critie bas jolned thelr futile critîca o! tIse Pat ln the afllnt grave. And the worst possible patriotisma is te oreate 1II- feeling beotween these two permanent Canadien *races, or to aay thingsansd take steps w'hich will mire-k mlore difficuît tiair coxplete and harmonious co-operatîozk.lu creatlng tise Greaer Canada o! the future. S OXE o! the.mon who are bitteresl against \"thbe Frenchs\" are men w'bo kniow botter. For tiay are students of politica. Tiere neyer lias been a mnoveneint agaluat 'Ithe Frenchi\" in tb.ls country that hme not ended lxi Votai etitnologl'eal f-allure and tbe crushlng defeat o! the ill-advlsed men -wbo launched It This battlefield of! pre4udlce and passion is thse gra-veyard o! many a promlsing ambition. Yet-from the Ontario point of view--it often loks like a fair' field. One George Brawn o~nce plough\u0026d il wltis vig-our, planted It witb- ail tise idustry commonly shown by sowers o! tares, and seemed for a time to reap a setiLsfying crop. He cerrled UpperT Canada Ix'reslstibly. There was ne standing against him lIn Use Upper Ca-nadian oonetltienelea wisen he was slammikg the Frenchi \"habitant\" and hleýra-rchy with tIse oonv7incing eloquence of whtsh he was master. The Gonservatlve party, led ýby the redoubtable Sir John Macdoanald, was as chaif before thse wlnd of bis atont denunciatloe. He was se suecessful tha-t ho miade the goverxament of his country impossible, and omepelle thse creatlmi o! Cýonfe4eratlon. But di he vwin? His great antago\u003eniet-Gflr John By THE MONOCLE MAN Macdonald-took the opposlite Une. He sao4 for tolerance loward the French-Canadan. He a-p- pealed te bis fellow Engligb-speaing Canadiens In Upper Canada te \"ýlive and let live.\" Hoe formad an alliance witb Frencli-Canadian leaders, like Sir' George Cartier; and succesa crowned his bannera. I do net mention 1h18 wlth tho Idea tisaI auccoss la an lnvariable proof o! righlness; but merely as a hint te bocallzed Ontario politiclana who serau le imagine thât, because lt la alwayls easy to stir the unthblnking o! one race or religion agalinMat-otiser race or religion, tIsey will tread lie golden bigiway te polcal po'wer by Usus foilowlng thls easy patIs o! parochial and te^mporary popularlty. They mlght oonsIder, loo, a èomrewhat slilar bete be ,twean Meredith and Mowat ln Ontarlo local -politica when it was lie Liboral leader who steod for toleration. T HP, present la anoîbor perlod o! easy and populax' criticism o! \"tIse French.\" Tiey are not en- listing ln as great numnbors as their Exiglish-sp)eaklng conspatriots. We are in thse mîdet oef a gs-eat war wbon mix' rigliteous deterusination te wIn and deatroy for aIl timse Use menace o! Prussien Impertalans milses toi Iurnaoeheal eux' Indlgnation against any clasa tisat bangs back frosu Ils MLgIs and ebvious duly. Consequeuitly, our patrlolc Instincts, eux' love of liberty, ail thse beat Ihat la lni us, joins wits lass noble prejudicea to condemn a people wbo not only enliaI leas conmmonly tban the rest of us, but wbe aise perstet lu spea-king a language we do not under- stand, and kn worstil.pping bofore allers o! which many of us disepprove. lt Is very simple et auch a Unie te, relue a wave, o! feeling egainsl \"the Prencli,\" and te base a polltiical,'e!fice-seeklug movensent tipon its srnhs BUT la il god and fer-eeeing patriotsm? Is It b'uilt u-P anad Isolda ber Empire? TIse educalioxi of Use Fbreneh-C-mnadiiu h-e been a-il a-gainsI isa par- tilpatlonisn an F\u003emplx'e war. Every lie a Fren1i- Canadien enlIaIs fer this iar, li figIs hie way fresl from an entaaigllng oeama of natal a-nd berod4tary influences o! wiich tIse average EngiIs\u003eý knows nothing. Yet tisousands of them ha«ve and are flghtjing un-dor tIe British flag. ItIl If true British stalesmansblp wero handling emIbssituation-it would gîve a generou 9 of pralse to lhe tbousands who loap VIhe ba Iheir youthfui onvironnsont, and go forth te the fla.g--and awadt with patience and lin si] slow processea of e-ducation, conducted by e' tisese who have net yet gone. I do not wa peat -tIse arguments o!* M. fleurasse-a sMat ably responsàible for much of thse present l tory situation.-but lt Ia true lha.t the Engi$h- Canadi.an did not respond to tIse cail of promiptly as did tIse Britlsh\"born living lin and for prooisely tIse samie reeson t.hat de French-Canadiann:-.e. thse fact That his e was largely pacifist, and VIsat lie 'hadl noe s trigger appreclatlon. of the du-ty of going tl hadl any maxi tralned In any Eurowpeaa cou\"i oyants onvlnced hlm. Moreover, noue o! 111 oontinued to preaoli tho old, pusllalmoxIMD doctrine. There was no EngîlaIs Bouras5a. must remomber tIsaI thera was the pause \"English sparrows\" beat us ail te thse col give aur f oilow Canradiens of French origin adjuat theVr old l'dees to Ibis no'w world ýbllngligbts and Ils, crasbing calaclysSins' F we are goixig te make a success of X task of building up a Greater Canada, slearcb out and develop tIse best tbat le lInVtil Ingredients f rom wblch we muait compouind wIsole, and not wtden thse gapa betwel' stituent races by InsIsllng upon tbe differer0 poinllig witb x'ancour and semnetimes it motives le the. deficlencles. We ail have ficiencles. If eaeh Canadian race la goirIg Its niat\u003eural prejudlces' on a study of -the del1 of Vse other, thon good-by to tbe dreain Of a slve and permanent Canada! lt la seld-OIn -It Ia easy lu a lme of stress-to bsarde Onlario agexist a solld Quebec, ansd a sl against a solid Ontýalqo. 'But Ibat iste- tie nations are wreoked. If Swltzerland weret tsat policy, tisere would soon be no Swite bu2t a fortlifed. frontler lxi thse Bernese \u0026IP15",
         "THFE COURIER. What 's What the World Over New Phases of Ihe World's Tlîinking Recorded in Current Periodicals -Scandinavia's Pose. . Pheasants Heard 'Em . . lis View ol Empire.. . Albert's Heroes SCANDINAVIA'S POSE Does Not Allogether Please Anglican Blshop Who Sludicd il Recentlu IERBERT BURY, Bishop for North and Central Europe, describes Neutrality in Northern Europe in the \"Nineteenth Century.\" After ýaking of Holland's eminently fair attitude lie ?'8: 1 have not Iound it so easy, however, to form latisfactory opinion of the roai feeling la Norway d1 Sweden during my recent visits to, those coun- 15. It is, one supposes, generally considered that l, Norway's sympathies are with the Allies, the edes are with the enemy, or rather with German Cioncy. The Norwegians are extremely prosper-: Jiiet now, and inany of them are rapidly accumu- iflg very large fortunes. Their carrying trade bas 11l enormous for such a small country for many ITs, especially in the other hemisphere, and ex- Molly profitable; but even in this short Urne of war profits, botb of companles and private owners, cOnsequence o! the largely increased prices for ight, have been quite colossal. It wouid seem redible to, Englisb readers if I were to put down extraordinary estimates 1 heard In Christiania to the pertectly fabulous profits made ln the Mre of a single year flot only by shippers but by firins of contractors wbo supply produce and lied meats, especially golasch-a kind of Irish w-to the German army. The only route to Rus- open tbroughout the year for ourselves and other 'OPeans lies tbrougb Norway and Sweden by way Newcastle. One crosses to Bergen, by rail to 'istiania, up the eastern part o! Sweden to, Hap- ada, and then, after crossing the river Torneo far fromn the Artltc Circle, dow-n througb Fln- i to Petrograd. It Is a delightful and interesting Imey, of about gelven days. esipecially affer leaving lx V. \"An OId Sweetheart Of Mina.- -Elvana, In Baltimuore American. lien the train passes along the southern the greaet Fiord to Christiania. This route lit much, profit to.Norway as wall as Swe- Ixnerclal prosparlty la evident on avery Yet, notwlthstandlng the growlng national )th peoples are appreblenslvely and sin- e the rest o! the world, aver longlng for le sympathies o! Norway are, I belleve, lrely wlth the Allies. Tbey hiave suffared rely than any other people next to our- the eaemy's destruction o! their sblpplng, and are full of respntment. They say little about it but do not forget. With many it is a constant and sullen brooding upon losses which they feel they have done nothing to deserve and are powerless to redress, as tbey are determined lke the Dutcli to do everything whicli lies within their power to avoid being brouglit into the conflict. Yet one hears on ail sides that no doulits ara entertained as to the final issue. To Norway the Battie of the Marne was decisîve and represented the enemy's failure to obtain alike their inunediate object and their final purpose. \"From that time we have felt,\" they say, \"that you will increase in power and men, whule they decrease, and the end, bowever long delayed, to, us is perfectly clear.\" In the meantime, to their credit be it said, in Norway they do not neglect the duty which their commercial prosperîty lias laid upon them, and they-it is true of the Swedes also-con- tribute largely to funds for mitigating the hardships of Frenchi and Russian prisoners o! war. No others need their help in the saine way. There are large working parties for clothing amongst our own comn- munity as in other countries, and the usual supplies o! bread and provisions are freely and liberally sent. If no war lias called forth the samne appalling suifer- ing and hopeless misery and poverty, it is equaliy certain that no other bas called out the same gener- ous, eager, almost passionate, ùesire in both the bel- ligerent and neutral countries to, relieve tbem. The situation in Sweden, even to its own people as well as to those long resident in the country, is far more complex than in any other neutral country, thougli it seems to have become simpler during the last few weeks. The Swedes are closely akin to their Finnish neigbbours and entlrely i sympathy with tbem. They have, therefore, deeply resented the attempted Russification o! Finland a f ew years ago \u003ewith ail its undeserved hardsbips and evils. Wben the struggle came, therefore, It was natural and inevitabie that Sweden should be anti-Russian. Then, again, bier \"Kuitur\" Is that of Germany. The admiration of ber army for German miitary effici- ency and thorouglinese lias been keenly appreciative for many years, and thougli the Swedes are a f ree people witb întensely democratlc Instincts and ideals, as the Prussians certainiy are not, the propagandists, wbo appear to, be simply ubiquitous, have found very fartile soil for their industrlous and uûtiring work of sowing tares. The pro-Germnan spirit, therefore, lias steadlly grown and increased la the bearts and minds o! the Swedish people. It is still difficuit to say whether it is necessarlly anti-Englisb, for thera have been varying waves of national feeling. At the outbreak o! the war, if the Allies had net included Russia, the national spirit would bave been with us and at that time had no verY strong animus against us. Thon there came a very strong wave o! bitterness as the propagandists got bo work and spread the idea ln the beulIgerent aie well as in the neutral countries that Great Britain liad. brouglit on the war for mercenary and selfieli reasons. Tha Idea is strong and general sti in probably the.whole o! Northern Europe-lt wlll bave to be reckoned with liereafter-that we could bave prevented the confllct, even if we did not actually cause it. Ia Sweden for a 1time -It was flrmly belleved we were cynically and selfislily the actual cause. For instance, a friend o! mine, a Swede, at a large party ventured to say, whule this mierepresentation was at Its beiglit, \"Great Britain came Into the war sImply te keeP lier word to Belgium, and, if Sweden had been at- tacked by Russia, lier action would have been Just the same.\" The iesult was a perfect uproar o! re- proacli, protest, and accuseations of unworthy aym- patby wlth an utterly selfisb and entirely mercen- ary people. Thot wave o! feeling, however, la due~ time spent ibself, aithougli during Its flow the AÂ\u003etivists, as those wbo desire' intervention on the side o! Germany are called, were numerous, ardent, and influential. Then came the fortification by Russia o! the Aland Islands, and, the fiame burst up once MOre. These Islands are close te the Swedisb eastern coast, a little above Stockholm, and wben the Rus- sian Goernment commenced mllitary works there a short time ago great agitation resulted on the main- land. Opinions were falrly equally divlded. The violent party furiously demanded Interference. Everyone knew that it had long been considered that the fortifying of the islands would be regarded as a direct menace and threat to Sweden if it should ever take place, and it was contended that, now it had begun, it was the tearing up of the treaty I nterrupted. .CseIn New York Evening World. Copyright, Press Publisýhinz Co. entered into wîth England and France, and known as the \"Treaty of Paris.\" The more sober part o! the nation, however, reminded their fellow-country- men that this is not peace time, and that their Rus- elan nelghbours, not at enmity with Srweden, might, be expected and sympatheticaliy permittea to undertake temporary measures of defence, especially in their own territory, If tbey were clearly necessitated by the exigencies of war. The mlitary works would disappear, they argued, when the war was over, in accordance witb Russian assurances on previous occasions. .Permission, however, was\" given, as the controversy went on, during the montb o! May for an Interpellation to be made by Professor Steffens. to wbicb the Foreign Minister had to repiy, and the resuit was a complote and final answer. It Is now passing entirely out o! public thouglit and comment, and was probably the last fllckering up of the flame before ftnally golng out, PHE ASANTS HEARD 'BM \"Soundt \" of Baile Dlslurbed Birds In Far Distant Paris of England D ISCTJSSING the sound o! big guns Charles Dav- Ison recails in The- Quarterly Review that on January 24, 1915, a Sunday morning, there w~as a running fight in the North Sea between the First Battie-Cruiser Squadron under Vice-Admirai Sir David Beatty and the Germnan cruisers \"Derfflinger,\" \"SeydIîtz,\" \"Moltke,\" and \"Blucher,\" and other minor vessels. The \"Blucher,\" as is well known, was sunk durlng this engagement. The position o! the vesseis during the action lias flot yet been made public, but tbey must have been some distance f roni the shore before our'shlps came wlthin range o! the enemy, for, whule the sound of the firlng wua haard ne ar the Lincolnshire coat, nothing but a \"soughing lu the ear\" was observed about one hundred miles fartber inland at RIpleth, near Ulpon. Durlng the battle, fZom about 10 to 11.30 a.m., there was mucli agitation axnong the pheasants In varîous parts of the north of England. According to the parlsh clerli at Saxby i Lincolnshire, \"There be rare golngs on ln the North Sea the morn; . . . the pheasants Io ail over the place wlth their fuss;\" and Mis reinark was made before the news of the battie arrlved. Similar observations wexe made ln various parts of Yorkshire, at'Lowther near Penrith, and even at places In 'Cumberud whlch are probably 200 or 250",
         "THlE COURIER. miles f rom the scene of the firing. There can be littie doubt as to the close connection between the gun-firing and the i\u0026iturbance of the pheasants, for, in woods near Burgh-le-Marsh inl Lincolnshire, the firing and the crowing 0f the pheasants were heard together. In what way are pheasants affected by the distant gun-firlng? Do they actually hear sounds which are too deep or too Ëaint to produce any effect on the human ear? Or is it that tliey are iii some way susceptible to the evanescent air-vibrations or are alarmed by movements due to those vibrations? We know, indeed, very littie about the varying capaclty of the human car for appreciating the 10w roll of distant gun-flring. We know stili iess about the powers of birds and animais for hcaring sucli vibrations. The only evidence witli which 1 am acquainted is their beliaviour during earthquakcs. For Instance, durlng the Hereford eartbquake of 1896, pheasants crowed at a distance of 111 miles to the north-west of the origia; the sound was beard to a distance of 170 miles ln the samne direction. During the Doncaster earthquake of 1905, the far- thest place at wnich pheasants were affected is 38 miles f rom the origia; the sound was heard on an average for 62 miles fromn that place. The evidence is not quite conclusive, for pheasants are not so uniformly distrlbuted as human beings over the country. So far as it goes, however, It seema to show that the pheasant's ear ih les$ sensitive than our own to very deep sounds. On the other hand, it muste remembered that even human beings are affccted by sound-wavcs In other ways than through the ear. When there is a loud report close at band we instinctively wiiik. It l8 the reflex action of the cyeiids to protect the cye- balle from. injury v.lhen the alr-waves suddenly im- pinge upon them. IL Is possible, lndced, that pheas- ants neyer hear 'hc report of guns at ail, however close tliey may ba, and that It is merely the resuit- ing air-vibrations striking on thel r bodies that alarm I hem. On the wnoie, howevcr, It seems more prob- able that the air-waves act only indirectly on the birds. The reports o! the guns during the Cher- bourg revicw were heard for 107 miles, but for 30 miles farther the air-vibrations werc strong enougli to make windows shake and rattle. la the samne way. far beyond ýhe Linconlnshire woods in which the guns were heard on January 24, inaudible waves would spced their way across the country. 'During: their passage 10w trees and undergrowth wouid sud- denly sway and quiver. The birds resting on them would be -alarjned by the abrupt thougli sllght dis- turbance, and. would rise wlth the cxclted cries whlch thcy utter wlicn somewhat similar movements are caused by the passage of earthquake waves. RIS VIEW 0F EMPIRE sir Clement Kinlock-Cooke Foresees a Per- manent Imperial Countii TIHE cuit o! Little Eaglandlsm-thus writcs Sir Clemeat la The Fortnlghtly Revlew-lies buried witli the follies of the past; its lead- ers are ostracised, their followers dlscredited and disownecl. Empire. which, at one time, found but, littie favour with organized labour, bas become the watchword of Britain's demooracy. To paraphrase a well-known saying of the late Sir William Har- court's, 'Iwe are ail Impcriallsts now.\" And why? What bas happened to briag about so drastc a change la our body politlc? The reason ls simple enougli and easily told. It is writtefl large and bold on the battlefields of Bclgium, France, Mesopotamia, and Gallipoli. The call to arme, if it found us, as a nation, unprepared for war, found us, as a people, determined at ail costs to sacrifi1ce the last man in defeace o! our national honour and the preservation 'o! our race. There must be no going back te pre-war days, no return to the limited outiook of parties, citheèr ln the Homeiaad or la the Dominions. In place of many policies there must be one pollcy, aud that an Em- pire policy. We must not only think.Imperlaliy; we muet act Imperially. Dowuing Street and the Domin- ions muet corne together as tlicy have neyer doae before. An entlrely aew order of things muet arise embraciug In evcry phase, of its orbit the truc la- wardness o! unlty, the fullegt recognition of Empire. But iu order to be prepared for the new staus we must begin our preparatiens now. Once it has been decided that the nation's !abric is to be cbanged, and both the Cabinet aud the couutry have s0 decided, no tlmq mnust be loit la mnaklag reudy. I do not say w-e shoulid root up the foundations aud pull down the w-ale of one bouse befere w-e are in possession of plans for the new- structure, but 1 w-ould emplize and lay stress upon the necessity of a truer appre- clation of the axlom tbat, how-ever long the w-ar may hast, the ap5roach. o! peace grows nearer day by day. What, then, are the more pressing matters that would find a place on the agenda o! the Imperial Conference supposing that body w-cre immcdiately to be calcd together? As regards defence, botli naval aud military, no very close examination can procced whilst liostilities are in progrcss. At the samne time, it may not be in- opportune to suggest, as far as the question o! naval defence is concerueti, that ail future arrangements, whether iuitiatcd in tbis country or lu the Dominion oversea, be placed bcyond the reacli o! party strife. We cannot ufford a repetition o! what happcncd at Colng Out of the Trench. _Cassel, ln New York Evenlng World. Copyright, Press Publlahing Co. Westminster aud ut Ottawa during the ycar Imme- distely precedlng the outbreak o! w-ar. Again, ail contributions to the navy, wiether la money or la kind, shouid be, baseti, as far as possible, on the amount o! risk covered, aud iucluded iu the premi- unis pald sliouid be a fuir ahare, lu ecd case, o! tic outlay incurre in la he maintenance andi upkeep o! coaliug aud oil stations. I have no wish at this moment to raise the tboruy question o! local navies; there is mach to be said for and against a policy o! thus kind; but 1 do not think any impartial critic will cavil w-lth my conclusion that no system o! oversea contributions can be reaiiy deemed Imperial uulcss it lie one ln whicli ail parts o! the Empire participate. Concerning the twin question o! military defence, 1 muet content myscîf with mentioning twa, points. One le, that statesmPen espclally representative o! the Dominiions sud India shoulti be udmitted to the sittlngs o! the Imperial Defeuce Committee, not merely by invitation, but as a riglit. The other is The Girl He Left Behlnd. _-Starrett, ln New York Tribune. tÉat lai every part o! the Empire the privileges o! citizenship must carry wlth thein t he obligation o! miliitary training, If not o! compulsory' service, suli- ject ouly to sucli restrictions us may bo consldered necessary ln the case of coloured races. These arc Imperlal issues w-hlch brook no0 deluy. With the proclamation o! pouce It may be assumed that Germnany w-iil endeavour t\u003e sectul'O for herself and w-but le ieft o! Austr5a.I-l'i15ry the saule ecen- omic position la British 'possessoui3 she held Mi war days. Even now it is an open secret ,tha8t Centrai Empires are pressing forward plans to d inate, production and the markets of the world. Ti attacks, as far as they relate, to the British E5511 must be met not by the Homeland and the DO' ions working apart, but by the Homeiand and Dominions working together. As far as the Dominions go, it cannot be that the Government have lacked udvisers on Mat pertaining to Empire reconstruction. The FI Minister of the Commonwealth of Australiu and George Foster, the greatest authority on IMPE trade that Canada lias ever produced, were iiicll] in the Britisli delegation at the Paris Confereuice addition, fortune lias favourcd us witli a visit f a number of promînent statesmen froin overseas, one of whom would regard it as a privilege tc called into the councils of the State. Yet,00 no Parliamentary movement bas taken place ln direction of unification. It may be that the Cab is awaiting the arrivai of Sir Robert Borde!' be making any pronouncement of policy, but whatl be the reason for postponemeat, the coiuntry growing impatient to know wliat is to be our Pe towards tliose great economic problemi whlcb Il inevitably arise as soon as hostilities ceaie. we to continue imaginlng that no connection e, ýbetween the safety of the nation and its comme1 and industriel prosperîty? Or are we to lia0 poiicy that wiil make the word \"Empire\" Il something.more, than it bas meant hitherto-a Pe that will ensure not atone our naval, but ourli trial supremacy? Mr. Hughes has warned us against put ,tiilg trust in \"men wlio regard laisser faire aud Trade as doctrines lianded down by the DeitY w it would be implous to refute.\" For advlsers 1 as these lie frankly tells .us that hie, at aay rate, no use. Neither, do 1 think, have the people Of country. Like every truc Briton, the. Prime Minl, o! the Commonwealth is o! opinion that the fIl trade poiicy o! the Empire sliould be settled And, witli a premonition and a foresiglit whlch Government of this country will do w-cil to i111 lic tells us that if w-c are to attack this qlue, effectively it muet be attackcd systematic5l'Y scientifically. Nor is thie question o! unity of leis imxpo3'ý whcn negotiating w-itli our friends. \"If you tal« Empire as a unit,\" says Mr. Hcwins, \"you cal' coacessions and advantages to your friends 'w you-cannot contemplate if you spiit up into va separate independent dominions, ecd m\"aing own treaties.\" Witliout unification we cal ac plîsli nothiag;' witli unification W-e can acconl' everything. Let me now pass on to the question o! rig'~i At prescat there la no machinery la this COI1uti'. guiding the stcps o! emigrants, aud unleSS tha' chincry is set Up before demobilizution takeB J there is considerable danger thut the bouie sinew o! many o! our ex-sailors aud ex-00,dîeIe be iost to the Empire. The question, theul, 'w to décide is w-bat stepa, arc to be tuken to. J\u003ceeP migrants within the Empire. Iu my opinion., \u0026 clal Imperial Conference should take place 111 don at the earlicst possible moment for the Pl\"~ o! formulating a scheme o! emigratioui aud 11115 tion, jointly controlled and joiatly finaned bY Home and Dominion Goveramelits. Now let us look ut w-bat the Dominions are iu this -direction. The Commonwealth o! have embarked on a land 1 cheme jnvolviug ~ penditurc o! £ 20,000,000, extendlng over a Per'l three to four years, for the settiemeat o! exZ5ol Under this acheme successful applicanits wlll r, £ 500 worth o! land and £ 500 worth o! impr~oVe1 repayable by the settier over a termi o! 70ure Commonwealth bearing any loases, ina dditio\" New Southi Wales Goverument have, I believe' 1 consideration the expenditure o! a sill8r 11r the settlement o! returnei ýsoldier.q la tiSi Of Nor is this al: the Irrigation ComnTlsiouer South Wales have decideti te inake 500 blheI landi avaihable for ex-soldiers during the et months. Quenslandi, Victoria, andi WOst'l' tralia are also settlug spart landi for the sanie 0 In Canada, both ln the Province o! Outaric in British Columbia, comiïittees were aqlP0înt conisider the'question o! provlding landi for rt soldiers. Net oniy have these commnittees o long ugo, but lu the case 'o! British ColuInibla' le slready on the Statute Book ,nuklag pro d~ the grantlug ýof homesteudsansd boilest A thousanti farine for ex-soldiers are beil'g Pre ,by the Canadis't Pacifie Rallwuy. sud the5so ready for occupation lu the eariy afitunn\"- these farms w-iil cover 160 acres, of Wbl1cb be plotxghed andi seedeti, ud thus là addtion to Is practlcahy a gift o a bouse anud out-Wibldno",
         "THE COURIEIt. -nd wlll be let to 'the occupier, on a ýrpetuai lease; they wiil nlot be re- Llred to pay the usuai deposit '; ail La-t w'iil be asked from them ls a smnal Mnt. Theyr will, In fact, be partners !th the Company, 'who wlll bear al IçPeflses until the mnen are weil settled 1and able to run their farrns en leir own. In chan-glng the fabric of Empire, *a1, PoiitIcai federation in some form .other m-ust foilow as a matter of air8e. ThaI suggestion that we should Ive a Pa.rliaient sitt.ng at West- ifleter to Inclu-de representatives 011 India and the selfgoverning Do- luons la nlot, in my opinion, a pntac- mfl suggestion. Thse oniy form of \u003eltkal, or, as somne calli R, Imperial, deraion is by way of a Coundil of rnpire. Nor wouid thue institution of tell a body be a difficuit matter. Al 'at ls nece'ssary is to change the coin- )i5tion of the Imperial Conference and ake It a laIstlmg ainx permanent lu- itutton. ALBERT'S HEROES An Account of the Last Stand of the Brave Men of Belglum F 1E position of the Belgian army is sometimes In danger of being overiooked. In the Contein- crary Review, Demetrius C. Boulger It oIiiy descritbes that -position, but Cites the ýevents leiading up to this liant 'lust stand\" o! King Albert Id bis men ln tbe last remalning 'r01r of tbelr country. The fate of Âniwerp was sealed, ho Ys, and King Albert, wisely placing reiance on the Iiiusory promise sUCcour f rom Engiand, set about B tmsk of extricating fris A.rmy while BL'e wus stili Urne. The bui-k of the ýeeG had been traueferred to the lei t 11k Of the Sobeldt by October 7th, Id two das later it began to concen- ILte afresh between Bruges and Os- id. No long stay wias possible bere; I Ietreat was resurmed soutbwlards iag9 the coast, but when the viiole PIFING TIMES 0F PEACE. The Experts. -Rogers, ln New Yor-k Herald. Id got hehind the Yser en Oc- thi, thon King Albert calied a l ssued. -hie memorabie ortier Stroops must hold this iast If Belium. to the endI and die '-oY stood. Re couid count on 'en ail told, of whom 48,000 alntry. hree \u003clays -were ac-cor'ded thein -l'e ln some partial measure a ce of fin~al stand be-fore the shbot and sheil w'ere playing anitcipation o! the attack in I'ho Belgianýs had suffidient weoyer, te iform strons totos de pont at Nieuport and Dixmude, and to provide more or lesu efficiently for the defence of the intermediate crossings of the Yser at -St. Georges, Schoor- bekýke, and Tervaete. They aise occu- pied eight advanced posta on the right bank of the river; but the chief weak- nas of the Belglan Army lay in its artiilery, which ýcontained lnothing hea-rier than the three-inch ýgun. Stili, they were better off than thie co-opera- ting div4sion of FrenchiMarines, under Admirai R'onarch, whi-cb hd no -artil- i-ery at ail. The firs-t cannonade on the Yser be- gan on October 16th. The enemy were ýtesting the strength of the positic and the stubbornness o! the defence. It continued with littie Intermission tili the l8th, whben ai the advanceti posts were seriousiy attacked. One in front o! St. G-eorges and ancther in front of Tervaete, were captured, and thus the Germians had got near to two o! the river crossings. During the night, bowever, the Belgians took the offen- sive and drove the Germans out of the latter post. Th'e Beigians thsus re- tained their hoid on thse right batik, with the exception o! the one point lost and firmiy occupied ýby the e-nemy. The next iday (October l9th) the Ger- -matis attacked in force at two different points. The more serlous effort was made against Nieuport, viiere three violent assauits were s-epuised, with heavy loss, and tho Germans couid mnakes ne progress. But the second attack to the south fared better, at ie-ast for a time. Beerst, the post in front o! Dixmude, was captured, and Key-ein, north o! it, beýca-me isoiated. Ord-ers were given to a Beigian division Vo join banda with the, Frenchi Marines and recover wh-at had been lost. This attack provec conipietely successful, 'Mle old -positions were recovered, andi a ve-ry hopedful viewprevaiied as to the possibiiity of turning the success to greater accounit the next day, vh-n news a.rived tiiat large German forces veïre approaching front a nov quarter threatenlng the Belgian flank. It be- came necessary-to, retire on Dixmude, abandoning ail the outposts beyondti he river in front o! that tewn. Yet thie foe counted on an easy triumýph, -and Dixmuude vas to be their first prIze. Soine hours later on the s-aie day as the attacc on Nieuport, that on Dixmude commtenced. It had been partlally reduced to ruins; and It was amid the fames of buraing bouses tbat the Gerinan troops came on In serried masses, Isingimg songs of triumph, but the Beligians and the French Marines diti mot yield a foot. 'Phe G-erman failure was net lese Complets at Nieu-port than at Dixmudie. No progress was made at either point, but both towns, practically speaking, vere b.urnt te the gro-und. The G-er- mans then resCived to try their fortune at the interniediate crossing places1 over the Yser- On October 22nà they came down in Immense force on Ter- vaete and -broke through. If t-bey suc- ce-eted In m-aking g-ed t.heir position on the loft ban-k the whoie Belgian position wouid bave bsen comprontis-d. It becanie neoessry for the BDelgians Vo' quU the defeneivo attitude for tihe offensire, and se the Grenadier and Carabinir reim-s-uts charged to expel therm. Before Idarknees tel] those of the Germans Who »urvv-d vers driven back ta~ the right bank of the Iser, but durlng the night they again re- sumed the assault in mucli lncreased fores, and In the morning o! the 23rd the Germans again held Tervas-te, and this time firiny. lit was their one Everywliere else t-bey haLd be-en re- pulsed; -but none the iess the position\" lied become, critical, and that not- witbst-anding the arrivai dur-ng the ;iamo- day of Frencb territorial troopa. Space forbids to foliov the dotaise of the struggls that continued during thie foll-owing days. The Germans did. net score any niateriai succs-ss, their as-saults were, repulsed, but thse Beigian troops, with one-foui-ti of their nuni- bers gons, andi oartridIges, besîde shot and sheli, fallIng short, had reached the point of exhaustioui. Then it seemed as if the Yser -position must fail, andi that the hast strip o! Belgium wouid !oiloçw the i-est. Under thus suipreme necesfsity it vas dscided fo find saferty by cutting the dykes of the Yse.r and fiooding the sur- THE WEARIN' 0F THE GREEN. Actor-Manager Asquith \u003cto Lloyd George): \"Yo'u know, dear boy, 1 had thought of playing the part mysoif, but w-e ail have ta make sacrifices- ahem-in these days, and in thîs knock-about business you ab-ser-Iootly fil1 the bihl.\" B. T. Rs-ed, in The Pasabng Show, b.ondon. rountiing country. The ti-st st-p was tacsn on October 28tli, but the vater rose very sioivly, and for saine time the Germians did net realize what had happened. Wiien they did they be-at a liasty retreat, their chie! care being not te crosa the Yser, but to get away frein It. Many hundreds wer ecut off on tempolrary ishets formed by the meviug waters, niuch o! their artiilery liati te be abandoned; but the bitterest pili of ail vas te see the prize, almoat grasped, slp avay a!ter the lives of at le-ast fifty t1-ousand o! the best German, soldiers bad been sacrificed to gain it. And th-us the final episetie in the three motbs' effort o! the Belgian Amy, generaiiy single-handed, to save their country was marked 'by no Inconsitie. able triumph. The littie cerner o! Flanders vlich the Belgian Army de! ended se -valianthy ln the autunin of 1914 is stihi beid ln- tact by thse national forces ln this sunumer o! 1916. But, once-pt in spirit, lt ls a n.ew army. Commandant Breton calls It in one passeage a inarvollous re-surrection, anti w'ben It is remein- bere tilat It has been crated vitb-eut a country the phrase la very appro- priate. The existing BeIgian Army, whilch. Is te be f ound exclusively in the triangle o! the kIngti behinti tho Yser, bas been formeti under King Al- bert's !\u003eersonal direction. It lias not mereiy -been reel-otheti lu a khaki uni- fornu and re-armed, but it bas beesn -pro- vltied*,wltb -a fi-es-h and -up-to-date or- ganIzation, evolved from the exp-er- eoes o! the war, ln vhich. every man bas fils num-ler and ie assignei place. The airtll-ry sdili -possesses ie olti 75 mmn. pleces, and nlany more o! tli-, but R- la aise equ!PPed with the heavy artilhierY which In 1914 -was wholly lacking. Darlng.-A man In Wisconsin got marriod, ini order te via a $50 bet. Which geais te show how far some chape wiii go to jet a Ilttie moey $6.00 a year proteets your new Ford Tourlng Car fromn las by fire to the extent of $500, including boss fromn exploslion and seif-Igni- tion. Covers tire lase while car let In anY building-or on the rond- lover rates and more liberal terms than any other policy you can Procure. Write for rates on Ford Cars up to three years oiLd Here's One Economy You Can Put in Practice \u003c'EXPRESS DELI VER Y AT FREIGHT RATES\u003e WE HAVE IT Our Electric Service operates through the County o! York-a distance of over 52 miles. We give a Fast and Frequent Ser- vice. We wouid like you to give us a trial. For full particulars o! rates and service appiy to the Traffic Department. Toronto and York Radial Railway Company Head Office: TOR ONTO Telephones Main 7044 North 4517 and recetve highest eauh rim. W. #Mnd mouey the saine dey the titrs are reoSived. Charge no comm!iôns-,and paya.11 harges. We bave pal out mifflone ci douars 10 thon. sands of trapers ln Canaa W.ho sang 1h.! f oruiooebecausé th\"r know 1h57 peM .suioav d«andrsemlye more motteyfr t.! thftome enu EHaUam'*Tra~~e9 Haflamaj Fur style, Book M pabe\u003e Buta free o= reqessi - Addreu en toww JOHN HALLAM Limit.d 122 HaIIam Building, Toronto. Bnish America Assurance \u003cFire, oMn anl'Hall.) Inoorporated JA.D. 1833. ý4pBet8 over $2,500,O.O0 L.osees paid sInce organizaition over $40.00,000.00. HEAD OFFICE, - TORONTO. BOO0K ON DO DISEASES AND 110W TO FEKO Mau\"1e IEUU IL CLAY GLOVER V.\u0026. te »Y aOdress by the ASilor lie W. \" et a. KY.. Uý\u0026",
         "THE COURIER. MUSIC AND PLAYS Casiadian Worid Musicians, 1N the matter, of famous Canadian mu- -sicians abroad, what's the matter with Nerw Brunswick and Prince Edward Island-and Saskatchewan? Let us see. Brit1sh Columbia gave the world and the Boston Opera Co. Edlvina, who was equally successful as Louise and Tosca; Calgary sent out Kathleen Parlow, famous violin- lst' pupil of Auer, whose renderlngs are now famous in many a record. Portage La Prairie gave origin to Edith Miller, mezzo-soprano, who is now with the Chi- cago Opera Company; and Winnipeg was the first musical arena for Redfern Hol- linshead, the greatest lyric tenor Canada has ever produced-although he was born in England and bas spent the main part of his musical career in Toronto. Guelph, Ont., gave us Eddie Johnson, who came from New York once as tenor soloist for the Mendelssohn Choir, afterwards star- tled Broadway with bis hligb B fiat and afterwards brolke into Italian opera by marrying a counitess' In Milan. Eddie used to be a Sunday fichool choir boy in old Norfolk St. MethodIst Cburcb, Guelph. Toronto gave us Ernest Seltz, celebrated master pupil of Lhevlnne and formerly .)f Vogt, Ellaabeth Camplbell, stage con- tralto, born in some littie town like Wbit- by and afterwards wltb the Century Opera Company ln New York; Bertha Crawford, noaw in England; and haîf a dozen,,others. Ottawa turned out Yane Lavoie-Herz, pianiste and pupil of Sicri- abine; Eva Gauthier, famous soprano and proteg-e of Sir W41frld Laurier. Montreal gaýve Edmcndý Burke, operatic .baritone and colleague, of Melba, Donalda, llght so- pi'ano and musical ward of Lord Strath- cona-with mnany -more. Chambly. 1P.Q., furnlshed the immortal Albani, of whom It la needlees ta write more than of Lind or Patt, Some amaîl town ln Nova Sco- tia produced Evelyn Starr, violinlste, In bier last season. pupilof Auer. These« are, random ,selections froin the Canadien rol of bionour In music as re- corded more or lesa in tbe iwurld's temple of feine. But so far as'imemory serves us New Brunswick, P. E. I., and Sas- katchewan have no contributions ta just that class of muslc-makers. If we are wronig we are open to correction. In fact we hope we are. The Stage's Tallest Woman. Y OU ýmay neyer have heard of Jobyna Howland, actress, prototype of the original Gibson girl, the very first wanian that Charles Dana, Gibson drew in ail bis long serles of \"supercllolis beauties\" as they are called by Ada Fat- terson In The Tbeatre for -September. No. the name was neyer that of a famous actres. thougb for years Jobyna How- land tcolc taîl beanty ýroles ln light Amnen- can camnedies. But If you were asked ta recogniize, the stage version af the re- cent Mrs. Arthur StrInger, wlfe of the Canadian story-writer and poet, you wvould believe the picture on this page to be a good pbotograph of the tallest wo- man on the stage to-day. It la a good many years now since Jo- hyna Hôowland began to live wlth bier husband six months every sumiier in the Kent Co. cottage on the shore of Lake Erie. There ,,hp learned to can raspher- ries and other domestie mnatters, learned wbat the farmner,, were dolng wvhen they cnt wbeat, and as sooni as it came the sEiason of Tosti's Goocd-nlye went back ta New York ta do tall1-beauty and short singlng parts-, . But tbat's ail part of another story. The present feature of Intereast ls the very Interestlng Interview -wltb Jobyna How- land in the last Issue of The Theatre. li whIch Ada Patterson says that reduced to simpleat terras, Miss Howland's quar- rel wltb the drama Is l\"I'm six feet talI and 1 can't get a lover.- *eesto me I've beard-\" I began nmurmurously. -It will not do ta, bave, a stage lover of your own height.\" She iguored the ,implication. \"Hec miuat be taller. Given a mnan and womnan af the samie heiglt and the woînan lool\u003cs miicb taller. 1 should be made love to by a man of six feet three or four inches. WbVere can you find hlm?\" -James KZ. Haclcett?\" \"I was bis leadling womian.\" \"Sal~Dark?\" s'He wvas my fiance ln the play, 'Our- seves.' I \"Lou-Tellegen?\" 1 would make him look littie. It's as bad on the screen as on the stage. A w oman cri lean down to the lu',e maker. She can relax her hip and can drop ber shoulder. It helps the love scene, but makes her look awkward and gives her a reputatioli for heing clumsy. 'Playing down' ta somneone is the opposite of grace- fui. On the stage that is nearly fatal. Actresu Jobyna Howland la s0 tait-siBx teet exactiy-that she neyer can fInd a stage lover tai enough te look the part. There's another reason why It Is gea- ulnely unifortunate to be a taîl actreas. Hfeight ls a challenge. It is a command. *Look at me and only me' It says. While a player le youthful and crude this la a detriment. People wIll look at bier wher- ever she stands, If It be In the .back raw of the chorus, and tbey will note the im- perfections due ta Inexperience. So she creates a bad firet impression. \"Hler helgbt causes ber ta dvvarf other persans on the stage, ta make them seemn Insigntfficant. This annoys thein. Annoy- ance becomes aniger. Anger becomes pro- test. She Ia never welcomed Into a com- pany. Once ln, the others of the com- pnny want ber out oif tt. Saine of the mnembers af the coinpany don't acruple ta request tbat she leave. Their plea, ta the manager bas saine logic. They say shýe 19 disproportIanate, that the combination of hier height and the brevlty of others la lnartlstlc. \"'There, la a very practical handicap for a taîl actr44ss.. It la an argument before, whi I arn dumnb.\" Missq Howland, di.sconsolate, defiant, threwV down the gauntlet. \"'Naie a very taîl actresa, wha laaccsfu. 1 named six. \"Nane, as tali as I ain,\" she lnsisted. \"None six feet. No. She gives the critica no chance ta bie original. If tbey want ta say someýthirg pleasant about bier tbey say: 'Sýhe la a statuesqiue bea~uty' Thatt does,ýn't hieip ber repuita- tion a' 8nacr e5 'Statue'S\u003cIUE' iImPlie5 that she has the ,static quallty. An actress mnuet be dynamniC. A woman May be statuesque but get no farther.than the show girl stage. \\Vhat has become of the taîl show girl? She is no more. Nobody will have lier.\" Why Net a Canadian orchestra This Year? T H E Mendelssohnl Choir management have decided to give concerts this season, but without an accompany- ing orchestra. The works will therefore be largely unaccompanied; a class of work that led to the original formation of -the choir and made it famous before the ýem- ployment of any ass4sting orchestra. This was done season before last, and while the works so gîven were magnificent ex- amples of that ýkind of music, many of the Choir's patrons sadly missed the or- chestra. We repeat now wbat we sald then-that If, Dr. Vogt wvants to do It he can assemble a first-class symphoCny or- chestra rigbt ln Toronto capable of glv- Ing one big patrlotic work surh Elgar's Caratacus. In* the production of a work of thisa klnd under pres1ent -unusual condi - tions the entire professional talent o f To- ronto would rally to. the, oeil- at least so we think., The opportunlty l, too big to be missed. Meanwbile plans are belng con- sIdered for -work: on a Compre- hensive \"Vlctôry Festival!\" to be given as' sofi asý possible after thle con-e clusion of peace, in wvbich a British nlght, followed by three eveninlgs made up of programmes of French, Russian, and Italian ' works are contemplated, prellin- Inarý rehearsals for whlch will begin dur- Ing the piresent winter In conjunction witb the a cappella concerts of this year. Musical Hamilton. H AMII.TQN ls evdently to have a busy season. In noticing the activi- ties planned thus far one natnrally recurs to the efforts of certain musicians who have passed away, such as D. J. O'Brien, Thomas Littlehales, and R. S. Ambrose, and, those who are still living, Dr. C. L. M. 'Harris, George Robinson, the veteran bandmaster, and J. E. P. Aidous. Hamilton has produced a number of popu- iar artists like Mrs. Caldwell, Mrs. Frank Mackelcan, the late George Fox, and many others. It also bas at the present tine a number of artlsts who3e names are hecoming housebold words ln the Pro- vince. The Centenary Choir will give their an- nual concert In Decenvber and wili Ilkely repeat -Mendelssohn's Hymn of Praise. During the fourteen years Mr. W. H. Hewlett has been at Centenary they have given Mendelasohn's ElIiah, St. Paul and the Hymn of. Fraise, Spohr's Last Judg- ment, Haydn's Passion Music, Cberubini's Requiem, Liszt's 13tb Psalm. Sullivan's Prodigal Son, Gounod's Messe Solennele and Troisiemne Messe Solennele, Tertlus Noble's Gloria Domine, and ather shorter works. The Hamilton Symphony Orchestra wil continue their practices. This organiza- tien la a continuation of the activity in orchestral mnusic inaugurated by Dr. C. L. M. Harris and J. E. P. Aldous, and Con- tinued by W. H. Hew'lett and F. J. Dom- ville, the present conductor. who la an en- thuslastic amateur. The Ladies' Orches- tra, an excellent organization under the leadership of Miss Jean Hunter ls aise being organized for the season'g worc. As an educational centre Hamilton bas become very Important. The Conserva- trry of Music (under the musical leader- ship of Bruce A., Carey, J. E. P. AIdons and W. H4. Hewlett) la thrlving. Last season ît bad over 700 studerits. Then there Is the Forsytb Academny of MUSIC under the dIrectorsbip of Misa Lan 'gril.ý (Concluded on page 23.) 1PAUL WELLS HARVEY R Concert, Pianlat and Toacher. TorontoC 1 Toronto Conservatory of Music- P 1- AN I S TT of r RRJSSIAN MAISTER PIANIST AND PEDAGOGUE STUDIO 0F PIANISTIC ART OPEN ENTIRE SUMMER. AVAILABLE FOR CONfCERTS-REC ITA L.SM USICALE-F EST 1VA 1 32 BL.OOR ST. W., TORONTO. PHONE N",
         "C 01Ti RI1E R. Photograpiher said off-handi that he'd much rather snapshot a fIock of geese ta wiidcat; flot wiid geese, however. So he went on the job. He found the cat at the Zoo, quietiy squatted on an Imitation down tree. The cat ioeked limn wlth sullen benignity as much as ta say,* \"Oh, Ilve seen twenty persens You before. That camera doesn't scare me, and 1 don't care If they do put lIn the 1liiustrated' pa pers. i don't take much stock In things anyway. Llfe's litig but a bore; cat-rrfeat and a dlsh of water, and a lot of people who shouid aged Up same as 1 amn.\" But It was a different story when he came to photo- ,h the geese. Moment they saw the camnera-mati they began te do the goose- down the rond. He went after them. The nearer he got the faster they man. ry tim, he get close eneugh the brutes were In open order and out of focus. ry time, they looked at hlm they thought sure hie was the Kaiser trying to Id up sorne more soidiers. For a quarter of a mile that camera-man chased geese. FInaiiy, when ha was out of breath and the farmer thought he was crazy he got the snapshot reproduced aboya. Purs, we are told, are to be old- fishioned this coming winter. But the price-tags wiIl be brand new. \"The Eternal Question\" is a new film play. That Itie mulst be anothi-r Dame for woman. A PEACE MEASURE. London, (Ont.) ailermeni recently quarrelled la a City Council session and threw tumbiers at each other. Moved, seconded, and carried that hereafter the City Clerk provide paper cups for the Council Chamber. utla% NAMING THE PLAYS. Tliey are liavirg some fun in theatrical circles these days ov er the names of some new plays. 11ere's a few of the recent ones: \"Wýatch Your Step.' \"Stop, Look, Listen:\" \"Step This Way.\" \"Toril to the Riýghi.\" -Ail Aboard.\" Now wý' may expect a few more up- to-the-minute draLv' -i with tities lîlte these: \"Pay as You Enter.' \"Pass up Front, Please.\" \"Fares, Please.\" \"Give Me a Transfer.\" Sounds as if the traffie squa'l h'id turned dramatists, doesn't it? WAR NOTES. Uncle Sam :*s experimenti.-g with \"i;ivi.sible' colours for his submarines. H-is navy i.s none too conspicuous nôwv. Windows in British houses rattled when Zeppelin bombs dropped. But th~e bombs don't rattie thr, British people. The Ruminian army took a town named I-lomzek. An~d that's probably how the foc felt about it-\"hor(zek.\" The Kaiser told lis men that hie would like to fight in the trenches. The wliole British army seconds that motion. The Eluns are said to be feel- ing the pangs of longer. Tho Allies will supply them with bu:-iblc pie as soon as they're ready to eat it. Why ýshould the Germans complain of a food shortage when the Willielmstrasse keeps them fed up witfl victory yarns? The Aimerican expedition into Mexico to catch Villa is said to h'.ve cost $100,00,000. It might h\"-ve been wortli it-if they hac' caught the beggar. Add this item to \"Hlorrors of War\" column-over a thousand patriotie songs have been coin- posed in Canada since war was declared. WILIT? They a re goinF to f orm a basebaîl union. In case it lias tli2ee strikes, wll it bie out? THEE BOY KNEW. Despite lier small silary, the school teacher gets a lot of joy out of hf e- Iargely by reason of the gleams of wit and humnour that flash from the rninds of lier pupils. A teacher in Dewsoia St. public school, Toronto, tells a story which illustrates this. Just after the open- ing of the fali terni sle took Up with hier class the literature lesson of \"Tlie Inclicape Rock\", thnt classic which we ail remember, wherein the Abbott of ArerbÏ-othock's old bell and Sir Ra]ph the Rover play their dramatic parts. The class seemed to take a real interest in the Doem. Thinking to test out their knowledgp of the word \"buoy\", the teacher, with 1ust A suspicion of a twinkle in ber eyýe, asked: \"Why don't they use girls lnstead of buoys\"? In a fiaghcarne back the ready re. tort from a brIght faced lutIle fellew: \"Because the girls would float away with the flrst big swell that came .along-.\" Even the teacher :tad -to Jolu In the chorus of laughter that rocked the room. Plums have a spicy zest which makes them a favorite preserving fruit,andseveral excellentva- rieties are plentiful this year. Preserve ail you eau with La'nti for the sake of economical andwholesome desserts next winter. Lanticsugarcomesiu 2 and 5-lb Cartons 10 and 20-lb Bags Pure cane. FIE granulation \"\"The Ail-Purp ose Sugar\" PRESERVINa L\u0026BELs FREE 54 guzmed and p.nuted labels fur a red ban trade-mak. Send to Atlantic Sugar Refinerles Ltd. Power Bldg., Montroai 68 Stained, Decorative and Memorial Windows LUXFER PRISMS (Note New Addr.n\u003e LUXFER PRISM COMPANY, Limited 2%6 Richmond St. W. TOBODTO DIAMONDS ON CDIT Tersa 20% down $1-23 WeekIy BUIiynt a 11gb Grade W DlIamonG lé saving imoney, flot spenlding it A wyftten guaratea given w1th c diimond. AUl goods sent pre. ptdfor lnpectIon. Wiite or mIl for catalogue. We seond diamonda to ajiy par t ona*la. »COS 105. 15Torai. LisaiNrm,0",
         "20 THE, COURIER. 4wwQ \"0. THE NATIONAL DIRECT( STANDARD PRODU( )RY 0F TS TRIS directory includes the names of the Ieading Canadian firms making and handling the Tvarions classes of goods indicated. The Courier recommends these concerns as leaders in their classes and every prospective purchaser can rely upon getting honest wares from them. Most of them have years of reputation behind them. Moreover, they are \"National\" and a con- stant reminder of the steady growth in Canadian Industries. The Directory will appear in'the last issue in each month. Watch it grow. Buyers unable to, find the desired information in this directory are invited to write to this office for information, which will be furnished free of charge. ADDING MACHINES. Ujnited Typewriter Go., Ltd., To- ronto. ARTIFICIAL LIMBS AND TRUSSES. Dominion Artificial Limb Co., To- ronto. Authors \u0026 Coi, Toronto. ASPHALT. Iinperial 011 CoxnpaAny, Limited, \"'Imîperlal\" Aephait, Toronto. AUTO BODIES FOR COMMEÉRCIAL PU RPOSES. Robert Eider Carrnage Works, Liniited, Toronto. AUTOMOBILE ACCESSORIES. Canadian Fairbanks-Morse Co., Ltmited, Toronto. Cutten \u0026 Poster, Toronto. Deer Park Garage \u0026 Livery, To- ronto. AUTOMOBILE LIJBRICANTS. Imperlal 011 Comnpany, Llmited, \"Polarine,\" Toronto. AUTOMOBILE RADIATORS. White \u0026 Thomas, Toronto. AUTOMOBILE TIRES. DuMlop Tire \u0026 Rubier Goods Comn- pany, Limited. Toronto. Gutta Percha \u0026 Rublier, Lim4ted, Toronto. Kel'y.,Spnfgfil1d Tire Co., \"K. \u0026 S.\" Auto Tire, Torointo. Thle B. F. Goodnich Go., of Canada, Limited, Toronto and Montreal. BABBITT AND SOLDER. Thle Canada Metal Co., Linited, Toronto. Hoyt Metal Co., Toronto. BATTERIES (Dry Celle). Northern Blectrie Co., Limited, Montreal, Toronto, Winnipeg, Calgary. BATTERIES (Minature). Interstate Electnric Novelty Co. of Can., Ltd.,, Toronto. \"'Radio\" Batteries. BELTING. Beardinore Beltiog Co., Toronito. BELTING \u0026 MILL SUPPLIES. J. C. McLaren Bel ing Go., To- ronto. BELTING (Stîtched Cotton Duck). The Dominion BeliIng Go., Llmlted, \"Maple Leaf\" Brand, Hamilton. BICYCLES AND SUPPLIE$. Planet Bicyc-le Co., Toronito. BI1CYCLE TIRES. Dunlop Tire \u0026 Rubiber Goods Go., Limited, Toronto. BIRDS (LIVE) AND BIRD 8EED. Hope's Bird Store, Toronto. BISCUITS AND CAKES. Chwistie-B3rowxi Co., Limited, To- ronto. BOATS AND CANOES. Walter Dean, \"Suncisde,\" To- ronto. BOl LERS. Poison Iron Works, Limited, To- ronto. BOOTS AND SHOES. W. B. Hlamilton Shoe Go., Limited, \"'Mo!del\" Shoes, Toronto. The John McPherson Comnpany, \"Dr. Vernon Cushion Shoes,\" Hamilton. BRASS CASTINGS. Thle Beaver Brass Foundry, To- ronto. BRICKS AND TERRA COTTA. Don Va11ey Brick Works, Toronto. BUILDERS' SUPPLIES. Britnell \u0026 Go., Limitea, Toronto. BURIAL VAULTS (Norwalk). Granite Concrete Block Go.. 1LAm- ited, Toronto. BUSINESS SCHOOLS. Central Business College and Seven Gity Brandi Schools, To- ronto. Daniinion Businaess College ol Shortiiand, Boo'kkeep'lng and Matriculation, Toronto. CAMERAS. Canadlan Kodak Co., Lixnited, To- ronto. CARBORUNDUM GRINDING WH EELS. Norman Macdonald, Toronto. CARPETS AND RUGS. Toronto Carpet Mf'g. Co., Ltd., To- ronto. CAR WHEELS AND CASTINGS. Dominion Wheei \u0026 Foundries, Llmited, Toronto. CHAFINQ DISHES (EloctrIc). Thle Toronto ERectnlc Llght Go., Toronto. CHARCOAL, for Kindling. SCharcoal Suppiy Co., Toronto. CHOCOLATES AND CONFECTION- ERY. Patterson Candy Co., Ltd., Toron- to. CIGAR LIGHTERS (EIectrlc\u003e. Thle Toronto ]Ek'ectric Liglit Go., Toronto. CLAY PRODUCTS 'Pie Dominion Sewer Pipe Co., Limited, Swansea, Ont. CLEANING \u0026 CARETAKERS' SUP- P LIE S. Soclean, Liunited, \"Soclean,\"' To- ronto. COAL AND COKE. TPhe 9taaidard Fuel Cof u Toronto, SLimilte 'Porolto. COAL AND\u003e WOOD. The Ella* Rogers Co., Ltd., To- ronto. The Ro~se Goal Co., Limlted, To- ronto. COATS AND PANTS. A. R. Clarke \u0026 Go., Llm#\"e, To- ronto. COFFEE. Cbase \u0026 Sanborn, \"Sea;l Brsand\" Coffee, Montreal. Club Coffee Co., Toronto. COKE (Gas). The Consum1ers' Gais ComIpanly, Toronto. COLLARS AND CUFFS (Waterproof). The Anington Co. of Canada, Lim- COMBS (Dressing, Fine and Mane). 'Plie Arlington Co. of Canada, LIm- ited, Toronto. CONDENSED MILK. Ayimer Condensed Milk Cei, Liited, \"Canada Flirst\"' Con- densed Milk, Aylimer, Ont. CONTRACTORS AND ROAD EQUIP- M ENT. Wettlaufer Bros., Limited, To- ronto, Halifax, Regina. CORDAGE AND TWINES. Scythes \u0026 Company, Limited, Toronto. COTTON AND WOOL WASTE. Scythes \u0026 Comnpany, Limited, Toronto. COTTON DUCK. Scythes \u0026 Company, Limited, Toronto. CREAM SEPARATORS. The Sharpies Separator Co., Toronto. CURLING TONGS (Electrie.) 71e, Toronto ElectrIc LIglit Go., Toronto. DIAMON OS. Scheuer's, Limited, Toronto. DIAMONDS (On Credit). Jacobi Broe., Toronto. DOOR CHECK. Wm. Keatinýg Co., \"Le Pag\u003c,, To- ronto. DUPLICATORS. UJnited Typewriter Co., Ltd, To- ronto. ELECTRICAL \u0026 AIR BRAKE APPA- RATUS. Canadian Westinghouse Go., Lim- ited, Hamxilton, Ont. ELECTRICAL SUPPLIES. Northern Elect\u003eric Go., Limi1ted, Montreal, Toronto, Wlnn*'peg, Calgary. ELEVATORS. Otis-Fenson Elevator Go., Toronto. EMERSION HEATERS (EIectrlc). The Toronto Electric Light Go., Toronto. FANS (Electric\u003e. The Toronto Eblectrie Light. Co., Toronto FENCING (Ornemental, Farm, Rail. way). Thle Baniiel Hoxie Wire Fence Go., Ltraited, Hamlton. Thle MeoGregor-Iluiwell Fence Co,. itrmdted, Walkerv'lle, Ont FIRE ALARM EQUIPMENT. Northern Electric Co., Lin Montreal, Toronto, Wif1l1 Calgary. FIRE EXTINGUISHERS. Ontarlo May-Oatway Pire AI LImfbed, \"Pyrene Pire tinjguishers,\" Toronto. FIXTURES \u003cElectric). The Toronto Electric L1#gl11 Toronto. FLASHLIGHTS \u003cElectric). International Electric Novelt \"F-ranco\" Flashlights. FLOU R. Western Canada Flour Milli Ltd., Ptsaffi nrous, Toronlto. FLOWERS (Bouquets and Wre W. J. Lawrence, Toronto and mond Hill. FLY SWATTERS. Perfection Mfg. Go., West(), FOUNTAIN PENS. Mabie, Todd \u0026 Co., wa tain Pens,\" Toronto. FU RNACES. Glare Bros. \u0026 Go., Limited, Warm Air Funnace,\" Pl Ont. FURNITURE POLISIl. Channell Oheinicai Co., 1 O'Cedar PollJh, Toronto. ImIperlal 01, Company, L \"loco, Liquld Glons,\" Tore, G ELATI N E' Charles B. £nox Go., \"KflO51 Iling,\" ' Knox Âcidulated,» real. GINGER ALE \u0026 SODA WATER- Chas. Wilson, imited, T0IrO' G LOVES, (M en's and -Wormef' Perrin, Freres \u0026 Cie., Gloves,\" Mtitreall. Dent, Âllcroft \u0026 Coe, G'loves,\" Montreal. GLOVES AND MITTS. A. R. Clarke \u0026 Go., Limuite ronto. Tfhe Cralg-Cowan GoDmPSql\" ited, Toronto. GOLD FISH AND PET ANIMA Hope's Bird Store, TorD0nO GRILLS (EMettrie). Tb'e Toronto Eleëctric 14Àg Toronto. HAIP ORVERS (EIoctrie). The Toronto Electria Liel Toronto. HARDWARE.ofT Hardware Comupany ' Limited, Toronto. Rice Lewis \u0026 Son, LX~ ronto. W. Walke' \u0026 Son, Toronto' KARDWOOD, FLOORING ANP T. H. H-anicock, Toronto-",
         "THlE COURIER. THE NATIC EATEP.S (Water, Electric). TPhe Toronto Electric Ligbt Go., Toronto. EATING APPLIANCES. Nlorthern Electrlc Go., Liiied, Montreal, Toronto, Winn.ipog, Calgary. EATING PADS (Electric). The Toronto Electrnc Light Go., Toronto. OT WATER BOILERS, RADIATORS Glare Bros. \u0026 Co., Liinited, Pres- ton, Ont. Ward-en King, Llnxlted, Toronto, \"Daisy Boliers and Radiators.\" Y-LO LAM PS. The Toronto Eiectric Light Co., Toronto. IFANTS' FOOD. J. R. Neave \u0026 Go., \"Neave's* Flood,\" Fordingbridge, En-gland. Edwin Utiey, Agent, Toronto. ON AND STEEL. Baînes \u0026 Peocover, Toronto. ONS (Electric). The Toronto Electric Light Go., Toronto. ýMPS (Northern Light). Nortliern Ble'ctric Go., Limitýed, Montreai, Toronto, Winnipeg, Calgary. ýMP (Standard, Electric). The Toro3nto Ele'ctric Light Go., Toronto. '.ATNER. Davis Leather Com~pany, New- market, Ont. NSEED OIL. The Caniada LInseed 011 MIRiS, LjqnÊted, \"Maple Leaf Brand,\" Toronto, Montreai. )OSE LEAF SYSTEMS. Business Systems, Limited, To- ronto, JMBER AND TIMBER. R. Lsadiaw Luinher Go., Ltd., To- ronto. J'Oh B. Sith \u0026 Sons, LUI., To- ronto. TIhe Boake Mfg. Go., Limited, To- ronto. 'kRINE ENGINES. Poison Iron Worke, LimR'ed, To- ronto. ýTCH ES. The E. B. Eddy Company, Llmalted, Hul, Que. QZDA LAM PS. TPhe Toronto Eiectric Light Co., Toronto. -'N'S GARTERS. IL H Westwood Mfg,-. Go., limited, \"C.M.G. Men's Garters,\" Toronto. LITARY AND CIVILIAN BOOTS oSHOES. 1-. C. Wilson, Toronto. LITARY EQUIPMENT. WVreyforri \u0026 Co., Toronto and Angus (Borden Camp). Lic. City Dalry Go., Llmited, Toronto. \u003epS. O1anneil Oheinicai Go., Limited, \"O'ýCear\" Pouaeh Mops, Toronto. 'TOR CYCLES AND BICYCLES. perocy A. McBrle, Toronto. LTIQRAPH LETTERS \u0026 MAIL ITS. li'rrY Ed'wards, Toronto. rROGEN LAMPS. TeToronto Eloctrîc LIght Go., Toronto. FICE LABOUR SAVING-DEVICES. offile Specialty Go., Nwakt ont. FIEEQUIPMENT.- O)fice Speclalty Go., Nowmarket, 'EFU RN ITU RE. TJ'ied Typewniter'Go., Ltd-, To- nenBros., Toronto. -8 ND GREASES. Caadieu 011 Companles, Ltd., Toronto IreCreseut 011 Co., Toronito, )NAL DIRECTORY 0F STANDARD PRODUCTS-Continued OIL REFINERS. The Britishl American 011 Go., Limited, Toronto. The Iniperial 011 Co., Limited, To- ronto. OIL SOAP. Ontario Soap \u0026 011 Go,, Toronto. QIL STORAGE TANKS (Self Measur- ing). S. F. Bowser \u0026 Go., Toronto. OVENS (Electric). Tne Toronto Electric Light Go., Toronto. O VE RALL S. Hamilton, Garhartt Mfg., Limited, Toronto, Vancouver. PAINTS AND VARNISHES. Benjamin Moore \u0026 Go., Limited,- Toronto. Dominion Paint Works, Limited, \"1Superior Graphite Paint,\" Waikerviiie, Toronto and Mont- reai, Glid-den Varnish Go., Limited, To- ronto. International Va.rnish Go., Limited, Toronto. Lowe Brothers, Ijimited, Toronto. R. G. Jamieson \u0026 Go., Limited, Montreal and Vancouver. A. Ramsay \u0026 -Son GompanY, Mont- real, Toronto, Vancouver. Standard Paint \u0026 Varnlsh Go., Limlted, \"Superlastic Rust Pre- venter,\" Windsor, Ont. The Canada Paint Go., Limiteld, Montreal, Toronto, Halifax, Winnipeg, Galgary, The Dou.gall Varnish Co., Limlted, Montreal. The E. Harris Go., of Toronto, Ltd. The ýSlerwin Williams Go. of Cian- ada, Lhn.ited, Montreal, Toronto, Halifax, Winnipeg, Vancouver, Galgary. PAP ER. Victoria Paper \u0026 Twine Go., Linm- ited, Toronto. PAPER (Bonds and Writings). Howard Smith Paper Mills, Lim- ited, Montreal. PATTERN MAKERS AND WOOD TU RN ERS. Potts Patter-n Works, Toronto. PEPPERMINT LOZENGES. The Naval Mint Products, LUI. PERCOLATORS (Electric). The Toronto Electrie Light Go., Toronto. PH ON OGRAPH S. Pollock Mfg. Go., Ltd., Kitchener, Ont. PIANOS. Heintzman \u0026 Go., \"Ye Olile Fîrm,\"; Toronto. Gerhxard Helntzman Co., Limited, Toronto. PIANOS AND PIANO PLAYERS. The Ceceî-an. Co., Ltd., Toronto. PLUMBING SUPPLIES. Ginif Brothers, Toronto. lIddes \u0026 Ho~garth, Timnted, To- ronto. PORTLAND CEMENT. .Alfred Rogers, Lisnited, Toronto. PRINTERS, Commercial \u0026 Theatrical. W. ýS., Joihuston \u0026 Go., Limited, Toronto. PRINTERS' INK AND ROLLERS.' Charles Bush, Limlted, Toronto. The Dominion «Pintng Ink \u0026 Golour Go., Limlted, Toronto. PRINTING INKS. Sinclair Valentine Go. of Canada, Llilted, Toronto. PUBLICATION PRINTERS. The Ontario Press, Llmited, To- ronto. RADIATORS (LumInous, Electrie). nhe Toronto Electrlc Light Go., Toronto. RAZORS (Safety). AutoStrop Safety Razor Go., LIm- Ited, ÂutoStrop Razors and Ac- cetssorles, Toronto. RAILWAY SUPPLIES. Lyman Tube \u0026 Stupply Co., Llm- ited, 'SýhIeby,\" MQntreal and Toronto. READING LAMPS (Eîectrîc). The Toronto Electrie Light Go., Toronto. RIBBONS (Typewriter, Acding Ma- chines). U'nited Typewriter Go., Ltd., To- ronto. RINGS (Martingale). The Arllington Co. of Canada, Lim- ited, Toronto. RUBBER FOOTWEAR. Gutta Percha \u0026 Rubber Go., Lim- ited, Toronto. RUBBER HEELS. Duiop Tire \u0026 Rubber Gonds Go., Limited, Toronto, RUBSER STAMPS. W. E. Irons. Toronto. SA LT. Ganadian Sait Go., Limited, 'Wind- sor\" and \"Regal\",Saits, Windsor, Ont.* SAFES AND STEEL CABINETS. J. \u0026 J. Taylor, Limited, Toronto. SAMPLE CASES AND TRUNKS. The Holman Go., Toronto. SCALES (Automatic). Toledo Scale Co., Toronto. SCAL ES. G. Wilson \u0026 Son, \"Gold Medal 'Scales,\" Toronto. The Canadian Fairbank-s-Morse Co., LÙiied, Toronto. SCRAP IRON, STEEL \u0026 METALS. A. Moidaver, Toronto. Bucleys, Limited, Toronto. Firanikel tros., Toronto. SEWING MACHINE MOTORS. The Toronto Electric Light Go., Toronto. SHAVING MUGS (Eîectric). The Toronto Electric Light Go., Toronto. SHEET METAL WORKS. F'red F. Bowell, Toronto, SHIPS. Poison Iron Works, Limited, Tto- ronto. SHIRTS. A. R. Clarke \u0026 Go., Li.mited, To- ronto. SHOW CASES \u0026 STORE FIXTURES. Canada Show Case Go., Toronto. SI GN . Daniis Advtg. Signe, Limited, Signs of every Description, Montreal and Toronto. SPORTING GOODS. The Harold A. Wilson Co., Limit- ed, Toronto. Rice Lewis \u0026 Son, Limited, To- ronto. John B. Brotherton, Toronto. STATIONERS AND PRINTERS. United Typewriter Go., Ltd., To- ronto. STATIONERS AND PUBLISI-ERS. W. J. Gage \u0026 Go., Llinited, To- ronto. STEEL (Tool). Wm. J.essop \u0026 Sons, Limited, Toronto.. STO V ES. Clare Bros. \u0026 Go., LI'mited, \"Penin- sular Stoves and Ranges,\" Pres- ton, Ont. STOVES (Electric). The Toronto Electrie Li.ght Go., Toronto. TANKS. Poison Iron Works,, Linxlted, To- ronto. Thur Iron Works, Toronto. TEA KETTLES \u003cEIectrie). \u003eThe Toronto Electric LJight Go., Toronto. TELEPHONES AND SUPPLIES. Ca-nadlan rndepýendent Telephone Go., Limited, Toronto. Northeru Eiectrlc Go., Llmited, Montreal, Toronto, WianiM., CalIgary. TENTS AND TARPAULINS. Scythes \u0026 Comspany, Limited, To- rontn. TIME CLOCKS AND RECORDERS. The International Time RecordIng Co., Limited, Toronto. TIRE VULCANIZING. Hill Tire \u0026 Rubber Go., Toronto. TOASTERS. The Toronto Electric Light Go., Toronto. TOYS. The Harold A. Wilson Co., Limf- ited, Toronto. TRAN SFOR M ERS. Malioney Electric Go., of Canada, Limited, Toronto. TUBING, Seamless Steel. Lyman Tub\u003ee \u0026 Suipily Go., Lim- lted, \"Sheiby,\" Montreal and Toronto. TYP EWR ITE RS. United Typewriter Go., Limited, \"Underwood\" Ty'pewriters, To- ronto. UNDERWEAR. Staniei-d's, Liinited, Truro, N. S. The C. Turnbull Go., of Galt, Lim- Rted, \"Geetee\" Pure Wool IJnder- clothing, Ga1t, Ont. UNIFORMS. Beaucéhamp \u0026 How, Linited, To- ronýto. VACUUM CLEANERS (Electric\u003e. The Toronto Electrie Light Go., Toronto. VARN ISH. The Holiland Varnish Go., Llited. \"Dyke\" Varnish, Montreal. VARNISHES AND JAPANS. The Ault \u0026 Wiborg Varnish Works, Toronto. VIBRATORS (Electric). The Toronto Electric Lighl. Go., Toronto. WALL FINISH. Benjamin Moore \u0026 Go., Llmited, 'euec, Toronto. WASHBOARDS AND CLOTH PINS. The Wm. Gaine \u0026 Sons Go., Lim- lIed, Newrnarket, Ont. WASHBOAROS, Zinc and Fiberware. The E. B. Eddy Company, Limitegd, Hull, Que. WASHING MACHINES. \"11900\" Wa.sher Conmpany, Toronto. One Minute Washer Go., Toronto. WASHING MACHINES (Electric). The Toronto Electriec Light Go., Toronto. WASTE-PAPER. The Levi's, Toronto. El. Pullan, Toronto. WATCH CASES. American Watoh Case Go., Lim- lied, Toronto, WATCH SPECIALISTS. F. J. Steward, Toronto. WINDOW LETTERS AND SIGNS. J. E. Richardson \u0026 Go., Toronto, Ont. WIR*? CABLE AND SCREENING. B. GTeening Wire Go., Limaited, Hamilton, Ont. WIRES AND GABLES. Northern Electric Go., Limited, Montreal, Toronto, Winnipeg, Calgary. WIRE FOR COMMERCIAL PUR. POSES, BRIGHT AND GALVANIZED, Frost Steel and Wire Go., Ltd. WIPING RAGS. E. Pullan, Toronto. WIRE (Coppor and Aluminum). Canada Wlre \u0026 Gable Co., LlmIffd, Toronto. WIRE \u003cCOPPER, COVERED\u003e. The Standard Underground Gable Go.. of Canada, Llmlited, Hami- ton, Ont. WROUGHT IRON PIPE. Canada Pipe and Steel Go., Lin\u003e. Itei, Toronto.",
         "TIIE COURIER MONEY AND * MAGNATIE5 S CARCITY o! raw materials con- tinues to be a factor lu the indus- trial situation ln thus country. Some time ugo attention was drawn to the fact that n'any of the larger Canadian steel companies were entire- iy unablo te meet the den'and for cer- tain steel producta, and tbat no orders for these articles wouid be takon for 1916 delivery. This condition stilil pro- vaila and there appears to be little hope o! an easing up lu the situation. Iu normai times. thoso articles were largoly lmported from Gern'any and other countries, and witb the cutting off o! tixis source o! supply and the big cousumptIon of the metal by the con'- panies n'aking munitions, it bas been Impossible to manufacture faet enougb. Many linos o! hardware, amaîl tools and so on will not be pro- curable aftor dealers' supplies are ex- bauated. The office suppiy bouses bave bard- ly any supplies o! many Unes, wbile other linos are completely ont of stock and are uow unprocurable. The papor situation is becomlng more serious, wbile chomicals sncb as bleach, alun', resin, etc., bave advanced fron' 100% to 2,009o% It la impossible te buy mauy colouîrs. As far as black gra- phite penchas are coucerned there la a fuir aupply avaliablo, but Indelible peu- cils as well as colourod linos are not lu large aupply. The supply o! paper fasteners, cips aud pens la extrenely amaîl, owlug te tbe tyiug up of ail tbe Britih plants lu the manufacture o! munitions. The outlook la for higber prîces for ail office supplies. It la luterestlng te note that the manufacture of explosives la haviug the effeet o! reducIng the avuilable supplies o! raw materiala for the paper mn'uuacturers. Manufacturera o! ex- plosives are using a greut deal o! pulp and cotton raga f!or the n'aking o! gun cotton. The annuai importation o! pulp fron' Europe ïhas averaged about 350,000 tons and now, this la ail off tbe market- LOCOMOTIVE ORDERS EXCEED- INQ $3,700,000. AT the conclusion of the annual meeting o! thc Canadian Loco- motive Company, lu Kingston, Sir. Acmilus Jarvis, the president, apoke, lu enthuislastlc torms o! the Prospects for tbc future, and stated that business nover loomed up better. A groat many orders for englues are ulready' on baud, amounting te more bhau $2,500,000, wbile the munition ordera sbould rach a total o!f120, 000, and extra work $90,000. The Rus- alan order for fifty buge englues bad been filled. ýSir Aemllusg'stated the compDauy hud recelved several enquirles fron' for. elgu countries, and orders fron' tbem werc expocted to boe closed fron' time te time. Ib is also expected that orders frein the Goveruxuent, bbc Grand Trnk and other Canadian roadi would bie recelved lu the near future TO $PEND $5,500,000 IN CANADA. ACCORDJNG te New York ad vices, as a resuit o! Pressure oi the International Nickel Conm pany for nickel, the management ha: set aside $5,500,000 fron' cash on ban( for construction o! a reflnery lu Cati ada and extensions o! its smeiters an( for other facillties. Ail of this mone: will be spent ini Canada. This expen dibure will eventually be capitalizei and a distribution ln the shape o! stock divldend wlll be made to th, cominon sharoholders. Capltalization j of this amouxit would indicate that0 stock dividend, when authorized, wilih amount to 10% or bigher. A straw, showing the demand ford nickel, le the fact that the Mldvale Steel Co. bas just piaced a contract wltb thie Internationali Nickel Conm- t pany for elgbt million pounds of the metai. In August International Nickel sold 7,600,000 pounds of nickel, which was 1,500,000 pounds more than was ever sold in any previolla nontb. The abolis ln the Mldvaie contract require five pounds of nickel eacb. CANADIAN BANKS OPENED TEN BRANCHES IN AUGUST., T EN branches of Canadian char- tered banks were opened during August, accordlng to figures con'- piled by W. R. Houston. Fivo branches were ciosed. Two were open- ed lu Ontario, four in Saskatchewan, tbroe lu Quebec, and one in Newfound- land. Three lu Aiberta were ciosed, one lu Saskatchewan and one lu Mon- troal. At the end of the month thoro woro 3,174 branches lu Canada, On- tario leading with 1,150 and Quobec second, with 777. WOMEN MORE PROMINENT IN MUNITIONS WORK. T HIE number of woman munition workers lu this country le grow- ing steadily and thoir empli»'- ment la bolplng lu a large degree ta offset the'shortago of maie help. One Canadian concoru now bas over 200,- 000 womeu ou Its pavroli, and sevoral others nearly as many. The work wblch tbey are dolng is of the Igbter kind, aithough -somne of then' are show- lng greut adaptablhyty to the more stronnous kinds o! munition work. The plan bas proved a great auccesa lu England and France. and thero seems te bie no reason why It sbould not be equaily succcssful bore lu Canada. Ulric Barthe's' BEokl ULRIC BARTHE bas receutly u publlsbed a very interestiug, littie \"essai romantique,\" lu whlch he describos a Possible German domination lu Quobec. The titie of this imal volume Ia \u003c'Simulla Simi- libis.\" By conversations botweeu two Young Journalists, Jimmy Smytho and Paul Belmont, the author gives bis vlews on the bi-Ilugual question, on- liatment, and the Frencb4Canadian-s attitude towards war. The story commences ut Beau Pre. The Meuniers are gtling a dinner te announce the engagement of their *daugbter Marie-Aune to Paul Belmont, a Young journallst of Quebec. The notary la there to draw up the cou- tract, aud the marriago le to take iplace on the n'orrow. Tt is oue ef those *perfect country nlghts; overytbln ,g le peaceful. Suddenly there Is a great flash of llght and a noise as of thunder In the vlcinity o! Quebec: thon follows a second flash, and a thîrd, and some one cries that Quebec is on fire. The notary suddonly romeiubers bis home and the jonrnllst bis prluting office in Quebec, and the man of the 'bouse rushes them by auto to the clty. Several parts of Quebec are lu flames, 1 and along tbe dark streets, for the electrlc ligbts are aIl out, there le a ~tordh-lgt procession. They cannlot understand it at aIl, but 'Paul Beimont, who secs a Prusian, Biebeubein', at ~'the head o! the procession, knows that ewhatever bas happened augurs no good or thon', for Blebenheim ia one of heir enemies. The citizens of Quebec went to bed hat night loyal Britisb subjects, but vakened the next morning to find hemselves under the regime of Wil- an' of Gern'any. Paul and his \"ln- eparable\"' Jlmmy Smythe, anothor ournallet, secretly warn the people to if er ne resistance until tbey can got olp, and so Quebec is saved blood- bcd. But not se lu the environs of nuebec. The chapter \"Dies Irae\"'-the [ay of wratb-is full of borrors. The chapter \"Benborougb vs, Beau- nanoir\" la a tournament of words be- ween the bead con'mandment of the berman Invaders and the Minister, at ble Parliaxuent Buildings, whero the n'mmander bas gono to tell then' bore la no use to resist for practically ho whole world, at that moment, la under German Mule. Tbey had sent ~ands over aIl tbé different countrios and were going to strike simultaneous- Yv. Tbey had couuted much on the UTnited States, 'who \"Iregulate their at- titude, not on the point of honour and o! continental right, consecrated by that old declaration of 1823, but unique- ly on the interest o! the m~oment' But Ottawa had been 1.warned and hadl saved berself, and witb the belp of Paul Belmont and Jimmy Smythe and their confrerea and the arn'y that éad been raised sudde'nly, iby conscrip- tion and otherwise,, Quebec la savod. (The rules of conscription are glveli on pages 123-124-125.) The story once agalu gees to the bouse of Monsieur Meunier at Beau Pro, to the cool roorn where Marle-Anu, Paul Belmont and ,inmySmnythe are. Paul la stretched on the sofa, wbere he bas beon lying unceusclous for a day or more, but suddenly awakens. Marie- Anu calîs the doctor and the whole family rush lu, and Pul explaîna that a day or two previous ho had been cele- brating wlth bis bacholor-frienda, the end of bis \"bachelardon\" and bnd eaten and drunk freely, and that one o! the Young meu present, a young medîcal student had given hlm some \"Tetronal,\" whicb the dootor present said had caused the stupor. At dînner that night, tbe cure, the advocate, and ail the others being preseut, Paul tells bis drean', and one remarks that the story would make a good enllstment article. Promn enlist- ment, they arrive at bi-lingualian', Paul Belmnont urguiug biard for bis aide, nd Jlnmmy Smythe, of course, taking the part of the Engliah. RELIEF FOR BELGIUM. B ELIUM-and the trll that goes through eyery patriotlc person at the mention of the name-Bîguxu la hungry-at lenet Feven million -of bher people, More people than there are lu the whoie of Canada are crying, pleadlng, begglng of the world to give tbem food. Shall not we out o! tbe fuiness of our purses lu this perlod of business prosperlty feed our humgry alles? We must remon'- ber that these. are brothera In arme and the fathers, mothera, wIves and chlldren of brothera lu arma, who are esklng us to give thon' only sncb food as w111 keep the breath of life lu thon' -food that we iu our surfeited days o! proaperity would scorun, yet It la Tifs to thon'. Meat bas become so acarce lu 'Bel- giumthat-«mnany Belgians were driven to resorýt'to, game for foodý and learu- lug this, the German milltary gover- nors reserved the prîvileges to then'- selves. Not only have tbey'taken away the rîglit to thîs.food fron' the fathers ,of Belgian chlldren, but thoy- have fixed a fine o!. 4,000 marks for eacb violation of the now regillation. Important also la the fact that tbe Boîglane' resistauce to Germany'a ef- forts lu requisilonilng war labour ls going to help ehorten the war. The oee great meaus o! ýcon'ba ttlng the effective efforts nsed by the enemy- a means that wlll doubtless belp lu sbortenlng thec war-_40 to provide these Belgiansý wlth the eue great tblug tbey need-food. Food sent to Belglum by thc Belgian 'Relief Con'- means, but It citu keep pelgl~aafrom the neepýgity of déciding betweon \u003clpqtl by starvation or seif-preser- vatlon. We own and offer a wide range of Can- adian City Bonds to Yield 5 to 6.3017o. 'IParticulars Upon Request Drwuon ScUi4m UUTAORLMID Mi0 HUAD OrmSCE la KiNS 9T. EAST. TONONI@ THE PRUDENT MAN The prudent man prepares for the lean years by husbanding bis re- sources during the years of piefltY. The easiest, simplest, and safeet way to do this is to deposit reguv larly such portion oif your lncoOne as is not lmmedlately required, 111 a strong and stable institution l1ke the Canada Permanent, where it will be availaible when wanted, afld in the meantime, wfli be earning Interest. Or, ail your reoeipts MRxY be deposited and your paynext' made by cheQue. We credit the account with con' pound lnterest at THREE AND ONE-HALF PEF; CENT. CANADA PERMANENI MORTGAGE CORPORATION IPald-up Capital.$ 6,000,000-0( Reserve Fund (earned) 4,750000-C' Inveetmelts ....... ...33,4Ï,242.71 TORONTO STREET, TORONTO EstabIseèd 1855. ICawhra Mulok \u0026 Ce Membes of Te.nte Stock Exchange Brokers and Bankers 12 KING STREET LA TORONTO, CANAI auxL ADDREsS-cAwLocK. TORONt Estalmhod 1804. Thne Merchants Ba 0F CANADA. HEAD OFFICIE -MONTRE Pald-up Capital $7,0- Reservi Fond and Un- dlvlded Profits --$7,250, M180 RANCHES IN CANAD Goerll Banklng Bueiness Transeoted. BVNSDIIPÂRlTMENT a branches. Deposits of $,1.00. upwards reoive4, and lu erBs lowed at best current rates. TORONTO OFFICES:",
         "THE COUIIIEÀR. Corduciecl by Idrees ai correspondence ta the Chess Itor, Canadian Courier, 30 Grant St., 'rofto. l'ROBLEM NO. 81, by A. J. Fink 'st Prize, Pltteung Gazette-Turnes quarterly tourney. Black.-Ten pleces. Whlte.-NIne pleces. White to play and mate in two. Prolem No. 82, by Johan Scheel. It Prize, P.ittsburgh Gazette-Tirnes quael tourne\u003e-. bhite: K at ICB7; Q at KRS; Kts at Kg KB6; P'a at QRt5 and QB2. i\u0026ck: K at Q5; R at QR4; B at KBsq; at QPR2, QR6, QR6, QKt6, Q6, KmI IR4. Mate ini three. Solver's Ladder. (Second Week, Sept. 23.) No. 73. No. 74. Total. 2 2 49 '.Pearson.. 2 3 48 1.l ..r.... 2 0 36 J. 1flulkner ... 2 3 31 Uallan.tyne ... 2 3 10 (Thtrd Week ýRy No. 75 No. 76. Total. . er.f 2 8 64 V- Peason......2 3 63 P.aulkner ..2 3 36 13latye..2 8 15 ltOaflo~ .6and 66 received frorn OR\"Daçwson Cîty=49 points. To Carrespondents.. SJ. F.) Thanks for\"anti-criýtical two- 11-W ébout 1, R-KS\u003c ch! (J.K.) TIý 74, by Holst, if- 1. R 2. SOLUTIONS. Prablem No. 77, by H. Rahr. RxXt; 2. Q-Kt3ch! B or Q .P-115; 2. Q-Kt3ch, PxQ ....Kt-KtS; 2. KtxPeh, Qx.Rt .threat; 2. Q--R4ých. B-Ktà Dro\u003ebîem No. 78, by F. Palltzsch. Q-Rt2; 2. QXB, QXQ; 3. QxR; 2. Q--QB6ch, any; 3. Mlate. *à, B-Kt2; 2. Q-RB4I B-RKt3; 5IN RTISH1 COLU-FMBIA. ~P]aYed in the first congrells of the 1ýrt3h Columbia Chess Association. M u si c a (Conle Oýward Sohool of Music, ail ac- good work, OUa churchi choira wil as usual lrt,, but no announicement has NeWS. hub.ert Choir of Toronto will Iv-e an\u003e- concerta thia sealn las played havoc wltb the men Il-known choral organizatien. Of the membera are In khal. Fe been kllled. Several are ln P'erhaps no Canadian choral Il car show a botter census Ifen who belleve in flghtlng 'Dire as well as aInging about Iil String Quartette in To- 31st Its 'e3lo and second violin. 1110e, 'cellist, la in khaki at en1. Arthur Elly, secon vlolin, tth one of the Blrth o! a Na. M lcoIm Sim Sicillan defence White. t5lack. B. A. Vates. R. G. Stark. 1. P.-K4 1. PIQB 2. Kt-KM3 2. P-Ka :À 1' QB4 (a) 3. plQ 4. KPxP 4. PxP 5. P-Q4 5. lRt-B1 6. Kt-MB 6. Kt-B 7. Be-RtS 7. PxBP S. PXP (b) 8.B-Rî 9. 11-R3 14 R2 (c) 10. Q-R4 10. Castieb Il. Bxp il. BXB 12. QxB 12. (àR-Rýsq la. P--QRtl 13. P-QRt2 14. R--Qsq 14. Q-Rsq 15. Casties M5 l'xP 16. PxP 16. Rt Qsq 17. KR-Ksq 17. Kt-K3 18. Rt-Qb 18. KtxKt 19. RxRt 19. B-Ba 20. B-B4f 20. Q-M 21. B---Q6 21. 1CR-4-sq 22. R --Qsq 22. R--QZ 23. Rt-K5 23. Bxxt 25. Q-RKt4l 2. P-B4 26- Q-Rt3 e 26. Et-RI 27. Q-KRts f 27. RxR Notes by the Winner.. (a) Dr. Lasker played Kt-R3 against Marshall, but I believe Capahlanca favors ihis move. whieh ornes in the Marocs\u003e- attacl. (b) P--.Q5 looks 9tronger, Black's best Une aippearing to be Q-R2ch and Rt-RK4. (1c\u003e He-e Black ahould have anticipated White's Q-R4 b\u003e- himsll playing Q-R4. Md A bold venture. (e) Qx~P appears zood enough. (M White had bad luck in this oversight as he was ln the running for champion if the gaine at the next table was a drarw; but just at this point Mr. Ewing won bis gaine, and thîs o\u003ebvious3ly affected Mr. Yate.s's play. British Columbia Chess Asso. The flrst congress of the new British Coluxubla Ches Ass~ociation took place this year at Vancouver. The winner, Mr. J. M. EwIng, la a Scottish player, wJio went through the tourn.'men-t without lo.ls A two-round play-off. lni the triplJe tie for second prize. resulted as follows:- Stark, 21.: Yates. 2, Butler, 1%4. The folioln is the table* Won. Lost. Dr. Total. 1. .1. M. Ewing........ O 2 6 2. R.G.Stark........ 4 2 1 414 3. B.A. Yates .. .....4 2 1 41V2 4. U. Butler ... .......4 2 1 41/' 5. A. Stevenson ..... 2 2 4 6. C. F. Miliar.........2 4 1 24 7. A. Tree............1 4 2 2 8.E. Thompson ...O 7 0 0 M r. Millar la a former Toronto player. N. Y. Correspandence League. The fourteenth tournament of the Cor- respondence Cheas L.agu of Greatl ,New Yorke ts due to commence Oct. 1, but entranits are acceptable for a supple- mentar\u003e- In connection. Particulars. Sec., W. p. Hilckok, 39 Clarernont Place, Mount Vernon, N.Y. END-GAME NO. 16. By W. and M. Platotf. White: R at QRtsq; B et QR4; Ps at QBG and K5. Blace: KRat RR4; R at K6; p at QKtS, White to play- and wxn. Solution. 1P-R6, R-RK8ch; 2. R-Rt2, R-R7ch;, 3. R-R3, RxP, 4. P-B7, Rl-K6ch;. 5. x-Rt2, .-,K7c-h; 6. R-Rtsq, R-R8eh; 7\u003e B3-Qsqch, Rx»ch; 8. K-Kt2, R-Qteli; 9. K-Kt3. R--Q6rh; 10. R-Rt4, R--Q5chi; il, K-RIS, R--4o4h; 12. RxP, R -- Q3ch; 13. K-.Kt5, R--Q4ch; 14. 1\u003c Rt4. R- nd Plays from page 18.) tior comipanles as Violinlat. The quar- tette, hocwever, will be reorganîzed and Mr. Von Runits expects to be able te resu,-me this seasor the splendid seriez of chamtser Musilc Programmes that have corn t forri 80 Important a part of To- rointo's musical pa.bulum. We learr from a budget of 'winnipeg musical rewa that the Russian symphony Orchestra, la almoat definitel\u003e decided upon for this aeason's concerts o! the Oratorio Society-. The first rehearaal will be helM in the 1noiy'Trinity gymnazlum hall at 8 P.m. on October 3. Thia was de-clded at a well-attended mereting of the soclet\u003e- held laat ''aesday evenlrg, when the new season'a business was dis- cu.,sed. Menidelsisohn's \"liijah,, has al- ilad been selected as the principal e!- fo-rt the society w.iii maIre, and the mnem-e bers are ver\u003e- enthugaatic,. Fbruary 13' is the date at present in the mIind of the executîve as the mo3t quitabla, I One Good Taste Deserves 1 Another of WHITýE LABEL L E P RODUCED specially for A L E P those who want some- j mi thing better than riJust jaie.\" It bas a piquancy that ils irresistible! i SO0L D BY ALL GOOD DEALERS AND HOTES1 DOMINIONre and Bottled by- Lmt Have You Read EDGAR ALLAN POE? If ni.t, you have miseed the' Prince of Short Story Wri ers, who also originated the vogue of the detective story. Sir Conan Doyle admitted thaïthfie inspiration for Sherlock Holmes came from Poe's Tales You can have a Complète Set of this Famous American Author- Stories, Poems and Essays-i îS neat clotli volumes, good type and paper, with eugraved frontiipieces-The \"ITamierlane Edition.\" WhÎle,*they last . at oàly$ ,5 University Book Co., 8OONTO~A",
         "TIIE COURIER. THE BLI.ND» BY WILLIAM- McHARG ('anadîan Serlal'Rlgbts heîd CHAPTER X. The Blind Man's Eyes. H ALF au hour Inter, Connery un- locked the door of Eateu's compnrtmeiit, elltered su ad fi closed the door behînd hlm. Hehad brought in Eaten's travelling bag and put it down. \"You underetand,\" saiLl the con- ductor, \"'that wlieu a train ta stalled like this It Js considered as if undex' way. So 1 have local police power., and I haven't exceeded my niglite In puttîng yen under arrest.\" 'II lou't rocal! that 1 bave question- ed yeur riglite,\" Eaton answered shortly. \"'I 'thougit- you miglit questionr it new. PIn golng tei searcli you. Are yen geing te mako trouble or needu't I coud for help ?\" \"lIlI help you.\"1 Baton tooli off bis coat aud vest aud handed tbem ever. The conducter put thoni on a seat while ho feit over bis prillouer for wespons or other concealea objecte. Eatou lisuded hlm a pocliet-klfo, and thie koy to his travelling-bag-he haLl ne etbor koys-from his treusers pocliets. The conductor discovered rnethlug else. Ho found a poncil-but ne papere or memorandum beek-a plain goid watcli, unongraved, sud a bil1-fold contalning seven hundred dollars iu United Statos banli-netes i nthe veet. Connery wroteoeut a re- (cipt for the money and lisndod It te ie prisoner. He returnod tshe, other articles. Lu the cent, the conductor fouud a liaudlerchief and lu another peekot the torn scraps o! the telegram delivored te Eaton lu bis bertli. \"Thnts the eue wo haLl the fus over in the dluing car,\" Baton volun- teered, as the conductor began ittlng thoe scmnps together. \"Yon forgot to completeîy Llestroy lt, eh?\" \"Whbat was the use ?\" Eaton tooli up the othor's point of viow. \"lYen lad a copy snywsy.\"1 \"Yen miglit have wanted to get rld o! it sInco thie Llscovery of the mur- der,\" \"Murder?\" \"«I gnose it's the saine thlng.\" The ceuduEcter dropped the scrape into an envolope sud put it I lits pocket. He exained the coat for a tailor's namne. \"Thar coat was copied by n China- insu lu Amoy frein the cent 1 ha l ho- fore. Befere the new eue wae madle, I teeli eut the naine of the other taller se lt wonldn't ho ceapled, tee,\" Baton remarked 1n1'e lacl o! 'any mark.. back.,tle cçat, went the door hbind hlm \u003cEaton opened bis t checkod over.the coi tell t1iat everything again carefully exam more had beon taken Cinhese-Euglisb dict now gone. There 1 lu the bag to betraî tity than the one lie put the bag away a bis ,seat by the wind The clear, briglit toward its dusk; th mevement or- attem train ail day. Abor people began ýpassin dîner, Connery app\u003c a waiter from the d a tray witli dinner. \"This ls 'on' the Il tice, Conductor?\" E~ liglitly. \"The checkl I a you want this, l'il your monoy which I \"Make it a dollar Eston directod. *aiter.\" The blackt boy gr the table. \"lHow Io Mr. - \"Dorne ?\" Connery \u003e\"Tbanks,\" Isald stand. 110w sle ?\"V Connery dld not the walter loft lin again. At ton, Coi more witb the port the conductor stood thre porter madle up went te beLl witb stili, wlth only the side bis wIndow an any one about but ca-lonally passing lie had haLl notblng Ienely hours o! lh thînli, Eaten lay a~ nnderstood defluitel ever action was te lits adlmission of bi den's, a charge of sault te hilîl-depon Santoine Lied or -e cover-would ho at the firet clty t the train had starte be, turned over te would be madle; the going furtlior wlth The nlght again MAN'S EYE'S AND, EDWIN BALMER )y the Canadian Courier. xplanation of the was clear, with stars shining; toward Connery banf4ed midnight wind came; but little snow ont and locked drifted now, for the cold had frozen a crust. In the morning, from somle- raveiling bag and where ýover the snow-covered country, atents. 11e, old 4 a man ,anda boy appeared at the top» in It had been of the ýshining bank beside the train. lned, but nothlng They walked beside the sieepers to *except the amail the dining car, where, apparently, they lonary; that was disposed of whatever they had brouglit îad been nothing in1 the bags they carried; they came tany other iden- back alorg the cars and then disap- had given. Baton peared. nd went back to, As lie watclied them, Batron felt the ow. desperate impulse to escape through day was drawing the window and follow them; but he ere liad been no knew lie surely would be seen; and lit to, move the ieven if lie could get away unobserved, it six o'clock, as he would freeze; bis overcoat and bat gforward to the had been kept by Connery. The con- eared again with ductor came after a tixne and let in Iing car bearing the porter, who unmade the bertli and carried away the linen; and later, 'epartinent o! Jus- Connery came again with the waiter aton tried to ask bringing breakfast. M1e liad brought a magazine, which lie dronped upon the dollar twenty. If seat beside Baton; and hie ýstood by charge it against untll Baton baad breakfastecl and the bave.\" dishes were carried away. ,forty-five then, \"Want to talk yet ?\" lie asked. IRemembel' the \"ýNo.,, \"Ise there anything else you want ?\" lnned and spread lie asked. \"I'd like to'see Miss Santoine.\" laton began. Connery turned a-way.~1 ih put In sharply. \"You wlll tell Misesatle1hv Baton. \"I1 under- soinetbîng I want to oay to bier?\" Eaton asked more definitely. answer, and wltli Connery turned back. \"If you've î, iocklng hlm In s nything to say, -tell It to me,\" lie bade nnery came once curtly. er o! the car, and \"It wIll. do no good to tell it té you. by slontly while *Wil yo u tell lier what I asked ?\" the berth. Baton \"No ,\" said Connery. the car absolutely wali o! snoýw out- AT noon, when tliey brought Eaton's ~d no evidence of Ai luncheon, ho repoeated ls request a subduod step oc- and was again refused; but less the door. Thougli than an hour afterward Connery came to do ai the long, tu bis door again, and behind Connery, e evenling but \"o Eaton saw Harriet Santoine and Avery. ,rake thinkiflg. H1e Eaton juniped up, and as lie saw the y now that what- girl's pale face, the color left bis own. 1,0 talion following \"Miss Santoino lias. asked to speali to spresence et War- y ou,\" Connery announced; and lie ad- murder or o! as- mltted IHarriet Santoino and Avery, dent upon whetlior ond himself remaining outside in the îemed llkoIy to ro- atlol, closed the door upon tbem. nade agalnst hinlI \"11Gw is your fatlier?- Eaton asked bey roached after the girl. d again. 11e weuld \"He soems juet the samne; at least, the police; Inqiiiry 1 can't see any change, Mr. Eaton.\" ,u-he sbrank from, She sald sometbing in a 10w foone to those thouglits. Avery, who nedded;, then elie sat down was very cold; it opposite Enton, and Avery seatod hlm- sE e b h .A t a h SOnt of the~ boats ordered by, the Dpartmnft of Railways and Canais, and nlow beinga sent north te, take soundilfgs at Port Nelson, one of 'the much-talked-lof terminais'for the I-udison's Bay Railway. The boait !a here seen at Buffalo ready'fbr shîpmsnt'teo H-aIifax. elf on thre ariii of thre seat beside b \"lCan Dr. Sinclair see any dii nce?\" Eaton askcd. \"Dr. Sinclair weiii, not commiit liins xcept to say that so far as lie cIl thre indications are favorable. eins to thinir-\" Tlie girl chol\u003c ut wben she went on, lier blue e: -ere very brtght and lier lips did remble. \"Dr. Sinclair seeins to th' Ir. Baton, that Father was found i rt rime, and that whatever chance at for recovery came frein YOU. ~ver, and 1 bad passed by the ber tCher people bad gone by, Somuetil 'ather had insomnia and wouldn't o sleep tiI! late in tire mornîlg; 50 *nd Mr. Avery too-would have ;.ni undisturbed untîl noon. Dr. lair says tbat if lie had been left ong as that, lie would hiave liad chan-ce at ail for if e.\" 'IHe lias a chiance, tiren, flow?\" \"Yes; but we don't know how \"Il re change Dr. Sinclair ls eXPeci niay be eltirer for better or worse. wanted you te know, Mr. Baton, recognize- that tlie chance Fai niay bave came tlirougli you, and' I, amn trying te- tbink of you 1as the wlîe gave himà thei chance.\" T Ewarm blood flooded 'Egt T face, and lie bowed bis ed thon, wae no« wlolly hostil' him;, she bad net been comnpletely- vinced by Avery. \"*What was. it you wanted to te\"! Santoine?\" Avery challenged. \"Wbat did Miss 'Santoine Wall tell me?\" \"ýWhat she bas just told yeu..ý, Baton thouglit for a momlebTt, realizatien that liad comle to, hili row that something bad kepit the fromn condemning hlmi as Avery Connery had condemned hlm, and someliow, for somns reason, slio have been figlitiug withla hersel day and last niglit against the 1 of bis gult, flushed hlmi witb. grati and clianged- the attitude lie thouglit It was going to bie nece, for hlm to take in this talli witb As lie looked up, bier eyes ié then she looked quickly away.A niovod impatiently and repeato question: \"What was it you wanted to sai \"Are they looking for any one, SantýOine-aly one besides mie in nec\u003c tion witli the attack u1POn father?\" She glanced at Avery and diÉ aniswer. Avery's eyes narrewed. are quite satisfied with -vyhat we been doing,\" lie answerod.ý \"Thon they are not ]ookiflg, Santoine!' Uler lips pressed together, and it was Avery who answered. have npt sa id so.\" \"I mnuet assume it, then,\" Eator te the girl without regardiflg A -have been watcbing as well could sincetbey sliut rie up bore I have listened, but I liavenl't iny evidence that anythi'rg m-ore ing dons. Se\u003e J'in obligcd to s that nothing is bing dore. Th, peeple who knew about the atta your father are so conviucod and fied that 1 arn the one who did i they aren't lookiug any fürtber. A tire people movIng about on the the-tho man wlio made the attl bcing allowed to, movo about; lie even beave the train, if lie coiild witheut belng seen and was wl take bis chance in, the s'noN 'wrhen tIhe train goos On, lie celý will leave it!\" Harriet Santoine turned questi lyv te Avery again. \"I1 amn not aslting anything 0 ý ou see,\" Eaton urged. \"I'nr lie îng you to lot me go Or to gi' any-any increaSe of liberty miglit make it possible for lue cape. 1_I'm only warnling yo' 'Mr. Avery and the conduct or an( lng a mIstako; and you don't bl have any faith In me or an., beîtA I m telllng the trutb when' I se' I dldn't do it! I'm only wsXfill' Miss Santoine, that you miuet them stop lookIng! Wby, if 1 ba it, I miglit very llkely have haLl complice whom they are goif19 (:scape. It's only commni sens \"Tînt le what yeu wanted tO ,Av-,ry asked. leati It,\"1 Baton answOled.",
         "THE COURIIER. e cau go, thbons Harriet,\" she made no mnove ta go. lier rested upon Eaton steadily; and he had been appoaling ta her, a had corne ta ber cheeks and faded and corne again and again with MIfises as ho spoke. YOU didn't do 1V, why don't you us?\" she cried. eup You?\" 8S: tell us who you are and what re doing? Why did yen take the because Father was on it, if Yeu Moan any harmta hlm? Whyý yau tell us wherc 3 ou are gaing lere you have been or what you been doîng? What did your ap- Enent with Mr. Warden mehn'? xrhy,ý after he was kîlled, did yeu Pear until you followed Father on Xrain? Why car.'t you give the Of anybody yau know or toll us One wbo knows about you?\" on sank back against the seat from her, and bis eyes shIfted ta *standing ready te go, and theon nlight ask yeu In return,\" Eaton \u003cWb wY Yu tbaught it worth wbile, Santoine, ta ask sa much about f wben you first met me and be- ý1nY of this had happened? Yeu flot sa much interested then ln rsonally as that; and it was noV ;e You could have suspected I bad Mýr. Warden's friend; for wbeni Iliductor charged that, it was a Ete surprise ta you.\" 'I did flot suspect that.\" en why were you curiou.ý about Ire Avery could speak or even a gesture, Harriet seemed ta :o a decision. \"My Father -askod sýhe said. ir father? Asked Yeu ta do find out about you.\" Y?' lie hsitated, Avery put his hand 'er shoulder as thougli warning be still; but she went on, after 'Om!sed Mr. Avery and the con- ,she said, \"Vthat if I saw you 1 listen ta what you bad ta say ~lld flot answer questions with* ýir consent; but I seem already B broken that promise. I have raflderlng, since we bave found Rt we have about Yeu, whether could possibly have suspectod \u003e1wero Mr, Warden's friend-, flQuite sure that was nlot the Ireason for bis inquiring about (Y F'ather thought he recognized ilce, Mr. Eaton, when you were Lg ta the conduictor about your He thought he ought ta know )u wore. lie knew that somo idsomewhere ho had been near Orand bad heard you speali. eould not tel! where or when. ither Mr. Avery nor I could tell 0 you were; se ho asked us ta 1 do not know whetber, after described You ta Father, ýho ve connected you with Mr. War- fiat; but that could nlot have blis mind at first.\"1 bad paled; Avery bad seemed G interrupt her, but watching lie s;uddonlY had desisted. and Mr. Avery? Eaton re- \"Me' sent you ta find out about 'nee-ln this case-more than iry,; because he thought it e'Oasler for me ta do lt.\"1 IIET had reddened under Iton's gaze. \"'Yau understand, e~- Eaton, it was-was entIrely \"al with me. My Father, be- ý, le obliged ta use the eyes of ulule, for one, ho bas trained ee for hlm ever since we used 'ealks together when 1 was a, 'l, and ho has, made me learn in what 1 see ln dotai!, In'the, t ho would see it himef; and lirig him ta see other thîngs h 1 miglit be unable ta report' itelIy and clearly, ho bas Mr. l'le calîs us bis eye, same- ai1d it was only--only because ýenl commlssloned ta find out1 Iiu that 1 'was abllged te showI Clrloslty.\" lerStand,\" sald Eaton quletly.1 eDOrt ta your father, 1 sup- Ivlnced hlm that he had been s 1 i thinltlug ho knew my f \"No--not that, lie knew that ho had heard it; for sôunds have so much rnoaning ta hlm. that he never neglects or forgets them, and he carnies la bis niind the voices of hundreds of dif- feont people and almost never makes a mistake among thein. It did make hlmii surer that yeu were not any ane with wbose voice ho ought to have been familiar, but only some one whom, he had heard say somethîng- a few words or sentences, maybe- under conditions which impressed. 3 our voice upon his mimd. And ho. told Mr. Avery so, and that bas only made Mr. Avery and the conductar more certain that you must be the - one. And since you w!!! not tel]-\" \"Ta tell would only further confirm. them-\", \"What do you mean?\" \"I mean they would ho more cer- tain it was I who-\" rAT ON, as ho biundered wîth the Lwords and checked bimself, Iooked up apprebensively at Avery; but Avery, if ho bad thought that Lft was wartb while ta lot this conversation go on lu the expectatian, that Eston might lot slip something çvbIch cauld ho used against bimself, now had last that expectation. \"Came, I-arry,\" ho said. Harriet arase, and Earon gat up as she did and stoad as she went taward the door. \"You said Mr. Avery and the con- ductor believe-\" ho began impulsive- ly, ln answer ta the something within him which was urging him ta know, ta make certain, haw far Hlarraot San- toine believed bim ta bave beon con- cerned in the attack upon ber father. And suddonly ho found that ho did neot noed ta ask. Ho knew;, and with this sudden realization ho ail at once understoad why she had nat been con- vinced in spite of tho conviction of the athers-wby, as, flushing and pal- ing, she had just now talkedt witb hlm, lier manner had boen a continuai denial of the suspicion aga!nst hlm. To Avery and ta Connery the attack upon \u003eSantoine was made a vital and important thing by the prominence of q1antoîne and'their own rosponsibility towiard hlm, but after ail thero was notbing surprising in there baving been an attacli. Even ta Harriet San- toine it could not ho a matter of sur- prise; ýshe knew-she must know- that the fathor whamn she loved and thought of as the, beat of mon, could rot have accomplished ail ho lied done wPithout making enemies; but she could concelve of an attack upon hlm. heing made only by some one raused ta insane and unreasoning hate ngainst hlm. or by same agent wicked nnd vile enougb ta kil! for profit. She could not concoive of its having been done by a man whom, littie as she had known hlm, she had liked, with whom she had -chatted and laughed upon terms of equality. The accusation af the second telegram had overwhelmed her for a timo, and had driven her from thLo dof once o! hlm whIch sho liad made after ho had admitted hi'ý ca)nnoction with Gabriel Warden; but 110w, Eaton felt, the Impulse in bis faveur had roturned. She must have talked ýovor with ber father many times the mattor of the man whom Wlarden had detormined ta befriend; and plainly she bad become s0 satis- fied ýthat ho deserved' considoration rather than suspicion that Connery's - identification of Eaton now was ta bis advantage. Harriet Santoine cauld not yet answer the accusation of the eecond, telegram. against him, but-in reason or ouf af roason-her feelings rofused acceptanceo0f If. It *as lier feelings that wore con. trollng ber now, as suddenly she faced hlm, fiushed and with eyes su!- used, walting for the end of the son- :ence ho could net finish. And as bis \u003e,aze met hors, ho roalized that lfo- ;he Ilfo that held Harriet Santoine, iowever Indefinîto the interest miglit )e that she had talion la hlm-was dearer ta hlm than ho bad thaugit.ý Avery had reacbed the door, holding t open for ber ta go out. Suddenly ilaton tare the handie fronm Avery's ,rasp,, slammed the do9r shut upon îlm and braced bis foot against IL. lfe would ho able ta hold If thus for everal moments before they could orce it o'pen. \"Miss Santaîne,\" ho pleadeti, bis ItOrDtG UPPER AIDLOWEI SCRBOLS (mb Calendar.sent on application. i-eadmaster CET IT TODAT Many NA ae Uses THE GREAT 15ce s4AP Hand Cleaner HOTEL DIRECTORY THE TUSCO Coinforta ofndEuroen (Prlvate.Hotel) Moderato rates. Hot andi cold water In every room. Ottaw - C nadatriOt. 235 Jarvis Street, Toronto, Ont. KING EDWARD HoTEL American and European Plan Toronto, Canada. -Freproof- Facing Grand Plaz Accommnodatlon fer 750 guests, $15 Up. Amorican and European Plans. One Block From Parliament \u003eBuildings and Central Station MOTEL KRAUSMANN GRILL EUROPEAN PLAN Geo. Morristte, bu ae Rooma wt bath $1.00 per day up. Plells Beer on draught. ORCHESTRA. That Boy of Yours Is anxious to make extra pocket xnoney, but does flot know of a local job ho ean secure for Saturdays. We salve the .problem; we have the Job. All the boy does la ta edaim It and go to work. TNhe work ls made easy by our new methoi. W. show the boy (or any ane) how ta go about getting subscrIbers ta CanadIen Courier. The Instructions are so plain a boy can'follow thein. Help the Boy W Tour moral support back of the boy w!ll mean much ta hIs tirait effo\u003erts. Bacc fiis Up with the help we can give, and success ta the boy wliR mean a stas-t ln 11f e towards money niaking. Our terms are Most Ilberal; a reatonabie wage 19 guaranteed to every boy worker. Write te SALES MANAGER, CANADIAN COURIER,. 181 SIMCOE ST., TORONTO.",
         "THE COURIER. voice hoarse with is emotion, \"for in (iad'e elake, make tbem think what bý tliey are doing befere they make a public accusation against me--before ti they charge me with this ta others il not on this train!I I can't answer O what you asked; 1 can't tell You now b about myseif; there le a reason--a b Tair sud honest reasen, sud eue whlch t~ niesus life or deatli to me. It will not 1\u003c lie merely accusation they make, 0 e galnt me-lt will be nxy sentence! t 1 shal lie sentenced befare I arn tried t~ --condemned wlthaut a chance ta de- d Tend myseif! That is the reason 1 could not corne forward after the mur- der ef Mr. Warden. 1 could not have hlped hlm--or aided lu tbe pursuit of bis eremies-if 1 liad appeared; 1 moreiy would have been destroyed myseif! The only zhlng 1 ceuld hope tu accomplili lias been lu Tollowlng rny present course-wliich, 1 swear ta yen, lias hsd no connection wIth the attack upon your father. Wbat Mr. .Avery and Connery are planning ta do ta me, tliey canuet undo. Tbey will mereIy complote the outrage sud in- justice aiready doue me-of whlch Mr. Wandou speke ta bis wife-and they will nat help your father. For God's sake, keep the= fromi golng further!\" Her calour deepened, sud for au lu-j s tant, lie tlianght ho saw full belleT Iu hM growing lu bier eyes; but If sho could not accept the charge agalnst hlm, neithen could, sho couscleiislY deny it, and tue liands she had beon pressiug togethor suddeuly dropped. \"I-I'mn afrald uothing I could saY would bave mucli effoct ou them, knowlug as little about-about yon as\u003c 1 do!\"I They dashed the dooir open then- silenced sud overwholmed hlm; sud they took bier Tram the roem sud left hlm alane agalu. But there was some- t-hing heft wlth hlm, whlch they could rnot tako away; for lu the moment lie lied stood ahane with bier aud passion- ately pleadlug, sometliing had passod betweeu them-be could give ne naine ta lt, but ho knew that Harniet San- Veine uever could tlIlnk of hlm agala 'without s stlrring of lier pulses which drew lier toward hlm. And tlirough t'xe rest af the lonely day and through the sleepiess niglit, lie treasured thîs sud thouglit o! It again sud agalu. 'T ME followlng mornlug the reiieving J suowphows srrived from the eýaqt, sud Eaton feit it was the begla- uiag of the end for hlm. Ho watched Trorn bis wlndew men struggllug lu the enow about the forward end of the frain; thon t'he train moved. forward past the shavoiod sud tnarnpled snow wliene rock sud pleces of tho snow- plow wore plIod lieside the track - stopped, waltod; fiaally It wout on \u0026,gain sud bogan ta take Unp its stolady progrees. The attack upon Sautolue haviug taken place lu Montaua, Batan thauglit that ho would bo turned over te the police samewbere, wlthln that State, snd hoe expected It wouid lie doue at the fIrst stop; but whon the train plowed at Simeons, lie saw the town was aiothiag mare than a littie liamiet beside a side-track. Tlioy sureiy couid net delivor hlm te the village authoni- tien bore. The observation car sud thie Sautolue car -were uncoupled bore aud the train made up agalu wlVli the Sautolue car as the aset car o! the train sud the observation car ahoad o! IL. This, evildeutly, was te stop the passing of passengers througli the San- toine car. Dld it mean that the change Iu Santoiue's condition whlch Dr. Sin- clair had beon expectlug liad taken place sud was for the worse? Baton would have llked ta ask about thls of Connery, whom lie saw standiug out- E-ide bis wiadow sud keeplng watcb upon hlm durlng tho swltchlug of the cars; but lie hues' tixat the conductor wonld net aaswor hM. Ho raug, lnstoad, for the porter sud asked hlm for a railway folder, aud ýwlen this liad been brouglit, heoapened It te the utap of thxe raliraad aud cheock- ed off the naines ef the towns thoy would pase through. Nearly ail thxe naines set lu the liold-face lettoe whidh denoted the citles and larger towns ahead of thein wero, hoe Teund, toward the eseni end Oif the State; the nearest-and theonee, therefore, at whleh lie thonglit lie would lie glveu up-was Beoeai heutrs away. At long torvais the train passed villages ai] le at buried in the snow; the inhabi- ri ants of tliese, gathered at the sta- bi ane, stared la on hlm as they looked S on any other passenger; and at escli hl If these stops Connery stood outside ni il, wladow guarding against posai- w~ ility of bis escape. Bachi time, too, f~ bat thie train slowed, the porter un- hl ocked the door of the cornpartment, Il pened it and stood waiting until the t] rai had regalned Its speed; plainly hey were taklng no chances of his J ropping from the wlndow. ARLY In the afternoon, as they ap- s Sproached the tewn whose ame lnuIb bold-face had made hlm sure that t was the one wliere lie would bo iven to the police, Baton rang for the It lorter again. 0 \"Will you, get me paper and an en- c 'elope ?\" lie asked. c The negro summoued thxe conductor. b \",You wantý ta write?\" Connery o isked. \"Yen.\"d \"You understand that anything you I xrite must lie gîven to me unsealed.\" t \"That's satlafactory ta me. 1 don't belleve that, evea thougl.i t Is unseai- s ed, you'll take It upon yourseif ta road t lt.\". i The coaducdor lookod puzzled, but r sent the porter for somle of the station- ery the rallroad furnished for paesen- gers. The negro brought papor, aud peu and ink,.and set up the littie table in front of Baton, and wlien tliey liad left hlm and had locked thie door, Eaton wroto:* \"Miss Santoiue* \"'The questions-ail of theim-that you and others have asked me yon- are goiug to fiad answered very soon, witbln a very few heurs, it inay be, certaily w1thin a few days--thoigl they are not going Vo be, answerod by me. Wbeu theY are answored, you are golug to think me the most despîcable klnd of man; yen are not goîng to donlit, thon-for the auswers wlll net lot youn doub\u003et--4hat I was theone wlie hurt yeur father. You, and overy oe else, are golng ta feel-not onlY be- cause of that, but becasise of wbat you wlll learu about me--that notbing that msy liappen ta me wll be more thau I justly doserve- *I d on't seoin te caro very mucli wliat people other than yen may thlnk; as the trne grows nearor, 1 feol that I care Ions and Ions about. that; but I do cane very much--'and more and more-th-\u0026t you are golng ta think of me la this way. It is very liard for me to kuow that you are going te regret that you ever let me talk beside yen lu the frleudly way. yen did, or that yen lot me walk bie- side yeu on the station platform at Spokane, and that you are golng ta sblkw1th barrer wlieu yeu recolleci. that yen lot me toucli yon and put my hand ujpou your arm. 1 feol that yQu do net yet liolleve, that It was 1 who attacked your fathor; and I ask you- even la fthe face of tho proof wblch yon are so soon to recelve-not te lie- love ItL 1 took thistrn- .Ho stopped wrlg. recollectlug that thxe letter was te lie gi-ion to Counery unsealed and tbat Connery miglit read it; lie scratched eut tho sentence ho liad begun; thon hoe thouglit a moment aud weut on: 'ql aek yen not to beileve that. More than that, 1 ask you-wbon yen have learned wlio I am-stlii te believe in me. I don't ask yon ta doT ond me agaluest others; yen couid net do that, for you will see ne eue wlio will nat hato and despise me. But 1 beg of yen, la ail liaaesty sud faltli, net ta lot yaurself Teel as tliey de toward me. 1 waut yen te bellovo-\" Ho stopped again, but net becanso ho Toit that Harriet Santeixie would net beilevo what lie was asklng lier te believe; Instead, It was liecause ho kaow she would. Mechanicaily lie opeued his travelling-bag and gat eut a cigar, bit off the end aud forgetting lu lis absorption te liglit it, puffed sud sucked at ItL The future was sure oT hlm; hoe foresaw it plaily, iu de- l'alI evon, for whe.t was happening te hlm was enly the fulillmeut of a tlireat whlch had linon over him ever sluce lie lauded at Seasie. Ho was golug out of life-nat ouiy Harriet Santoine'e life, but ail 11f o, aud the tter he was writing would make Har- et Santoine believe hie deatli to have een an act of injustice, of cruel-ty. he could nlot help but feel that se erseif had been in a waY instru- ientai in his deatli, since it was the ~cusatiofl of violence against lier tther which was golng to show who e was and so condemnl hlm. Dared e, dying, leave a sting like that iu ~e girl's liTe? Hle centAnued to puif at the un- ghted ciga2r; then, mechanically, lie truck a match to light It. As the iatch flared up, lie touched it to the heet on wbIcli lie had been writing, Il .eld the paper until the written Part ras ail consumed, and dropped it on he floor of the car, smlling down at wryly and grimly. He would go Out fHarriet Santoine's life as lie had orne into lt-no, nlot that, for lie had orne it it as one who excited lu er a railler pleaslng doulit and curl- sity, but lie would go eut of ýIt as a aLan wliom sbe must liste and con- emn; to recail hlm would be only valuful -to her, 8o that sbe would try o kili wlthin ber ail memory o! him. As lie glanced to the wlndow, lie :aw that tliey were paselng through lie outskirts Of soine place larger than Liy they hsd stopped at before; and ealizing that this muet \u003ee the place le hsd picked eut on the' nap as the mne wliere they would give hlm to the police, lie closed blis travelling bag and made resdy to go wlthl them. Thie train drew Into Mhe station snd stopped; the porter. as it slowed, had Linlocked and opened th 'e door of lits elompartrnent, and lie saw Connery outside upon the platform; but tis was no different Tram tho-ir procedure aevery stop. Seversi people got on the train here; others got off; so Con- nery, obviouslY, was not preveiiting those who liad been on the train when Santoine was struck, froml leaviilg It now. Baton, as he saw Connery make the signal for the train to go ahead, sank backi suddenly, censcious of the suspense lie liad been under. He got out the rallra'ad foider aud ioolced abead to tlie uext tewn where lie miglit lie given up te the authOri- ies; but wlien they' rolled into thîs la the late afternoon, the proceedings were no differe'nt. Eaton could not understsnd. Hle saw by etudying the Urne-table tbast some turne In the niglit they would pass the Montanla state Ilne into North'Dakota., Didn't tliey lutend te deliver hlm. to ýtibe State au- thorities in Montana? Wlien the wa.iter brouglit bis sup- per, Connery came witb hlm. ,,You wrote something to)-day?\" thxe conductflr sked. 'Il destyoyed lt.\"1 Connery lçeked keeniy around the compartmenf. l'Yeu brouglit mie two enveoes;, there they 1are. you breuglit tliree sixeetsý Of paper; here are two, and tliere's wiat's loft o! the other on the floOr.\"o Connery .seemed satlsfied. \"IWhy bayen't you jalied' me?\" Baton asked. I\"We're waltlng to see how things go wth Mr. Santolue.\" \"Has lie been consclons?\" C ONNERY dd net answer; and througli the conducter's silence Eaton sensed suddeuly what the true condition of aff airs must lie. To give hàrm up to the poalice would make publie the att'acli upon Santolue; and until Santoine either died or recovered for eneugli to be consuited by thern, neither Avery nor Connery-for Con- uory's superiers, apparently--dared te take the respýnsbi1Ity of dolng this. So Eaton would lie carried along to whatever point tliey Wnighit reacli wliou Santolue dled or became fuliy oonsclous. wliere would'that lie? Clear to Chicago? It made ne moterlal difference te hlm, Baton roallzed, whether the police took bila in Moutana or Chii- cago, since la elthor case recognition of hlmn would lie certain lu the end-, but In Chicago this recognition must lie immeêlate, complote, and utterly couvining. T~he next day the weathor «liad moerated, or-here la Nortli Dakota --lit liad been ionm severe; the suew \u003ewas net deep except lu the hallows, and on the bilack, wiudswept: farin. On the Morning'y s Porridge, ail cereals, bernies and fruits, give the child- ren lots of \"ROYAL\"E ACADIA SUGAII, it is fattening, nourish- ing'and tastes good. For these purposes you require a pure, cleail, sparkling sugar, an d there is nothing to equal \"ROYAL\" ACADIA SUGAR. Every Grain Pure Cane. Best for every house- hold use. The Acadia Refinimi Ço., Limîited Halifax - - Causad ROYAL VICTORI COLLEGEL MONTREAL. rhe residential College ,for waOmen studenta Of McGILL UNIVERSITY. Courses load'ta dogrea Arts speparato lu the min Tu' tliae for mon, but nder ide] cal conditions; sud te degrd lu mui. Far praspectus sud infol'i tieu appiy ta the Wardoii. Wmo 18 YOUR FAVRTE STAR? iUndoratand all apeken parts. Il moviug lips. A geod Lip Reader stanlds every word spoke ix SIL52NT DRAIKA. \"Lip eadn Mov4e,\"l mat publisetlsh, t\u0026Ine a simple koy for all IV l' anxd ILovemnents, whlfeé enabion I te \"hesa\" tii. conversation onth palce 25c. Ochool of Lip o Dept. C., 24 Kaunas Cl1ty, Mo.,",
         "THE COURIER. Prouts of winter wheat were Oshowing. The train was tra- 8teadily and faster than its se-hedule; It \u003cBvdently was as a special, some other train t!he ordlnary traffic; it halted Y at the largest cittes. In the i t crossed Into Minnesota; the late afternoon, slowing, it sto some large city which ýflew muet be Minneapolis or' Al a had listened for the Satolme car, but had Othlng; the routine whicb had tabllsbed to take care of hlm e on through the day, and he Il no one but Connery and the Lnd4 hie questions to them bad answered. ,ar here was uncoupled -from nl and plcked Up by a switch as dusk feil, Eaton, .peering i8 Window, could see that they Mn left lylng In the railroad Lndabout midnight, awakening erth, lie realized that the car Il motlenhess. He could ac- \u003er thi stoppage In their pro- ly by Borne change In the con- 3f Santoine.ý Was Santoine go that thêy no longer dared 1? Was Aie, perhàps-dead? 11ils camde to him from the car en' Paton in any conclusion; 18 nd0thing to be learned -from Otside the car. A eolltary Irly and aiert, paced quietly 1id forth below Eaton's wln- la was a guard stationod to any escape while the car was Ms In the yard. lay for a long time, llstenlng e Sounds and wondering what fllflng.-or had cocurred-at r end of his car. Toward he fell asleep. (To be continued.) 3JEsr TrO EARNEsr., .Yonl1an, a little journal pub- F the boys at Harrow School, Iid, Puts the war into proposi- ~Iluc1d, as follows: ,alterna s one who lias position ýklIli communIque lies equally 'oint. Ituse officer la one more atupld 'Uperlor officer, but less s50 1Staff officers. t'eh la that which has length, aiid stiekiness. \u003effIcers In mufti from Brixton falr respectlvely cannot be la. 1 ircle, and lit they meet wIl ~Ilother. lier equal to a Tommy la equal LIng. ý\u0026erver and a plot -who are -%me line mest In the same ,Id dug-out' la- oten a P laii th a Sam Browne boit round ng are d 'ouble the price ot Sthing obtainable eklewbere, I-r Office contract.\"1 NTAND WISDOM. for knowledge does flot leave ý-brown taste. Who harp on one string may n9els-they mnay be harpies. 11prativoly easy te win love, ric Is te bold It. n1ovTe go ftast nowadays that 'a gays, \"It can't be dozie,\" 9rOu1td te see soêmebody do- be Possible that some widows seblack vele to hide 'their If you are this week a chan upon it that it is so regularly. Sr of the. Courier and you find it \" gond stuff \" you may oves on acquaintance. Your subscription solicited. Cfrci~1ation Manager.",
         "FREE on Request-Set of Beautiful Art Jost Cards (Purity Girls). Mail us Post Card To-day- DEPI. E., WESTERN CANADA FLOUR MILLS CO., Limited, Head Office, TORONTO"
      ],
